Introduction to Experience Management
The Discipline of XM
XM (Experience Management) is changing the way businesses operate. Understanding the full landscape of business has never been more important or more accessible than in the face of XM.
In this section, you will learn the foundations of XM.
In this article: 
* What is Experience Management
* The Operating Framework for Experience Management
What is Experience Management
Experience Management (XM) is a discipline that helps organizations measure and improve the experiences delivered to different stakeholders across an enterprise.
As a discipline, XM helps organizations deliver differentiated experiences by continuously listening, propagating insights, and rapidly adapting to meet the changing needs and expectations of customers, employees, partners, and other people in an organization’s XM ecosystem. 


When XM is adopted across an organization, it creates a constant flow of information to sense and interpret what is happening around an organization and act on the insights uncovered at an increasingly faster pace.
Because of this, the first step is to acknowledge that a business operates through experiences, internal and external.
Experiences can make or break an organization's success. They can separate those that out-perform the market from the average performance. Even seemingly small gaps in expectation versus reality can manifest into large issues at aggregate, leading to lower engagement or lost loyalty which ultimately impacts financial performance.
Optional Additional Learning: Watch the XM Institute video introducing Experience Management on this page. 
The Operating Framework for Experience Management
There are three key components of XM that a business needs to invest in to be successful in Experience Management: Competency, Culture, and Technology. These are defined as follows:


Competency


The skills and actions that establish XM as a discipline across the organization. There are six XM competencies: Lead, Realize, Activate, Enlighten, Respond, and Disrupt. Organizations adopt XM by mastering these competencies that are enabled by technology and nurtured by culture.
For example:
* Defining and communicating a clear XM strategy and program roadmap outlining the projects and workstreams to improve experiences. 
* Identifying core XM metrics and defining goals against which to measure the progress of XM efforts.
Optional Additional Learning: You can watch this XM Institute video about the six XM Competencies, click here. 
Technology


A platform that empowers an organization to collect, understand, and take action on the combination of experience and operational data. As an organization builds its XM competencies, it will naturally be collecting more X-data, using more analytics, and distributing more customized insights. This only happens with the support of technology. 
For example:
* For XM to scale, an organization needs a platform that infuses actionable intelligence throughout an organization. As the organization builds its XM competencies, it will naturally be collecting more X-data (Experience Data), so the platform needs to become the primary system of record for all of that X-data. 
* Since XM is a discipline woven across the entire organization, it requires a platform that can manage all of the experience data. This platform needs to be powerful and easy to use by the increasing number of employees who will have access to and need to take action on the insights generated.
Culture


Mindsets and beliefs that nurture XM-centric behaviors across an organization. The culture of an organization can either accelerate or inhibit the spread of XM competencies. Companies need to foster an environment that encourages XM-centric mindsets and behaviors in their leaders and employees.
For example:
* One characteristic of an XM culture is that it is human-centric. Because experiences are created and consumed by human beings, it requires a culture where everyone demonstrates empathy for its customers and its employees. 
* The more that an organization is comfortable with making improvements without significant internal resistance, the easier it will be for XM competencies to take hold. An XM culture is also change-minded, meaning it creates a bias for embracing ongoing improvements and innovations.
Optional Additional Learning: You can learn more about XM and complete an XM Maturity self-assessment by visiting the XM Institute (click here). 
Optional Additional Learning: Visit the Experience Basecamp video series course dedicated to Experience Management (click here). 
Defining Experiences and Insights
At the core of XM, is understanding what an experience is and where they occur. Once you can understand this, it reveals how and why you should measure them, as well as what it means to gain an insight translated into action.
In this article: 
* What is an Experience?
* Defining experience gaps and opportunities
What is an Experience?
There are many definitions for an Experience. For XM and this certification, we will focus on the following definition: 


	Definition
	An Experience is a moment of truth that affects the human components of your business.
	Below are some examples:
* Customers applying for a loan with your business.
* Citizens completing their tax returns online.
* Managers learning new software to manage their teams’ output.
* Parents seeing an advertisement for a new type of milk substitute for their baby.
* People using a brand new product for the first time.
When are experiences created? 
Experiences are created during a business’s regular activities, for example, buying, selling, delivering services, managing stakeholders, engaging employees, executing processes, manufacturing, distribution, logistics, marketing, etc. 


Each activity generates experiences that can be productive or counterproductive for the people that deliver or receive them. Successful businesses monitor these activities for gaps and opportunities to successfully maintain their point of difference from competitors.


Defining experience gaps and opportunities
An XM program measures your experiences to reveal insights into their effectiveness. There are several types of insights, such as:
* Breakdowns in processes
* Opportunities to enhance services
* Ways to streamline an interaction
* Moments for education or communication
* Areas for further investigation
Remember, successful organizations will be the ones who continuously learn, propagate insights, and rapidly adapt. These capabilities will enable organizations to identify differences between what they seek to deliver and what they are actually delivering to customers, employees, or other stakeholders. The insights can reveal the impact and need for action to drive the right outcomes for the business.
Below are some examples of experiences being measured, the insight gathered from the data, the impact revealed, and the potential actions defined to reduce the impact:
EXPERIENCE THAT IS BEING MEASURED
	INSIGHT GAINED FROM THE DATA
	IMPACT ON STAKEHOLDERS AND BUSINESS
	ACTIONS TO MITIGATE
	Customers applying for a loan with your business. 
	The customer returned multiple times during the application process, each time with different documentation.
	The customer was inconvenienced by poor documentation of the requirements to apply for the loan.
The risk that the customer may abandon the process.
	Ensure you publish clear documentation needs for potential applicants.
Ensure they are easily accessible in relevant channels early in the application process.
	Managers learning new software to manage their team’s output. 
	Before the software was implemented the managers were not asked for input on how they would use this tool in their day to day.
	Manager information needs are not understood.
Reduced chance of successful adoption.
Increased need for additional implementation.
	Build a process to involve target users in procurement and implementation planning. 
Identify managers to participate in pilot roll-out to give input and support adoption more broadly.
	Front line Employees working the night shift in a call center. 
	Coffee is not consistently available for night shift call center workers. They feel unimportant to the organization.
	Workers' productivity and ability to be empathetic to calling customers are negatively impacted.
Turnover of hard-to-replace night shift workers. 
	Structure office catering to ensure coffee supplies do not run out ahead of night shifts. 
Continue to share night shift worker sentiment with managers and supervisors.
	Citizens completing their tax returns online. 
	While completing their tax form online, a citizen called the tax authority with several questions.
	Increased load on tax authority call center with basic questions.
Citizens may abandon the online tax return due to inconvenience, and turn to the call center instead.
	Publish frequently asked questions available online with the relevant positions on the tax return.
Test the wording of the online tax form with the audience before publishing it online.
	Parents seeing an advertisement for a new type of milk substitute for their baby. 
	The parents liked the product proposition but were unsure if it was suitable for babies under 6 months, so they didn't buy it.
	The advertisement failed to inform parents if the product is safe for their baby. 
Many parents with babies under 6 months did not buy the product.
	Test the message with the target market to determine any information gaps.
Incorporate these into the message planning and campaign execution. 
	It is also possible for the insights to include positive learnings where you may underestimate some features or benefits of your organization. 
For example, when a brand identifies a competitive strength they did not know they had, this is an opportunity to communicate this strength more heavily in their marketing efforts.
Optional Additional Learning: You can learn more about experiences and defining them with the XM Institute at www.xminstitute.com.


Introduction to X and O Data
Defining X and O Data
Now that you understand how experiences are created, and how they impact the performance of an organization, it’s time to look more closely at the information that helps you understand an experience.
In Experience Management, you will predominantly work with two kinds of data: Experience Data (X-data) and Operational Data, (O-data). This section defines each type, and the next section addresses how they work together to generate insights.
In this article: 
* Experience Data (X-Data)
* Operational Data (O-Data)
Experience Data (X-Data)
This is data that is collected from stakeholders to understand experiences from a human perspective. It's the data of how people think, feel, and behave.


This is most commonly collected through surveys but can also come from other sources, such as insights gleaned from analyzing recorded speech, analyzing the text of contact center interactions, the sentiment expressed in social media, online review posts, stakeholder interviews, focus groups, and other ethnographic techniques.
There are 6 types of X-Data:
1. Experience Expectations- How people think and feel about a future interaction with an organization, which can be collected on a regular cycle or periodically (e.g. whether a customer expects a product to be hard to use or believes they can accomplish a service interaction online).
2. Interaction Perceptions- How people think or feel about a specific interaction, which can be tracked continuously or periodically (e.g. feedback after an online purchase or after an employee training course).
3. Journey Perceptions- How people think or feel about a collection of activities around a goal, which can be tracked continuously or periodically (e.g. feedback after an airline customer finishes a trip or after an employee completes their onboarding).
4. Relationship Attitudes- How people feel about relationships with other people in their organization (e.g. managers, peers, leaders). This also includes how people feel about their relationship with an organization overall, including plans for future interactions, which can be tracked on a regular cycle or periodically (e.g. Customer NPS, Customer Sentiment, Employee Engagement, or Brand Tracking studies).
5. Ad-Hoc Diagnostics- How people think or feel about a problem or opportunity, which is collected as needed based on other findings (e.g. pulse employee survey about a leadership issue or qualitative study into why a brand message didn’t work).
6. Choice Preferences- How people would rank different alternatives, which is collected periodically (e.g. product feature selection or employee benefits optimization).
As you can see, X-Data is concerned with the human elements of a business's activities. 
Operational Data (O-Data)
This is the data that an organization collects as part of the normal course of business—the data of what happened, when, where, how much, and who by. When the need arises to measure specific experiences, XM Professionals can leverage O-data to contextualize and enrich the X-data.
There are innumerable types of O-data. Some common examples include:
Demographic Data
	Interaction/ Transactional History
	Identifying Information
	Citizen registered state
Gender
Employee tenure
State / Region / Country
Branch name / location
Number of children
	Application date
Products owned
Website cookie exposure
Call history
Interaction ID
Training date
	Employee name / ID
Customer segment
Account number
Email
Mobile number
Loyalty status
	Optional Additional Learning: You can read more details about X and O data in this article from the XM Institute. 
In Summary
O-data tells you what happened. X-data tells you why it’s happening.
In the normal course of business, you will collect a lot of Operational Data that can tell you about what happened, but it can illustrate only that. 
To explain why certain things are happening you need to measure the human element, the Experience Data. What the human stakeholders thought, felt, and expected. 
See for example the below illustration of a customer of a paid music subscription service. Along their journey, they interact with the business, creating opportunities to ask the customer why they upgraded, how the process aligned to expectations, and if the service was delivered.


To unlock the true potential of connecting Experience and Operational Data together you need to learn the ways they can be analyzed to draw insight. In the next section, you will be taken through an example of applying X and O Data together. 
Applying X-Data and O-Data
Now that you're familiar with the types of Experience and Operational Data that an organization can collect, this section will take you through how you can apply this data to uncover insights and scale actions. 
In this article: 
* Example case study
* Analyzing X-Data alone
* Analyzing X-Data and O-Data together
* Defining actions using X-Data and O-Data
* Get started with XM in your organization
Example case study
This case study will help you understand the value of using Experience and Operational data in practice for analysis. Below is the example case study:


Q-Sunglass Co. is a company that manufactures and sells quality and affordable sunglasses around the world. They have an XM program capturing feedback from their customers on each purchase.
From a recent simple feedback survey they have the following data available to them:
* X-Data: Customer Satisfaction responses (collected in a survey).
* O-Data: Customer product ownership and support call history (available from the company transaction logs).
Analyzing X-Data alone
With the X-Data collected, Q-Sunglasses Co. can calculate the average satisfaction rating for the customers who responded to the survey. They can see if their satisfaction delivery performance falls above or below their target.


That’s an extremely valuable insight by which Q-Sunglasses Co. can quickly assess at a high level the ultimate satisfaction outcome of all their combined processes. But the insights derived from their data can be elevated to the next level by overlaying and applying a more detailed lens using O-Data.
Analyzing X-Data and O-Data together
Q-Sunglasses Co. can create a more detailed understanding of their performance and become more predictive by combining the available Operational data with the collected satisfaction data from the survey. 
For example:
* Create a Chart with the overall satisfaction score broken down by product ownership. 


* For the dissatisfied and extremely dissatisfied customers, analyze different versions of their products together with the type of support call for each product. 


* For the dissatisfied and extremely dissatisfied customers, analyze the detailed comments recorded by support center representatives about the issue request. 


With the combined power of X-Data and O-Data, the insight from this survey revealed that customers who own Q-Sunglass Co. Cycling Glasses are more likely to have below-average satisfaction, and you can see that the call center support topics frequently include warranty requests for faulty and missing screws. 


As a result, Q-Sunglasses Co. can make inferences about the broader experience of owning these types of glasses and impending service claims across their whole customer base (not just the survey respondents) enabling them to plan a broad intervention.
Defining actions using X and O-Data
Q-Sunglasses Co. can now scale their learning and actions by identifying all their customers who bought cycling glasses in the past 12 months and take proactive measures to supply the warranty service forms to these customers before the complaints are made by these customers to call centers. 


The positive business outcome is that customers feel Q-Sunglasses Co. is customer-centric and proactively puts customers' interests first to provide a seamless claim experience for potentially faulty products, generating loyalty and brand equity. It also creates other benefits:
* Reduces incoming calls to contact centers, thereby freeing up capacity to better serve other customers.
* Provides customers with a sense of respect and value from the business.
* Demonstrates a customer-centric approach that can be used in marketing campaigns.
* Enables more targeted use of resources to the impacted customers.
Optional Additional Learning: You can learn more about XM Operations and complete an XM Maturity Self Assessment in this publication by the XM Institute (click here). 
Get started with XM in your organization
As you can see, Experience Management is an important discipline to nurture in your organization that enables you to adapt to expectations and market changes. It is supported by technology, culture, and competency and is most successful when applied holistically across your organization.
To kick off XM in your organization start with the following actions:
1. Have conversations with your leadership teams, managers, and employees about the experiences that matter to them and their customers/members.
2. Discuss how your collective understanding of these groups can be improved.
3. Prioritize a list of the most impactful experiences to start with, which X and O-Data elements will be needed, and the corporate cultural values you'd like to influence.
4. Visit the XM Institute to complete the XM Maturity Self Assessment (click here).
Lesson 2
Understanding the Components of a Project
In this article: 
* Stages of a Survey Project
* Understanding the Survey Audience
* The Impact of Poor Design
Stages of a Survey Project 
Understanding the stages of the end-to-end project is an important place to start to make the right decisions for your survey and project design. The main stages include:
* Survey Design
* Survey Build
* Distribution
* Data collection and Processing
* Reporting
* Decision Making
The goal of a survey project is ultimately to make informed business decisions, present recommendations to executives, or invest in optimizing processes, teams, and products—all investments of valuable resources. For this reason, you need to ensure quality decisions throughout the data collection process.  
Arguably, the most important stage is the Survey Design. This is when you create the survey itself which will become the backbone of the remaining parts of the project.
Never rush the Survey Design stage. The survey project is an important part of the experience management operation in a business because it captures the data that is ultimately used for organization-level decision-making. During Survey Design, the decisions you make have significant downstream impacts on the quality and action-ability of business decisions.


Understanding the Survey Audience
Now that you understand that the survey is the backbone of the overall project, you can look more closely at the survey design stage itself. The two main survey audiences to consider during survey design are:
* The survey builder
* The survey respondent
A great survey design helps make the survey building process easier (it produces a clear and accurate survey outline to execute in the platform), and also optimizes the survey-taking experience for the respondent (it produces a survey requiring low cognitive load and low effort to complete). 
As a survey builder, there is often a tendency to create questions that seem easy and lower effort to build; for example, the use of matrix table/grid questions. However, it is often overlooked that the opposite is true for the respondent audience (the next section contains best practice recommendations for grids). During the design process, always ask yourself what it would be like to answer your questions from the respondent's perspective. When you progress to building the survey in the platform ensure you frequently preview the survey to see the respondent experience first-hand. 
The Impact of Poor Design
Your survey data is populated by the respondent. The way that your survey is designed and built will influence the way respondents answer questions. In aggregate, their answers can significantly impact the quality of your reports. 
When a survey is not built with best practices in mind, you can encounter the following pitfalls:
1. When questions are confusing or hard to answer, respondents become more likely to use shortcuts in answering questions. This results in straight-lining or guessing, and the data this produces won’t show the kind of variation that reflects reality.
2. When questions are complex and overbearing, such as long grid questions, respondents make mistakes in answering using the correct cells. At scale, this produces very risky data for decision-making.
3. When surveys are long, respondents skip questions or abandon the survey. This results in fewer responses for the last few questions of your survey, reducing how representative the data is for these questions. Similarly, when respondents skip questions you will have gaps in the completeness of your survey data. 
In the next section, you will learn the survey design best practices to help reduce the cognitive load for a respondent, increase completion rates, and collect better quality data.
Survey Design Best Practices
There are six best practices to follow in producing great survey designs. In this section, you will learn what they are and the guidelines to follow. 
Before building a survey in the Qualtrics Platform, you should plan the survey at a high level outside the platform to give yourself space to incorporate best practices. 


This will help you maximize the value derived from the survey project, reduce the probability of errors, and elevate the decision-makers using the data. It will also provide you with a structure to reference and facilitate the platform build process. 
This course takes you through the best practice recommendations for planning and designing your survey.
The best practices you will learn include: 
1. Set your research objectives
2. Make every question count
3. Plan the order of your questions
4. Limit survey length 
5. Effective question-wording
6. Keep it simple for respondents
At the end of this course, you will receive a summary of best practices and a challenge to practice applying these concepts.
1. Set Your Project Objectives
This is the first of six design best practices. 
Setting concrete project objectives is often one of the hardest steps in a project. This involves creating a problem statement to guide your survey project and also provides a reference tool to help you prioritize the questions to ask in your survey.
Using objectives as a reference tool will reduce the temptation to add questions that do not tie directly to your business problem statement and create an unnecessarily long survey. 
To write a problem statement, start with your goals
The statement should be specific to an identified business problem you want to solve. 
* What do you want to know?
* Which specific outcomes do you need?
* Which problems do you need to solve to move your business forward?
Brainstorming to write problem statements
Brainstorm the business problem in a group to arrive at a simple statement. 
It is good practice to discuss this in detail in a team to include different perspectives and ensure that your stakeholders' objectives are well understood before any questions are designed. These are usually influenced by anecdotal observations or high-level exploration of Operational Data. 


Questions to ask in this group:
1. Who? Who are the people with the problem? Are they end-users, stakeholders, teams within your business? Have you validated the information to see what the scale of the problem is?
2. What? What is its nature and what is the supporting evidence?
3. Why? What is the business case for solving the problem? How will it help?
4. Where? How does the problem manifest and where is it observed?
Examples of well-written statements include:
* “Why do sales peak at certain times of the day?”
* “Why are customers abandoning their online shopping carts at the point of sale?”
* "Why do employees with 3+ years tenure have lower productivity than those of lower tenure?" 
* "What is the relationship between marketing spend and trail shoe product sales over the last 12 months?" 
2. Make Every Question Count
The end product of a survey project is a report for decision-making to solve business problems. A survey/questionnaire is a group of questions that exist to obtain insights to answer business problems. Every question should directly contribute to answering the Project Objectives you previously created.


Often, survey designers fail to focus their questions on the project objective, resulting in irrelevant questions that aren’t useful during analysis. This negatively impacts confidence in the data from decision-makers.
To optimize the value of your survey, keep the following in mind when outlining the questions to include in the survey:
* As part of planning your survey, identify the stakeholders who need to make decisions using the survey results. Start by asking What data do they need? What decisions do they need to make? What metrics matter most to them?. Then create your questions based on those needs. By starting with the end in mind you will elevate the value that your XM data collection projects deliver to your organization.
* For Example: 


* Make sure each question adds value and drives responses that relate directly to your research goals.
   * For example, if it's important to know your participant’s preference in communication frequency, relationship status, education levels, or number of children, go ahead and ask these questions in the survey. If not, save yourself and your respondents some time and remove these. You will likely not analyze this data, and it will jeopardize the quality of other responses.
   * For example, if you have age, state, product ownership, tenure, segment, spend, loyalty status, etc. as Operational Data, import this data rather than asking it in the survey. 
* Find out what Operational Data you have available in your organization.
   * When you import Operational Data to a survey you will not need to create a question to record this information. This will reduce the survey length and burden on respondents, while still making the data available in results.
   * Operational Data will add context and breakdown opportunities in reporting that you would otherwise not have when purely collecting survey responses. 
   * Consider which Operational Data points decision-makers and senior leaders use or rely on regularly. Include these in your survey to elevate the direct value it will have for these stakeholders. 
3. Plan the Order of Your Questions
The overall survey structure is important to guide your respondents in a logical progression through the survey. The order of your questions provides this structure. 
There are two main approaches to designing the overall survey structure:
1. Broad to Narrow: 
   1. For example, in Brand Tracking, start with broader questions about the market you operate in, then move to questions about your brand, its products, usage, and perceptions.  


   2. For example, in an Employee Pulse, start with questions about the overall sentiment and engagement of employees,  such as “overall how proud do you feel working for...?” Then as the survey progresses, move into more detail (e.g. questions about training, benefits, etc).
2. Narrow to Broad: 
   1. For example, in Customer Touchpoint research, start with a specific interaction (e.g. bank teller interaction), then move into a more broad set of questions about the business and brand overall. 


Demographic Questions Placement
Demographic questions can be placed at the start or end of the survey, however, whenever possible use O-data to import any existing demographic data you already have about respondents. When you must ask demographic questions, consider where to place them:
* Start of the survey: Only place demographic questions that are critical to screening or qualifying your respondents at the start of the survey. For example, if you do not have Parental Status in your O-data, and only want parents to complete your survey, you should ask this question at the start.
* End of the survey: Other demographic questions are best placed at the end of the survey. They are very personal and can result in survey dropouts if asked too soon in the survey.
4. Limit Survey Length
Respondents have a limited amount of time and are easily distracted or discouraged from completing surveys. By keeping the length and complexity low, you can counter some of these risks resulting in:
* Higher completion rates (respondents getting to the end of the survey).
* Fewer Survey Drop-outs (respondents dropping out of the survey before finishing).
* Fewer straight-lining answers (respondents using shortcuts or guessing).
* More thoughtful text-based answers.
* Better quality data to analyze and make decisions on. 


Of course, this depends on the type of research being done. For example, academic research on the psychology of decision-making will certainly be longer than a touch-point survey from a banker interaction or employee engagement. 
There is no exact science to selecting a target length—it depends on the project objectives, which define the depth and breadth of the questions asked. 
As a rule, keep it as short as possible while fulfilling the project objectives, remembering that every 10 questions take approximately 2 minutes to answer.


	Tip
	General guidelines to inform your survey length targets:
* Customer surveys - aim for between 2 and 3 minutes.
* Employee surveys - between 5 and 10 minutes.
* Academic or sociological research - aim for between 7 and 15 minutes.
* Product and Brand surveys - aim for between 7 and 12 minutes.
	For longer surveys, consider providing incentives for completion. Charitable monetary donations work well (particularly for Employee Research) as small donations in aggregate make a big difference to not-for-profits, but an individual may not value a small monetary amount. Alternatively, a chance to win a larger more valuable prize can be considered.
5. Know Good from Bad Question Wording
There are some best practices to follow in wording your questions in order to collect the highest quality data.
Avoid Superlatives: 
Superlatives can influence your survey responses. Words such as “Most”, “Best”, and “Always” are very subjective to the individual answering the question. For example:
* Bad Practice: “Brand X is the most reliable brand” 
* Good Practice: “Brand X is a reliable brand”
Avoid Absolute Choice Scenarios: 
Absolute choices force a respondent into unnatural answers. For example:


* Bad Practice: “Do you always drink full cream milk in your coffee?”
* Good Practice: “Do you drink full cream milk in your coffee? 


Carefully Design Answer Choices: 
Using only Yes/No answer choices can provide less detailed data than a response scale or multiple-choice since they only yield one of two possible answer choices. Many Yes/No questions can be reworked to expand the choices. For example:
* Bad Practice: Do you drink coffee? - Yes / No
* Good Practice: Do you drink coffee? - Every day / a few times a week / a few times per month / every few months / never.


Avoid Double-Barreled Questions: 
A double-barreled question is when two separate elements are asked about in a single question. For example: 
* “How satisfied are you with the quality of our product and support?”
A respondent cannot answer the question on both product and support satisfaction, and there is no way for you to separate the feedback in the analysis.
Instead, break the question into two separate questions, such as:
* Good Practice: “How satisfied are you with the quality of our support?”
* Good Practice: “How satisfied are you with the quality of our product?”


Avoid Leading Questions: 
A leading question is where the question wording hints at a perspective and influences the response, which produces poor data. For example:
* Bad Practice: “How satisfied are you with our new and improved product packaging?” 
* Good Practice: “How satisfied are you with our revised product packaging?”


6. Keep it Simple for Respondents
Survey respondents are busy and do not have a lot of time to spare. As the survey builder, you should respect their time and create surveys that are not only quick but also easy for them to complete. 
Here are recommendations to create a survey that balances simplicity and data quality. 
Limit Open-Ended Questions. 
A survey should consist mostly of questions with answer choices, such as multiple-choice, scale, and grid questions. These questions create the structure for your analysis and are intuitive for respondents to understand and answer, producing better data quality.
Open text entry questions ask customers to provide feedback in their own words. From a survey perspective, this requires a high level of effort for a respondent and can result in drop-outs and incomplete responses.  


	

	Tip
	It is recommended to limit the number of text entry questions to one and two (unless absolutely critical to the survey outcome, or if the survey is part of a Qualitative study).
	Use Grids with Caution: 
Grids are appealing to a survey creator— they are easy to set up, have a logical structure, and are believed to be faster to answer for the respondent. However, many survey builders overlook that these questions require more effort for the respondent to understand and answer, and are more complex for analysis purposes.
As grid questions become more complete, respondents’ cognitive burden increases. They react by taking shortcuts in answering (e.g. straight-line answers), resulting in lower data quality (e.g. smaller differentiation of answers) for your business decisions to be made from. 
* Bad Practice: long statement lists, and/or long scales (unless critical to the data outcome).


* Good Practice: Use 5 point scales, limit statements in the grid; and wherever possible use single statement rating questions instead of grids (see below). 


Designing Scale Points: 
Response scales capture the direction and intensity of attitudes, providing rich data. There are two main considerations:
* Scales need to be balanced: Questions with scale answers should have a midpoint that is neutral, with an equal number of positive and negative choices on either side.  
* Keep scale length short wherever possible: Common choices include 5, 7, and 11 point scales. When in doubt, use a 5 point scale, which gives you the direction and intensity of opinion, isn't visually challenging for the respondent, and is efficient for analysis purposes.


Summary of Survey Design Best Practices
The survey design stage is often rushed or skipped entirely. This can have significant consequences for the data you collect and ultimately the decisions you are able to make.
Here are the key takeaways for this course:
Consider the stakeholders that will be engaging with the report
As you saw early in the course, data is collected in order to report it for decision making. It is good practice to start with the decision-makers in mind. This will ensure you know which metrics to focus on and therefore help you with forming your question. Additionally, this will help narrow down the Operational Data required.
Plan and design your surveys before building them in the platform
Planning the survey at a high level will provide you with a structural guide for questions and Operational Data. You will quickly get a feel for consistency, missing information, if you have too many questions, etc.
This enables you to determine the Operational Data you will have available for the project.
Apply the following best practices 
1. Set your Research Objectives Write your objectives with outcomes and the business problem in mind. This will help you focus on the questions you create in the next steps. 
2. Make Every Question Count Every question should directly contribute to answering the Project Objectives you previously created. Start with your stakeholders in mind. Understand the Operational Data available to you. 
3. Plan the Order of Your Questions There are two main structures. Broad to narrow, or narrow to broad. Consider which will work for your project.
4. Limit Survey Length Respondents have a limited amount of time and are easily distracted or discouraged from completing surveys. By keeping the length and complexity down you can counter some of these risks. 
5. Effective Question-Wording Avoid superlatives, avoid absolute answer scenarios, avoid double-barreled questions, avoid leading questions, and carefully design answer choices. 
6. Keep it Simple for Respondents Limit open-ended questions, use grids/matrix tables with caution, choose and design scales carefully (they should be balanced and should not be unnecessarily long). 
Lesson 3
Creating and Organizing Projects
Project Organization
In this article: 
* Starting on the Projects Page
* Definition of a Qualtrics Project
* Project Page Options
Starting on the Projects Page
When you log in to Qualtrics, you will land on the My Projects page.
If you are logging in for the first time there will be no projects on this page yet. Over time as you build projects, or other users share them with you, they will be listed on this page.


Definition of a Qualtrics Project
In Qualtrics, a Project consists of several elements—a survey, any actions set, its distributions (email invites and reminders sent), the raw data collected, and reports associated with the project. In cases where the license is appropriately provisioned, a project can also consist of Dashboards or Website / App Intercepts.
Optional additional learning: Click here to learn more about Project Types. 
Project Page Options
On the Projects page you can:
1. Search for a Project by typing its name or part of its name.
2. Change the layout of the project page to suit your preference. Or you can sort by different project criteria using the drop-down arrow.


3. Open and Create folders You can create folders by clicking Add new folder. To add projects to a folder, click and drag the project to a folder. Any projects shared with you by other people will appear in a folder called Shared with me.


4. Access Project Actions to see the project actions click on the three dots on the right side of the project. Example project actions include:
   1. Activate/Deactivate projects
   2. Collaborate or share the project
   3. Copy the project
   4. Access the survey for editing
   5. Translate the survey
   6. View your data
   7. Delete the project




	Caution
	When deleting a project, use caution. Continuing will delete all of a project’s components including the survey, any distributions, the raw data, and the survey's associated reports.
	

Creating a New Survey Project
In this article: 
* Creating a new blank survey project
* Copying a project
* Creating a project from a library
* Importing a survey
* Using Project Templates
Creating a New Blank Survey Project
As a project owner, you will be creating and executing projects in Qualtrics.
It all starts on the Projects page where you create and manage your projects.
To create a new blank survey project, click Create New Project.


This will take you to the Qualtrics Catalog, where you will see all of your available project types. At the top, you will find your product line filters, your most recent projects, and a search bar to help you navigate the catalog.


Next, you will see all of the projects you can start from scratch, followed by guided projects and project templates.
When you click on a project, you will see a short description of the project type, as well as any related links if applicable.
To create a blank survey, click on Survey and Get Started.


1. Name the project.
2. Assign it to a folder.
3. Select Create a blank survey project.
4. Click Create project.


Optional additional learning: You can learn more about the other Project types on this product guide page. 
Other methods of creating surveys
In Qualtrics there are a few other useful ways to create survey projects. Using these helps save time and gives you the ability to leverage existing content. Including:
* Copying a project.
* Creating a project from the library.
* Importing a project.
* Using XM solutions.
Copying a project
Copy an existing project to leverage its setup for a new project, so that all you have to do is make some changes to the new project requirements.
1. On the Projects page, locate the Survey to copy.
2. Select the Actions dropdown, click Copy Project.


3. Name the project and click Copy Project.
Creating a project from the library
There are hundreds of surveys in the Qualtrics library for you to leverage. To create a project from the library follow the steps outlined above, but select Use a survey from your library instead of Create a blank survey project.


Then, select which library and which survey you want to use from the dropdown as shown below.


Lastly, click Create Project, once you have made all of your selections.
Importing a survey
Import a survey from a special Qualtrics Survey File type (QSF file). To do this, follow the steps outlined above and select Import a QSF file. Then, click on Choose file to select the QSF file you want to import. Lastly, click Create Project to get started.




	Note
	You will need to know how to import surveys for the challenges in this certification.
	Using Project Templates
When you are in the catalog, scroll down to see and access pre-built solutions that include survey and report templates.


Creating a New Survey Project
In this article: 
* Creating a new blank survey project
* Copying a project
* Creating a project from a library
* Importing a survey
* Using Project Templates
Creating a New Blank Survey Project
As a project owner, you will be creating and executing projects in Qualtrics.
It all starts on the Projects page where you create and manage your projects.
To create a new blank survey project, click Create New Project.


This will take you to the Qualtrics Catalog, where you will see all of your available project types. At the top, you will find your product line filters, your most recent projects, and a search bar to help you navigate the catalog.


Next, you will see all of the projects you can start from scratch, followed by guided projects and project templates.
When you click on a project, you will see a short description of the project type, as well as any related links if applicable.
To create a blank survey, click on Survey and Get Started.


1. Name the project.
2. Assign it to a folder.
3. Select Create a blank survey project.
4. Click Create project.


Optional additional learning: You can learn more about the other Project types on this product guide page. 
Other methods of creating surveys
In Qualtrics there are a few other useful ways to create survey projects. Using these helps save time and gives you the ability to leverage existing content. Including:
* Copying a project.
* Creating a project from the library.
* Importing a project.
* Using XM solutions.
Copying a project
Copy an existing project to leverage its setup for a new project, so that all you have to do is make some changes to the new project requirements.
1. On the Projects page, locate the Survey to copy.
2. Select the Actions dropdown, click Copy Project.


3. Name the project and click Copy Project.
Creating a project from the library
There are hundreds of surveys in the Qualtrics library for you to leverage. To create a project from the library follow the steps outlined above, but select Use a survey from your library instead of Create a blank survey project.


Then, select which library and which survey you want to use from the dropdown as shown below.


Lastly, click Create Project, once you have made all of your selections.
Importing a survey
Import a survey from a special Qualtrics Survey File type (QSF file). To do this, follow the steps outlined above and select Import a QSF file. Then, click on Choose file to select the QSF file you want to import. Lastly, click Create Project to get started.




	Note
	You will need to know how to import surveys for the challenges in this certification.
	Using Project Templates
When you are in the catalog, scroll down to see and access pre-built solutions that include survey and report templates.


Building a New Survey
In this article: 
* The Survey Tab
* Adding and Removing Questions
* Selecting Question Types
The Survey Tab
When you create a new Survey Project you will be taken to the Survey tab. Every survey project has 5 main tabs - Survey, Actions, Distributions, Data & Analysis, and Reports. The focus of this section is the Survey Tab where you control all aspects of the survey before it is distributed, including:
* Adding and managing questions
* Configuring question settings
* Managing survey pathways
* Specifying the survey look and feel
* Testing the survey


Adding and Removing Questions
A new blank Survey Project will not contain any configured questions. By default, you will see a single Block (defined later in Section 5) and a blank question created for you.


Using the survey outline that you created in your planning phase, you can build your questions in this tab.
Start by adding a question with the steps below:
Creating a New Blank Question: 
1. Click Add new question.
2. This will add a blank question for you to customize (addressed in detail in the next section).


Once you have a question in the project, a plus symbol "+" and a minus symbol "-" will appear when you hover your mouse over the question. See the below steps and screenshot.
1. Add Another Question: Click the plus (+) to add questions above or below.
2. Remove Question: Click the minus (-) to send the selected question to the Trash.


	Note
	When you use the Minus button (-) to move a question to the Trash, you can easily restore this question from the Trash, until it is permanently deleted from within the Trash.
	3. Move Questions: Use the up ^ or down v arrows on your keyboard or drag and drop the question.


Creating Questions From Templates
You can also leverage pre-written questions from a repository of questions and other survey projects by clicking the Import from library button.


For example, this helps save you time when you need demographic questions because you can import a variety of income ranges, education levels, states, etc.
Selecting Question Types
A Question Type is a blank question that provides a template for you to populate and customize to behave as you need.
To change the Question Type:
1. Click on the question you want to edit.
2. On the left-hand side of the question, go to the Editing-Pane.
3. Under Question type, select the drop-down arrow.
4. Select the desired Question type.


Static Question Types
Selecting the correct question type is critical to achieving your data objectives. The question types you use will dictate the respondent experience as well as the data that is recorded for reporting. 
This section will give you an understanding of the common question types, and when and how to use them.
In this article: 
* Text/Graphic Question Type
In Qualtrics, the Question types are categorized as static content, standard questions, specialty questions, and advanced questions. The most commonly used question formats are from the static content or standard questions categories which are the focus for this Certification.
Below you will learn about the static question type and then about standard question types in detail. 
Defining Static Content Questions
These questions are for displaying information or images to respondents and do not require the respondent to provide a response.
These include:
* Descriptive Text 
* Graphic Question
Descriptive Text Questions
Use this Question Type when you need to display text to a respondent. For example:
* A welcome message 
* Section headings
* Survey terms and conditions
* Special survey instructions


Creating a Descriptive Text question:
1. Create a New Que
2. In the Question Editing Pane, under Change Question Type, select Descriptive Text
3. Type the text to be displayed to the respondent
Graphic Questions
This Question Type is designed to display images. Use it when you need to show respondents a visual stimulus before asking them questions, for example to show:
* Respondents an image of the potential new product to review before asking them questions about the product.
* Customers an image of a new website homepage design, then subsequently asking them specific questions about the display.
* Employees an image of a new office space design ideas before asking them about their opinion of it. 
Creating a Graphic Question: 
1. Create a New Question
2. In the Question Editing Pane, under Change Question Type, select Graphic
3. Click Select a graphic to use for this question
4. Select or upload a graphic to Qualtrics to be displayed in the survey
Using Question Types
Selecting the correct question type is critical to achieving your data objectives. The question types you use will dictate the respondent experience and the data recorded for reporting.
This section will give you an understanding of the common question types, and when and how to use them.
In this article: 
* Defining Standard Question Types
* Multiple Choice Question Type
* Text Entry Question Type
* Matrix Table Question Type
* Text/Graphic Question Type
Defining Standard Question Types
Standard Question Types require respondents to select or input answers. In most cases, as a survey writer, you will use the following three question types:
* Multiple Choice
* Text Entry
* Matrix Table


	

	Multiple Choice, Text entry, and Matrix Table question types are the most commonly used in surveys around the world. As a result, they are more familiar to respondents and easier to answer; they are also more intuitive to visualize when reporting your data.
	Multiple Choice Question Type
This question type consists of:
1. Question-Wording: the text you use to ask a question.
2. Answer Choices: the choices displayed to a respondent.


The Multiple Choice Question Type is very versatile; it can be used to build a large number of different question formats, including single answer, multiple answer, or scale questions. It can also be presented vertically or horizontally and as a series of columns for longer lists.
Below are examples of three main ways to use a Multiple Choice Question and some examples of question formatting:
Format Options
	Example Question
	Example Answer Choice Formats
	Single Answer Questions
	Example 1:


	Single Answer
Vertical Position
	Scale Questions
	Example 2:


	Single Answer
Horizontal Position
	Multiple Answer Questions
	Example 3:


	Multiple Answer
Two Column Position
	To create a multiple choice question type, you will begin by navigating to the Survey Editor tab. From there, click on Add new question and select multiple choice.


1. Click on the default question text Click to write the question text.
2. Type the question text.
3. Click on the first answer choice Click to write Choice 1 to edit.
4. Type the first answer choice, repeat for each answer choice.
Formatting a Multiple Choice Question: 
1. Manual Input: As you saw above, you can manually type the answer choices one by one.
2. Automatic Choices: Deciding which answer choices to use can be time-consuming. With Automatic Choices, you can choose from pre-written best practice scales (e.g. agreement scales) or lists (e.g. age ranges, ethnicity, or income ranges).
   1. In the Question, Editing-Pane, toggle the button to Use suggested choices.
   2. Click the drop-down.
   3. Select the scale or list you need.
   4. Specify the number of points for the question.


3. Edit Multiple: If you completed the survey design in a document outside of Qualtrics, you can copy and paste answer choices into Qualtrics.
   1. In the Question Editing-Pane, Click on Edit Multiple.
   2. A box will open containing the default choices, delete these.
   3. Paste the answer choices into this box (one choice per line).


Here are some best practices to remember when using the Qualtrics Multiple Choice question type:
1. When using a Single Answer format, include “select one” in your question-wording.
2. When using a Multiple Answer format, include “select all that apply" in your question-wording.
3. When presenting respondents with lists, ensure the list is randomized.
4. When using a scale question, ensure your scale has a neutral midpoint and equal polar points for positive and negative responses.
5. When using a scale question, choose between 5 and 7 point scales.
   1. 5 point scales: are easier for respondents to answer and as a result produce fewer data errors; analysis is less granular but simpler for you to do. Lastly, the required sample for representative data is smaller than with a longer scale.
Text Entry Question Type
This question type collects text-based answers and consists of the following structure:
1. Question-Wording: the text you use to ask a question
2. Text type field: the area where the respondent types their answer.


Text Entry questions can collect the following data:
* Detailed text-based answers
* Phone numbers
* Email address
* Names
How To Create a Text Entry Question: 
1. Click Add new question and select Text Entry.
2. Input the question wording by clicking on Click to write the question text.


Choosing the correct text Entry field size: 
Based on the question requirements, you need to specify how large the text entry box should be, or how many to display. Which should you choose?
Single Line: By default, you will see a Single Line text entry box. Select Single Line for short inputs such as name, email, or age.
Multiple Lines: Select this option when you want to give the respondent more room to answer a question such as when you ask them to explain their satisfaction rating.
Essay Text Box: Select Essay Text Box when you want the respondent to provide long-form responses such as a detailed description of something or feedback.


To preview how the respondent will see a question: 
1. Click on the question you want to preview.
2. Select the 3 dots to the right of the question and click Preview question.


Best Practice for Using Text Entry Questions: 
Use a maximum of two text entry questions per survey. Too many text entry questions increase the effort for respondents to answer the survey, increase respondent drop-out rates, and increase the effort and time you spend analyzing results.
Be specific with question-wording. The wording you use directly impacts the content a respondent will give you. Use the table below for examples of wording and the expected outcome.
Example question-wording
	Good or Bad practice
	Reasoning
	Any feedback? 
	Bad
	This wording is too broad and does not prompt the respondent to reflect on the specific experience.
This wording often results in large numbers of responses simply saying “no” which is not meant for analysis.
	Please provide feedback on the product package color scheme? 
	Good
	This wording is directly asking for feedback on a specific area that you are investigating in the survey.
	Please provide feedback on the agent you spoke with when you recently called our support team? 
	Good
	This wording prompts the respondent to reflect on the exact experience provided by the business. You have provided enough information for them to narrow down their thinking.
	Any feedback for our teams and products? 
	Bad
	This is a double-barreled question. Decide if you want to ask about ‘teams’ or ‘products’. You won't be able to separate these in your data without a lot of effort.
	Please tell us why you gave that score? 
	Good
	The sentiment in this question is neutral. You will collect data that will be a mix of positive and negative feedback, giving you a better perspective on strengths and weaknesses in your business. To further enhance this question, use piped text to show the score given.
	Please tell us how we can improve? 
	Bad
	With this wording, you are specifically asking for respondents to point out your weaknesses. The data will contain only negative perspectives and sentiments.
If this is your objective then the wording is fine. But, in most cases, businesses need contrasting positive and negative responses to analyze the overall sentiment.
If you want data about your strengths and weaknesses you should ask the question in a more neutral way, such as "Please tell us why you gave that score".
	Matrix Table Question Type
A Matrix Table enables you to present questions in a grid format. This question type consists of:
1. Question-Wording
2. Scale Points
3. Statements


This question type has some specific advantages and disadvantages to be aware of:
* Pros: It can group or condense multiple items together on the same scale. It is quick to build and has a logical structure.
* Cons: An increased risk of respondents answering incorrectly. It can be difficult for respondents to follow which statement they are answering, especially for long lists of statements.
Best Practice for Grid Questions: 
When you have determined that a Matrix Table is the correct choice, use the below best practices:
1. Use five-point scales whenever possible. These balance depth of analysis for meaningful reporting with simplicity for respondents to answer.
2. Randomize the order of the statements.
3. Limit the number of statements to about five statements per matrix table to help respondents avoid mistakes.
4. Ensure Mobile Friendly is selected in the Question Editing-Pane. This will automatically convert the question to an easier to view format for smaller screens.


	Tip
	You can choose to display your answers in Carousel View. This feature is recommended if your respondents will be taking the survey on a mobile device.


	Text / Graphic Question Type
This question type is designed to display images or text to a respondent.
Some examples of when to use this question type are: 
* To show respondents an image of a potential new product to review before asking them questions about the product.
* To display survey instructions at the top of your survey.
* To add section headings throughout your survey.


Organizing and Managing Questions
In this section, you will learn the tools and actions available to organize and manage a professional survey.
In this article: 
* Defining Blocks
* Adding Blocks to a Survey
* Defining Randomization
* Randomizing Answer Choices
* Randomizing Questions
* Using Advanced Randomization
Defining Blocks
It is useful to group questions into Blocks to facilitate the order and structure of your survey, as well as enabling more efficient management of survey logic (see next section). This section defines Blocks and illustrates how to use them.
Every survey starts with one Block, the Default Question Block.




	Dictionary
	Blocks are defined as a mechanism for organizing and grouping questions. They are useful for customizing the survey experience for a respondent, for example randomizing a group of questions.
	The number of Blocks needed in your survey depends on its complexity. Generally speaking, the more complex the survey, the more Blocks should be used. Simple surveys need fewer Blocks.
Below is an example of a simple survey. It contains three Blocks that have been collapsed for easier viewing. Each Block contains a number of questions. The first Block is the "Intro Block" which is the first group of questions a respondent will see, then the Second Block contains three (3) "Deep Dive" questions, and the last group of questions is the "Profile Block" demographic style questions.


Why should You Use Blocks?
Blocks allow you to manage groups of questions more easily.
For example, when you need to present a number of questions in a randomized order to respondents, you can place them in the same Block, and randomize them all at once. See the example below.




	Tip
	You can identify if questions in a Block are randomized by looking for the "Randomized" icon at the top of the Block (as in the above screenshot).
	Adding Blocks to a Survey
By default, a survey has one Block when it is newly created.
1. To create a new Block, click Add Block (below the default block).
2. To name the Block, click the text in the upper-left corner and enter a new name (this is optional, however, it is good practice for organization purposes).
3. There are three ways to add questions to a Block:
a. Click Add new question.
b. Click Import from library.
c. Move questions from elsewhere in the survey into the Block using the drag and drop functionality, or by selecting Move question from the action drop-down menu.




	Note
	A Page Break is added between Blocks (Page Breaks are covered in the next section).
	As you can see, Blocks are useful tools for organizing and managing your survey questions. Next, you will learn about another useful tool to manage your questions, which is Randomization.
Defining Randomization
Randomization is an important tool to improve data quality in a survey. It reduces response biases as a result of the order in which answer choices, questions, and other content are shown. There are three levels that you can randomize survey elements:
* Randomizing answer choices in a question.
* Randomizing questions within a Block.
* Randomizing multiple Blocks.
In this section, the focus is on randomizing answer choices and randomizing questions.


	Note
	You will learn about randomizing Blocks in the CoreXM Expert Certification.
	Randomizing Answer Choices
It is best practice to randomize your answer choices in a question.
To add answer choice randomization:
* Click the Choice randomization option from the configuration panel.


There are five types of randomization that you can use for choices.
1. No Randomization: choices are not randomized, this is the default setting.
2. Display answers in random order: this will randomize all the answer choices in the question.
3. Present only a subset of total choices: use this option to display a random subset of your answer choices.
4. Randomly flip the order of choices: this will randomly reverse the order of presented choices.
5. Advanced Randomization : This allows you to be more specific about the randomization behavior of your answer choices. For example, to display None of the above consistently at the bottom of a list of answer choices while the rest of the answer choices are randomized.


Randomizing Questions
When you present several related questions one after another, it is good practice to randomize them. For example, when rating satisfaction on Service, Products, and Pricing, you should randomize these questions.
To use question randomization:
1. Add a Block to the survey.
2. Move the questions you want to randomize into that Block.
3. Within the Block behavior section of the configuration panel, select Question randomization.


There are four types of randomization that you can use for questions in a Block.
1. No Randomization: no questions will be randomized.
2. Randomize the order of all questions: this will randomize every question in the block.
3. Present only a subset of total questions: use this option to display a random subset of questions to the respondent.
4. Advanced Randomization: This allows you to be more specific in creating the randomization behavior you need for the questions. For example, you can specify that a particular question is always displayed last.




	Note
	It is generally not good practice to randomize all questions in a survey. You should only randomize questions that are similar or grouped together to eliminate bias. For example—when asking about the features of a product (size, texture, and price), randomize these questions to the respondent.
	Using Advanced Randomization
In cases where you need more specific randomization rules, you can use Advanced Randomization. For example, to keep none of the above at the bottom of a list of randomized answer choices.




	Note
	Advanced Randomization can be used to randomize both answer choices and questions.
	To add both Answer Choice Randomization and Question Randomization, you can select the Set Up Advanced Randomization option.


Under Advanced Randomization, there are five regions, each with a different function. These regions function the same for answer choice and question randomization.


See the screenshot above of the Advanced Randomization window. For each numbered region in the image, there is a description of the regions and functions:
1. Fixed display order: 
   1. By default, all choices or questions start in this region.
   2. Options in this region will appear exactly in the order they are listed.
2. Randomize choices: 
   1. Choices or questions in this region will appear in a random order to each respondent.
   2. To move items into this region, use the arrows to move them from the other regions.
3. Random subset: 
   1. This region is used to specify that a subset of the answer choices or questions is shown to a respondent. For example, to randomly show 3 out of 5 choices.
   2. You need to specify the subset number.
   3. To move items into this region, use the arrows to move them from the other regions.
4. Randomly reverse choices 
   1. Choices in this category will be randomly displayed in either their original order or in reverse order.
   2. To have your answer choices consistently reversed across all questions, enable the Consistently reverse the choice order for all questions with this randomization option selected setting.
5. Excluded items: 
   1. Choices or questions in this region will not be displayed to any respondent.
   2. To move items into this region, use the arrows to move them from the other regions.
   3. Use this region to hide old choices or questions, rather than deleting them from your survey (covered in detail in the Previewing and Publishing section).
Here are two examples:
Answer Choice Randomization Example: 
The below setup uses a combination of Fixed display order and Randomized choices. All answer choices, except for “None of the above", are in the Randomize Choices region. "None of the above" remains in the Fixed Display Order region so that it always displays last.


Question Randomization Example: 
In the below screenshot, four questions in the Block are being randomized. The Text/Graphic question will always appear first because it is in the Fixed Display Region. The three scale questions in the Randomize Questions region will be displayed in a random order to respondents.


Optimizing the Survey Project
Optimizing Survey Questions with Actions and Logic
In this section, you will learn important functions to improve the survey building experience as well as the survey-taking experience.
In this article: 
* Page Breaks
* Copy Questions
* Display Logic
* Skip Logic
* Should I use Display Logic or Skip Logic?
Page Breaks
Page Breaks play an important role in enhancing the survey-taking experience for the respondent and enable you to more easily control what is displayed and when.
They reduce the number of questions displayed on the screen simultaneously, and therefore improve the focus a respondent will have on the question. Any questions below a Page Break will appear on another page after the respondent clicks "next" while taking the survey.




	Tip
	It is best to show one question per page where possible, so that the respondent only has one question to focus on at a time. 
	Duplicating Questions
To save time you can leverage the setup already completed in other questions. For example, when you have set up the scale for one question and need to use the same scale in other questions.
In the below example, Q6 is a copy of Q5 with a minor wording change to add “Cake” to Q6 instead of "Ice Cream".


How to Duplicate a Question: 
1. Click on the question you want to copy.
2. Using the Question menu (3 dots) on the right corner of the question, select Duplicate.
3. A duplicate of your question will appear below the original.
4. Customize the new question as needed.


Display Logic
Display Logic is a very useful functionality that can be applied to dynamically show or hide questions in a survey based on conditions.
Some questions are only applicable to specific respondents. The Display Logic function helps you control which respondents see a question. This helps keep your survey relevant for the respondent and reduces the risk they will drop out.
For example, in a customer feedback survey, a question used to collect contact information is only displayed to respondents who said that they wanted a follow-up call from your business.
How to add Display Logic with a single logic condition: 
1. Click on a question that should be dynamically displayed.
2. In the Configuration panel, under Question behavior, click Display Logic.
   1. 3. In the Display Logic editor, add the conditions for a respondent to see the follow-up question.


In the example above, the Display Logic is set to show Q16 only to respondents who selected 'yes' to being contacted in Q15. When you preview a survey with Display Logic you will see the question hidden from respondents who answered ‘no’ in Q15.
Using Display Logic with multiple logic conditions 
You can also use multiple conditions in Display Logic to capture a more complete audience. For example, those who are Somewhat Dissatisfied as well as those who are Extremely Dissatisfied in a follow-up question.
How to use multiple conditions in Display Logic: 
1. Click on a question that should be dynamically displayed (e.g. Q8 in the screenshot below).
2. In the Configuration panel, under Question behavior, click Display Logic.


3. In the Display Logic window, start with the first condition that a respondent should meet.
4. To add another condition, click the green plus (+) symbol.


5. Next, you need to correctly choose between the “And” / “Or” operators on the left-hand side.


	Note
	By default “And” is selected, but this is not always the correct option.
	   1. In this example, you need to select “Or".


6. Add the conditions to include respondents who answered “Extremely Dissatisfied” in Q8.


7. Click Save.
Choosing between “And” and “Or” logic operators in Display Logic 
When using logic in your surveys, it is very important to understand the difference between “And'' and “Or” operators in writing your logic conditions. Choosing the wrong operator can have significant impacts on your data.
The correct selection depends on your desired outcome. Consider the below two questions:


“And” operators instruct the survey to check that the respondent meets all of the criteria. For example, below when you want to ask a follow-up question to people who like both the color blue as well as yellow.


In the above example, if a respondent says they like Blue and Green in Q1, then they will not see Q2 because the logic requires the respondent to select both Blue and Yellow together.
If the respondent selects Blue, Yellow, and Green, the logic will work because they met the condition of selecting Blue and Yellow in Q1.
Understanding “Or'' operators:
These operators instruct the survey to check that the respondent meets one or the other condition. For example, see below, when you want to ask a follow-up question to people who like Blue OR Yellow as colors.


If a respondent selects Blue and Green, then Q2 will be displayed to them. This is because any combination will be accepted, as long as it has Blue or Yellow as part of it.
Setting which page to display the question on 
By default, when you add Display Logic, a Page Break is also added before any Display Logic question (it will appear on the next page). This is so that the display logic conditions are evaluated immediately before the respondent reaches the question.
You can also set the Display Logic to be evaluated without a Page Break so that it appears on the same page. You do this by clicking In Page in the bottom-left of the Display Logic window.


Skip Logic
Skip Logic controls where a respondent will be sent to in a survey based on how they answered a previous question.
When to use Skip Logic 
Skip Logic is used to move respondents to a future point of a survey based on their response to a question. For example, if a respondent answers “No - I do not consent” on a consent question presented to them early in the survey, you can skip them to end of their survey.


Another example may be in a product testing scenario, where the previous usage of the product is important. If respondents have not used the product before, you can easily move them to the end of the survey.


How to add a Skip Logic Condition: 
1. Click on the question that will govern the respondent’s movements.
2. In the Configuration panel, under Question behavior, click Skip logic.


3. In the Skip Logic window, select the condition for the trigger.


4. Specify where the respondents will be skipped. You can skip to any of the below:
   1. Subsequent questions within a block.
   2. The end of the current block.
   3. The end of the survey.
5. When configured, click Confirm.
After adding Skip Logic to a question, you can edit the Skip Logic by clicking on the Question menu (3 dots) on the right-hand side, then selecting Edit conditions.
From this menu, you can also remove the Skip Logic by clicking on Remove.




	Note
	Skip Logic will always add a page break after the question. This is to allow the survey to evaluate the instructions set out in the Skip Logic for a respondent. When the respondent clicks next, they will be moved to the correct point in the survey.
	Should I use Skip or Display Logic?
Skip Logic and Display Logic solve different problems and should not be confused with each other. Skip Logic exists to move respondents forward through a survey, while Display Logic exists to dynamically show or hide content to respondents.
Use Display Logic to show specific questions to a specific respondent. For Example:
* When you want to show a follow-up question to a respondent who said they need to be contacted about their issue.
* To display a contact details form to respondents who selected they would like to opt in to a mailing list or panel for future research.
* To display an image of potential product packaging to respondents that are in a certain age range.
Use Skip Logic to move people ahead in the survey. For Example:
* End the survey if respondents are too young to complete the survey.
* Move a respondent to the end of a block if the questions in the block are not relevant to them.
* End the survey if they do not consent to the T&C’s of your survey (if you have any).


	Note
	The difference between Display Logic and Skip Logic is important. Display Logic allows you to show or hide questions to respondents, while Skip Logic allows you to move respondents forward in a survey
	Adding Operational Data to Your Survey
At the beginning of this certification, you learned about the importance of combining Experience data and Operational data to contextualize and enrich your survey data.
In this section, you will learn how to connect Operational data (O-data) to your survey.
In this article: 
* Introducing the Survey flow
* Mapping O-data
* Naming Conventions for O-data
Introducing the Survey flow
The Survey Flow is a workspace for you to view and map your survey at a high level. It also stores the instructions to pull in external data, such as Operational-Data (see Module 1 for a deep dive into O-Data).
The Survey Flow is extremely powerful with the ability to set advanced logic pathways for respondents, create variables, do mathematical equations, call APIs, and much more.
This section will focus exclusively on importing O-Data into your survey through the Survey Flow. To learn about the advanced features of Survey Flow you can commence any of the Expert Level Certifications.
To access the Survey flow: 
1. Navigate to the Survey builder
2. Click the Survey Flow icon.


When you first access the Survey Flow, it will consist only of the Blocks in your survey. From this point, you need to configure the Survey Flow instructions.
In the below example there are three Blocks in the survey:
* Overall Pride Block
* Employee Deep Dive Block
* Profile Block


Mapping O-Data
There are a few steps involved when using Operational Data in a survey project. First, you need to identify what Operational Data you have available in your organization for respondents, e.g. their gender, state, loyalty status, tenure, customer ID, etc. Then once identified, add this data to a Contact List (covered in the Distributions Module of this certification).
In the Survey Flow, you then need to map the O-Data fields you will be using from the Contact List.
In Qualtrics, Operational Data is mapped as Embedded Data in the Survey Flow. Embedded Data is a powerful tool and can be used to map external data, do mathematical operations, as well as create derived variables (this will be covered in the Expert Certifications). In this certification, we focus on using Embedded Data to map Operational Data for use in reporting.
Mapping Embedded Data in your Survey Flow:
1. In the Survey builder, click on Survey Flow.
2. Click Add a New Element Here.
3. Select Embedded Data Element.
4. Name the element by creating a New Field (see next section for recommendations on the naming convention).
5. To add O-Data to your survey from the contact list, you do not need to add a Field Value, because the value will be pulled from the contact list. Therefore, leave Set a Value Now as it appears in the platform.
6. Important: Move the element to the top of the Survey flow.


	Tip
	Use the up / down arrow keys on your keyboard to move Survey flow Elements easily.
	   1. To add additional Operational-Data fields, click Add a New Field in the same Embedded data area (green) and repeat the above process. You can add as many fields as you need this way.


It is important to ensure that imported Embedded Data Elements are moved to the top of the Survey Flow. This ensures that when a respondent is completing the survey, they become the first set of tasks for the Survey Flow, and ensures that the survey is instructed to import the O-Data before question tasks are assessed. This has two main benefits:
1. This makes the data available to be used in the Survey Questions if needed,
2. It ensures this is the first set of data to be recorded for a respondent when they start a survey so you can guarantee its availability for Reporting.


Save the Survey Flow by clicking Apply.
Naming Conventions for O-Data
When using Embedded Data Elements to import O-Data it is very important to adhere to strict naming conventions. The name selected for a particular field should match the way it is named in your Qualtrics Contact List (this will be addressed in the Distributing a Survey Project section) and business data storage systems. The syntax for these elements is case-sensitive in Qualtrics, so it is important to match capitalization and any spaces or symbols used.
Here are two examples:
* When you want to import the country in which an employee works, and the data is stored as “Employee_Country” in your business database, you should name the Embedded Data element exactly “Employee_Country” in Qualtrics.
* When you are importing gender for customers, if your Contact List says "Gender", but you added "gender" to the Survey Flow, the data will not be successfully pulled into the survey data file.
Once the survey starts to collect data from respondents, the Operational Data (Embedded Data) will be populated and stored in your survey’s data file in the Data & Analysis tab, ready for analysis and reporting.
Survey Experience Settings
Once your survey is built, it's time to set the settings that govern its access and messages. In Survey Options, you can control project settings for Survey Experience, Protection, Termination, Inactivity, and Partial Completion.
In this article: 
* Survey Experience Settings
* Survey Protection Settings
* Survey Termination Settings
* Incomplete Survey Responses Setting
There are a number of Survey Experience Settings to be aware of. Depending on your use case, you may find you wish to customize each option that we will cover below. To access these settings, click Survey options > Responses.


Survey Experience Settings
Adding a Back button allows respondents to navigate back between pages in your survey. By default, it is not enabled so select this option only if going back is crucial to your survey. In most cases, it remains disabled to encourage respondents to move forward in a survey to completion.
Allow respondents to finish later saves a respondent's survey progress in the browser until they finish the survey. This setting is enabled by default. It is considered best practice to keep this setting enabled.


Survey Protection Settings
Survey availability allows you to set an expiration date for the survey. If you choose When this date elapses, no new survey sessions can start collecting data.
For ongoing tracking programs, no expiration date is necessary, but for ad hoc projects it is common to set expiration between 2 and 4 weeks to allow enough time for respondents to access and complete the survey before you start reporting the data.
To add an expiration date:
1. Select Set specific start and expiration date.
2. Click Edit survey availability to edit the date range.




	Note
	The time zone displayed will be the time zone set for your account in Account Settings.
	Survey Termination Settings
Default End of Survey Message: when a respondent finishes a survey, a thank you message generated by Qualtrics will be displayed in the browser to the respondent.
Custom End of Survey Message: You can select this setting to display an end of survey message that you create. This allows you to use your own wording and branding for the message. It is considered good practice to use this setting.
To add a Custom end of Survey Message: 
1. Click into the End of Survey block at the bottom of your survey.
2. Click the End of survey message drop-down and select Custom.
3. Select a message from the list, or create a New Message.


Anonymize response: In cases where you are collecting highly sensitive information, you can enable this setting. It will erase all identifying information from the data before it is recorded so that during analysis you do not know who completed which survey response. A common use case for this setting is when doing Human Resources surveys. Note that when enabled, you cannot undo the setting to add the contact association back into the data file.
Incomplete Survey Responses
Sometimes respondents start a survey and do not finish it themselves, this is called an incomplete survey response. This setting allows the survey session to end at a specified point in time, even if the responses are incomplete, to ensure that you have access to the data in a timely manner.
Recording incomplete responses is useful because respondents will often complete 70 to 90% of the survey, or forget to click ‘Submit’ at the end of a survey. These responses are still valuable and will contain insights that your business needs.
The default setting is to Record response data after one week from the last time the respondent edited a response in the survey. 
For example:
* You distribute your survey on Monday, a respondent starts the survey on Wednesday, they get distracted and forget about the survey until Thursday.
* On Thursday they answer some additional questions, but still do not finish. The data for this survey will be recorded next Thursday — one week after the last activity.


You can also choose for responses to be deleted after a period of time. It is important to note that this will permanently erase any incomplete survey sessions and they cannot be retrieved or viewed. Only select this setting if you are confident that you will never reference incompleted responses.
Styling and Publishing the Survey
Applying Professional Survey Styling
Your survey is an extension of your brand. It’s important that the aesthetics of your survey are aligned to your brand and produce a good experience for the respondent.
In this section, you will learn about the most impactful changes you can make.
In this article: 
* Rich Content Editor
* Survey Themes
* Survey Layout
* General Survey Formatting
* Font Styling and Survey Coloring
* Survey Movement
* Background View
Rich Content Editor
The Rich Content Editor enables you to add detailed formatting to question text and provides common style formatting options. For example, the toolbar lets you format fonts, font sizes, color, insert images, hyperlink text, and alignment for a question.
To use the Rich Content Editor for question text:
1. Click into a question’s text.
2. Select Rich Content Editor.


Some common styling options you can use include:
1. Insert images
2. Format font
3. Set text color
4. Change text alignment
5. Add Bullet-points
6. Hyperlink


Survey Themes
Survey themes govern the overall aesthetics of the whole survey. To access your themes, click Look & Feel from the configuration panel.


Any pre-built themes or default themes will be listed here. You can see a preview of the desktop and mobile appearance of the selected theme and customize them here.
To customize a theme, select it from the list.


Survey Layout
The Layout tab adjusts the overall presentation of the buttons and answer boxes for questions. You can select from Flat, Modern, and Classic.
As you click on each one, the survey preview will change to show your survey.
All three of these options have been designed with the respondent's experience in mind. Select the option most aligned with your brand and styling preferences.


General Survey Formatting
You can customize the next and previous buttons, add a progress bar, or set the questions per page.
* Next and Previous Button Text: By default these are arrows, but you can change them to text such as: “Next”.
* Progress Bar: Add or remove a Progress Bar. Progress bars can give a respondent a feeling of how long the survey is and their progress through it. Note that for longer surveys, Progress bars can discourage respondents from completing the survey.
* Questions Per Page: Set how many questions should appear on each page. To reduce the burden on a respondent, Qualtrics recommends setting this to one question per page. 


Font Styling and Survey Coloring
Within the Style section of the Look and feel menu, you can set the color of answer buttons, progress bars, and selection highlights. These are set to a default value depending on the theme you select. However, you can change them to suit your brand or the project requirements.
* The Primary Color: sets the color of attributes like the Progress Bar and Selection Highlights.
* The Secondary Color: sets the color of attributes like the answer choices, next, and back buttons.


	Note
	Depending on the layout selected, the primary and secondary colors will alter different items.
	* The Font: Sets the font of all questions, answers, and message text.
* The Question Text: Sets the font size or bolding of the question text.
* The Answer Text: Selects the font size and bolding of the answer text.


Survey Motion
You can enable visual movements in the survey and also reduce the amount of scrolling and clicking that a respondent needs to perform. Reducing scrolling and clicking can improve your completion rates.
* Page Transition: As a respondent moves page to page, you can set a dynamic experience by using Transitions. Select from Slide, Fade, or a Flip motion. By default ‘none is selected.
* Auto-advance on Questions: By default, respondents need to scroll to see the text questions in a survey. This setting eliminates this. When selected, a respondent is automatically moved to the next question after they answer a question.
* Auto-advance on Pages: By default, respondents need to click the Next button each time they reach the bottom of a page in the survey. Enabling this setting allows the respondent to progress to the next page after selecting an answer without the extra step of clicking the next button.
The behavior of Autoadvance is automatically altered based on the question type. For example, when using Text Entry, the respondent is not moved so that they have time to provide a detailed response.


	Note
	Using Autoadvance on Questions and Pages in longer surveys is considered best practice because it helps to increase your completion rate by moving respondents forward in the survey automatically.
It is also often used in shorter surveys to give the respondent a smooth experience.
	

Logo
Use the Logo section to add an image to the top of every page of your survey. This can be your logo, alternative image, or left blank.


	Tip
	For research where your respondents should take a neutral perspective like Brand Trackers, the best practice is to avoid including your brand logo to ensure respondents are not biased.
	

Background View
Here you can choose your survey’s background. You can choose a color or an image. Generally, a solid white background is considered best practice. An image can be used, but these need to be very carefully selected so as not to distract respondents.
* Color: To use a solid color, change the background type to Color, then select the color swatch or insert a Hex code.
* Photo: To use an image as your background, change your Background Type to Photo, then click Change Image. The image you choose will adjust to the survey viewer’s screen size, so choose a high-resolution image. If using this option, it is best practice to use a neutral image that is not too busy.


Previewing and Publishing Your Survey
Once the survey is nearly ready for distribution, it is important to preview and test the survey thoroughly.
In this article: 
* Preview Survey
* Generate Test Responses
* Publish Survey
* Editing a Published Survey
Preview Survey
Once you are close to finalizing your survey, you should always preview it. Previewing helps you confirm the survey look and feel, question layout, and logic accuracy. It is an important step to do before sending any survey to respondents.


	Tip
	It is best practice to Preview throughout the building process to check your actions behave as expected. This reduces the effort to preview before sending it.
	

To Preview your survey: 
1. At the top of the Projects page, click Preview.
2. A browser tab will open showing you a desktop and mobile view of your survey.
3. Answer the questions as if you are the respondent.
4. Be sure that you test all possible pathways.


Testing options in Preview mode: 
1. Restart Survey jumps back to the beginning of your preview.
2. Place Bookmark tags any page you are currently on, letting you skip previously tested questions. This helps when you have lots of different pathways to test.
3. Ignore Validation allows you to bypass questions with answer validation, like any character limits in Text Entry questions, or Email format validation.
4. The Mobile view on option allows you to preview how the survey will look on a mobile device. 
5. Use the Scan QR code option to preview the survey on a personal device.


To Preview directly on a personal or specific mobile device:
1. Click Scan QR Code.
2. Scan the code with your device.
3. Complete the survey on the device.


There are two ways to get feedback and help from others who Preview your survey:
* You can send them the URL from the Preview Survey page. They don’t need a Qualtrics account to use the link. 


* You can send them the QR code to test on their mobile devices. 


Generate Test Responses
Generating test responses is useful to become familiar with how the raw data is formatted and check for errors in your survey. There are a few ways to do this:
1. Preview Survey: When you Preview the survey, a test response is recorded in the Data and Analysis tab for you to see how the raw data is formatted. You can later delete these responses (see Data and Analysis Module).
2. Generate Test responses: To randomly generate a lot of “dummy” test responses without retaking your survey multiple times:
   1. Click the Tools dropdown.
   2. Click Generate Test Responses.
   3. Select the number of test responses.
   4. Click Start Test. 


	Tip
	You can view the data generated in the Data & Analysis tab.
	



Publish Survey
Once your survey is ready for distribution to respondents, you need to Publish the survey. This activates the project and allows you to send links to respondents.


When you first publish your survey, Qualtrics provides the anonymous link to your survey. Click Copy link to copy the link and paste it where you would like. 


Whenever you republish your survey, Qualtrics also provides the anonymous link. On these occasions, the link will be in the same modal as the Expert Review recommendations.


Editing a Published Survey
Once a survey is published you can still make changes, but there are two types of changes:
* Changes with a significant impact on your collected data.
* Changes with little or no impact on your collected data.
Changes with a significant impact on your data: 
When the survey has collected responses in the Data & Analysis tab, you should consider editing your survey carefully. Certain edits to the survey can affect previously collected data.
Below are five main survey edits to approach with care, and the best practice method of handling the change.
Change
	Impact
	What to do instead
	Changing the Question Type
	The raw data formats for different question types are fundamentally different.
By changing the question type you can alter the data structure in the data file, and receive data that is difficult to analyze.
	If you no longer need the data for that question, move unwanted questions to Trash.
If you do need the data, hide the unwanted question in the Block using Advanced Randomization functionality in the Excluded items region. Then add a new question with the appropriate question type.
	Deleting answer choices from a question
	Sometimes you may need to remove an answer choice from your survey (e.g. if no longer relevant).
Often the data is still needed for reporting historical data. If you delete an answer choice in the survey editor you will not be able to use it for historical reporting or see the choice in the raw data.
	Instead of deleting answer choices, it is best practice to use the Advanced Randomization functionality to Hide unwanted choices rather than deleting them (see Organizing and Managing Questions).
Doing so ensures that any responses already collected for that answer choice will still be accessible for analysis.
	Editing answer choices in a question
	Sometimes as your project evolves you may need to replace answer choices. e.g. if one choice is no longer relevant, but you need to add a new one in its place.
Often you will find the historical data for the old choice is still important. By replacing it with the new choice you will corrupt the data and mix the old data with the new.
	It is best practice to use the Advanced Randomization functionality for the question to Hide unwanted choice(s) rather than editing it. (see section 5)
Once you have hidden the old choice, add the new one to the bottom of the list of existing choices. 
	Deleting Questions
	Overtime you may need to remove a question from your survey.
If you no longer need the data for this question you can move it to the Trash.
The data for this question will not be available in the Data and Analysis or Reporting tabs.
	If you still need to report on this data, it is better to Hide the question using Advanced Randomization for the Block.


	Tip
	You can move the question from the Trash back into the survey, and the data will be available again (providing you did not clear the Trash).
	

	Editing Display Logic and Skip Logic
	Logic is designed to customize a respondent's questions and survey pathways.
Adding, removing, or editing Display or Skip logic will alter what respondents experience, and therefore what data is recorded for them.
	When making changes to logic, always preview and test this change carefully before Publishing the change (See section 6).
	

	Tip
	Before making one of the above changes, reference this detailed platform guide.
	Changes with little or no impact on your collected data: 
There are many edits you can make to improve or manage your survey over time that have little to no impact on your data.
These are changes that will not impact your data in a negative way:
* Adding new questions to the survey.
* Changing the question wording (e.g., fixing a typo, re-phrasing a question, or changing the font).
* Adding new answer choices to the end of a list of choices (you should always add these to the end of the list).
* Rearranging the order of questions or blocks.
* Edits to the Look and Feel.
* Adding new O-data or Embedded Data from the contact list to the Survey Flow.
* Re-labelling Block names or Question numbers.
Making changes to a survey: 
Once you thoroughly understand which changes you're making and how you'll do it, you're ready to make the change.
To make a change to a survey:
1. Edit the survey as required (reference the above).
2. Preview your changes to check the changes behave as expected.
3. Click Publish again.


	Note
	It's important to click Publish, otherwise, the changes will not be made available to respondents.


	Lesson 4
Introduction to the Distribution Tab
In this article: 
* Summary of the Distributions tab
* Distribution Options
Summary of the Distributions Tab
After building your survey in the Survey Builder, you are ready to set up and manage survey distributions to potential respondents. 




	Note
	you will see the Actions tab appears after the Survey editor tab. The functionality of the Actions tab is covered in the Expert Level Certifications.
	When you access the Distributions tab, there are two possible interface experiences.
Unpublished Survey: 
If you have not yet Published your survey in the Survey builder, then you will be shown a summary of Distribution options. Scroll through them, once you select one, the survey will be published automatically. 


Published Survey: 
If you published your survey in the Survey Builder you will be shown the Distribution Summary. When you enter the Distributions tab, you will notice the distribution summary is blank before any distributions have been sent.


Once you start collecting responses, the Distribution Summary will show the number of responses you have received over time via different channels (covered later in this module).


Distribution Methods 
When you access the Distributions tab, you are presented with a choice of different methods you can use to send your survey, including:
* Anonymous Link
* Emails
* Personal Links
* SMS
* Social Media
* Offline App
* QR Code
Below is a summary of each distribution method and its key functionalities.
Anonymous link
The most basic way to distribute a survey is by using the Anonymous Link. This is a URL that is produced with the intention that you share the same survey URL with all respondents.
When you use the Anonymous Link, you will see a survey URL that you can share with your participants through several channels depending on your project needs (e.g. embedded into text on your website, or copied into an email to a group of people in your organization's registry).
This distribution method is designed to be quick and simple, therefore it does not connect to contact lists containing personal information about your respondents (ie. O-Data and Embedded Data). Because of this, the link will capture the data related to the questions in the survey only. If you need to capture personal information, it is necessary to include this as questions in the survey.


Email Invites
In the Emails section, you can craft the email that will be sent to contacts inviting them to participate in the survey. This is the most commonly used distribution method.
Use this option if you send your survey to a specific list of contacts and understand who provided each response. This option will capture the personal information of respondents (unlike the anonymous link).
A survey invite is sent in the form of an email from the Qualtrics platform to a Contact List imported into Qualtrics (addressed later in this module). By default, each person in the contact list will receive a unique survey URL that is specific to them. This allows you to capture and leverage personal data (e.g. O-Data) from the contact list and track which contacts have responded and send respective contacts reminders or thank you emails.
In the next section, you will learn how to set up an email invite.


Personal Links
A Personal link is a unique link generated for each person in a contact list, so that you can leverage their personal information in the contact list (e.g. O-Data and other Embedded Data). The key difference with this method is the URLs are produced in a .csv list to enable you to send them from an alternative platform. You can then export this list.
For example, use personal links when you have a specific list of respondents to send your survey to and want to use your email system or another third party.


SMS
Survey invites can be sent via SMS. You can invite people to take your survey via SMS in two ways:
1. 2-Way SMS: this sends the survey questions one by one as an SMS text to respondents and requires them to respond to each question, one at a time. The SMS is sent to phone numbers imported into a Contact List. This is a good distribution method to increase response rates.
2. Survey Invite URL: this sends a unique URL or Anonymous URL to a mobile number that is in an imported Contact List. When the SMS recipient clicks on the link, they will be taken to the survey in their smartphone browser. This is also a good distribution method to increase response rates among people with smartphones.
Social Media
You can distribute your survey via social media, for example to source feedback and ideas from your social community. This functionality creates a post that your contacts and followers on the respective platform will see and can access an Anonymous Link to respond to your survey.
You can create a post with a link directly in Qualtrics to Twitter, Facebook, Reddit, LinkedIn, and Pinterest.


Offline App
Sometimes survey projects require responses to be collected on remote devices such as tablets. For example, door-to-door data collection, in-field research, event feedback, in-store feedback/sign-up forms, or in areas of unreliable internet access.
The Offline app enables you to download the survey to a tablet and it will collect data for that survey independent of internet access. The data can then be uploaded to Qualtrics once you have completed the data collection.


QR Code
Use a QR Code to provide access to your survey in printed materials and other image-based collateral. When a respondent scans the code, they will access an Anonymous Link for your survey.


Distributing Anonymously
In this article:
* Defining an Anonymous Link
* When to use the Anonymous Link
* Using the Anonymous Link
* Posting the Anonymous Link to Social Media
* Accessing the Anonymous Link with QR Codes
Defining an Anonymous Link
The Qualtrics definition of an Anonymous Link is a survey URL that you use when you do not need to link to a contact list. Using this distribution method means that there is one link that is the same for all participants. By default, each person that has access to the link can take the survey.
Because this distribution method isn't connected to a Contact List, it will not capture personal information by default.


	Note
	You can learn about advanced methods of using this link type to create connections to individuals' personal information in the CoreXM Expert level certification.
	You can send an Anonymous Link via a wide range of channels. For example, via an email, through Social media, place it directly on your website, or leverage a QR code.
When to use the Anonymous Link
One advantage of the Anonymous Link is that you can use it in many ways. The table below lists some of the use cases in which you can distribute your survey anonymously and when to consider each option.
Distribution Method
	Use Case
	Sharing the Link
	Send the link in an email
	If you need to send a generic link to a large group from a mailing service outside of Qualtrics. You can include an anonymous link in the email invite.
	Copy and paste the link into the body of the email.
	Post the link on Social Media
	If you want to share out a survey and there are no parameters on who from your social media community can take the survey.
You post it on social media to capture data from contacts and followers you have on the online platform. For example Quick Poll research.
	Include a link within a post on your social media page.
	Embed the link on a Web Page
	Discover how your website is performing with embedded hyperlinks to surveys strategically posted on your site.
Recruit research panelists or a research community on dedicated pages with a survey link embedded on the page.
Survey the quality of your FAQ documentation.
	Copy and paste the link within a web page.
	Giving access to your survey in printed materials.
	Capture feedback in locations (e.g. restaurants, in public service centers), at events (e.g conferences, concerts), or on marketing materials (e.g. bills) in real-time on respondents' devices.
Place a QR code for potential respondents to access in a convenient way without having to type in a URL link.
	Print the survey QR code to material that is easily accessible to potential respondents.
	Using the Anonymous Link
You can use this link type quickly and easily by simply copying, and pasting, or hyperlinking this link to some text. Then share this with others in your preferred method, for example, by making the link available on your website or including it in an email. Anyone who has the link will be able to do your survey.
1. From the Distributions tab, click Anonymous Link.


	2. You will see a URL, Copy this URL.


	3. Paste the link, or hyperlink it to text in the channel you choose to share it in.


	Tip
	You can customize the anonymous link. To customize the link, write the text you desire to display on to your link. This hyperlinks the URL to the text.
For example, type "Click here to take the Survey".
	Posting the Anonymous Link to Social Media
To distribute your survey via social media:
1. Click Social Media.


	2. Select the social media platform you wish to distribute your survey.


	3. You will be prompted to log in with your social media credentials.
4. Customize the post and survey’s accompanying message.
5. Submit the post which will include a link to the survey.
Accessing the Anonymous Link with QR Codes
To distribute your survey with a QR Code:
1. Click QR Code


2. Click Download QR Code.


3. Share the code in marketing collateral, posters, bills, signage, etc. depending on the audience you're trying to reach.


	Note
	The use of QR codes varies by country and demographic. Make sure you do your research before using this distribution method.
	Preparing a Mailing List for Email Distribution
In the previous section, you learned how to distribute an Anonymous Link. In this section, you will learn how to distribute to contacts in a List.
In this article: 
* Defining Individual Links
* Using Lists
* Preparing a List
* Importing a List
* Managing Your Contacts
Defining Individual Links
An Individual Link is a survey URL that is unique for each contact that it is sent to. The Individual link connects your contacts (customers, employees, research panels, etc.) to their survey responses. Below is an illustration of the Individual Link.


Unlike the Anonymous Link (illustrated in the image below), the individual link is dynamically populated in an email invite to each contact. Before you can use the Qualtrics Emailer to send Individual Links, you need to create a mailing list in Qualtrics.


Using Lists
In the previous section, you learned that an Anonymous Link can be sent broadly and accessed by anyone who has the link. In contrast, when you distribute to a List in Qualtrics only the recipient of the unique link can access the survey.
When you distribute to a List you gain the advantage of being able to identify the contact, track the progress of their response, send reminders, send thank you emails, and connecting their embedded data. 
These advantages are achieved by Qualtrics dynamically creating a survey link that is unique to each contact in the List which is called the Individual Link.


Preparing a List
A List is an inventory of potential respondents that can take your survey. Lists can include your customers, employees, research panelists, online community, etc., and should include the contact information for each of these individuals, as well as any Embedded or Operational Data you need for the project.


Before you can create the List in Qualtrics you need to prepare the CSV file (the data-sheet containing the contact details for each person). There are two important requirements for the file:
1. It must be in .CSV format.
2. At a minimum, it must contain the First name, Last name, and Email address for each contact being imported.


	Troubleshooting
	If your list is not importing, make sure that you have added all of the required fields to your contact list. 
	Below is an example of a prepared contact list.


1. These fields are mandatory for the list to import.
2. ExternalDataReference is a field that will appear in templates of mailing lists downloaded from Qualtrics but does not need to be filled in.
3. These fields are examples of Embedded data or Operational Data for each contact that will connect to the Survey flow and populate the data for that contact in the survey.
While you are preparing this file, carefully consider which Embedded Data you will need for the project based on the survey design and reporting needs. Ensure they are present in this file before you upload it to Qualtrics.


	Note
	The Embedded Data syntax (capitalization, use of spaces, use of symbols, etc.,) must match that of the Embedded Data field you added to the Survey flow (see Connecting Operational-data to your Survey for a refresher).
	Importing a List
Lists are stored and managed in the Qualtrics Directory so they can be used in other projects.


When you access the Directory there is a directory for Employees and one for Contacts. For this certification, the focus is on the general Contacts Directory.




	Note
	You will learn about the Employee Directory in the EmployeeXM Expert Certification.
	When you first access the Contacts Directory there will be no lists. You can add mailing lists in three ways:
* Importing a CSV file of contacts: This allows you to construct a file containing individual contacts in the rows of the file, and the contact information and embedded data in the columns.
* From a Sample: Once you have imported contacts, this enables you to create a list of random contacts from across all your imported contacts.
* Manually input contacts: You can directly type each contact and their details into Qualtrics. Only do this if you have a very small number of contacts to add (less than 10).


	Note
	The most efficient and accurate way of importing contacts into Qualtrics is by Importing contacts via a .CSV file.
	To create a List from an imported CSV file:
1. In Directories, Access Contact Directory .
2. Click on the Lists section.
3. Select Create a list, name the list and click Confirm.
4. Select Upload a File.
5. In the Add contacts to your directory window, click select a file.
6. Select your mailing list .CSV file. The first few contacts will load, you can scroll in this window to confirm they are uploading correctly.
7. Click Upload contacts, then select Add your contacts.


Managing Your Contacts
Now that your contacts are imported you can view and manage them in the platform. Under Lists, you will see all your previously imported Mailing Lists.
You can view and manage the contacts in a list by clicking on the list to access it. You will see all of the contacts associated with that list. To view an individual contact, click on the contact and you will see their high-level details in the right-hand panel.
When you view an individual contact, several actions can be applied:
1. Add the contact to another list.
2. Remove the contact from the list you're viewing.
3. Opt-out the person from receiving invites.
4. Delete the contact from the platform.


Sending Survey Invitations via Email
In the previous section, you learned how to prepare, format, and create the Contact Lists required to send email survey invites. In this section, you will learn how to navigate, configure, and distribute an email survey invite to the imported contacts.
In this article: 
* Inviting Respondents Via Email
* Email Configuration
* Additional Options
Inviting Respondents Via Email
Email is one of the most common channels to send survey invites through. It is the mechanism by which you ask your respondents to dedicate their time to provide their input to the survey.
A great survey invite is a call to action that converts contacts into respondents and thereby increasing the survey response rate.
For that reason, the humble email invite is immensely important to prepare and distribute correctly, including:
* A compelling subject line
* Personalized email body text
* Professional look and feel
* Short and succinct details about the survey purpose and length
* Identifiable From Email address
By carefully crafting each of the above you will contribute to a marginally better response rate.


	Tip
	We have crafted an Email Invite Best Practice Checklist for you to download and use for future reference when creating a Survey Invite Emails. Scroll to the bottom of this page to download this PDF.
Filename: Checklist_Email Invite Best Practices.
	Email Configuration
Once you've planned the content of your survey, you are ready to configure the survey invite in Qualtrics. To create the survey invite:
1. In Distributions, navigate to Emails.
2. Click Compose Email.


The configuration window will open, below are the items to configure and some recommendations for each.


1. Select the List to send the invite to.
2. Configure the From Name and Reply-to Email.
   1. You can set a custom From Address to reflect your organization more personally. Click here to learn how.
3. You can set the invite to send at a specific point in time (for example, it's good practice to send an invite at the start of the week).
4. Create a compelling subject. You can make the subject a question or perhaps refer to an interaction the contacts just had with your business.
5. Next, you need to invest some time in crafting the body of the email. Use the rich content editor to create a professional look and feel.
   1. Ensure the email body contains the survey links added to the configuration by default.


6. Once you created the email body, it's good practice to save it so that you can re-use it in future
7. Use a personalized greeting by piping in the contacts' first name from the mailing list into the email:
   1. Click the {A}, then navigate to Contacts Field, and select the Recipient First Name.


   2. The text in the message will appear as below in the platform. When the email is sent to a contact, their First Name will appear instead. For example, Dear Susan.


   3. Add your logo by importing an image, ensure you re-size it to a professional size


Additional Options
Using Opt-Out Links 
By default, the email body will contain an Opt-Out link for respondents to choose to no longer receive email invites. It is important to keep this link in the email because it will improve email deliverability, reduces the probability the email will be marked as spam and is a regulatory requirement in many countries.


It is however normal practice to reduce the font and move the Opt-Out link to the end of the email body so that it does not intrude on the call-to-action elements of the invite. See the above image as an example.
When the respondent clicks on the Opt-out link, the contact record for that person will be updated in Qualtrics to reflect them as opted out. They will no longer receive invites from the mailing list used.
Using Inline Questions 
Another way to increase response rates is by using an Inline Question in the email invite body. An Inline Question pulls a question from your survey into the email invite itself so that the respondent can start their survey by clicking the answer to that question.


When a respondent clicks on an answer choice in the email, they will then be taken to the survey in their browser to answer the rest of the questions. The answer to the question in the email is pre-selected for them.
To add an inline question to your email body:
1. Select the Inline Email Question icon in the Rich Content Editor.
2. Select which question to display.
3. Select a default color scheme or customize it.


	Tip
	You can preview how the email invite will look by selecting Send Preview Email at the bottom of the email configuration window.
	

Sending Reminder & Thank You Emails
Now that you have emailed your surveys to respondents, data collection will begin as respondents click on their survey links and complete the survey. Not all respondents will start or finish the survey. This section addresses how to remind those contacts to complete their survey, as well as how to thank those who finished the survey.
In this article 
* What are Reminder Emails
* Sending Reminder Emails
* What are Thank You Emails
* Sending Thank You Emails
What are Reminder Emails
It is common for there to be an initial spike in responses after sending the initial Email Survey Invite. To remind anyone who may have missed the email you can send a Reminder Email to respondents.
A Reminder Email is sent only to the contacts from the original survey distribution that have not yet started or finished your survey. This reminder email will slightly increase the overall responses that you receive for your project.


	Note
	Reminder and Thank You emails are only compatible with distributions that used Individual Links.
	It is best practice to send only one reminder email per survey project. More reminders than this can annoy respondents.


	Note
	Depending on the type of research you're doing, as a general rule, you will receive 80% of the total responses you will collect in your first/initial distribution. The remaining 20% will be collected after the reminder email.
	

	Note
	For Market Research email survey invites, typical response rates range from 2% to 10%. For Employee Research, typical response rates for email invites range from 30% to 50%.
	Sending Reminder Emails
1. Under Distributions, select Email.
2. Locate the Distribution record for which you need to send a reminder email.
3. There are two ways to add the Reminder email.
   1. Select the green Schedule Reminder button.
   2. Or, click the drop-down, and select Schedule Reminder.


4. The email editor opens for you to populate the message and set up the distribution parameters.
The Reminder Email editor is similar to the initial email invite editor. See the below screenshot and corresponding functions.


1. The email will only be sent to unfinished contacts.
2. The From Email, From Name, and Reply-to-Email address can be customized.


	Tip
	It is best to use an email address that is easily identifiable as your organization or brand to increase confidence in the origins of the email. Learn how here.
	3. Set when to send the distribution.


	Tip
	It is useful to schedule a future Reminder Distribution so you don't forget later. Schedule it for about a week from the initial distribution.
	4. Set a reminder email subject line that is similar to the original message. You can save this message for future use.
5. Personalize this message using contact field data so it addresses the person by name. Populate the email body with a gentle reminder and a short refresher on the purpose of the survey.
What are Thank You Emails
Sending a Thank You email can be a nice touch for respondents who completed your survey. They are often used to send a quick thanks, a summary of findings, a promo code as an incentive, etc.
It is important to keep in mind that it can also be perceived as over-emailing after an initial invite and reminder email, but that depends on the type of respondents. For employee research, it is generally appreciated to receive a thank you with a summary of findings. For customer or public research use these sparingly. A great alternative is a well-worded End of Survey Message (Set in Survey Options).
Sending Thank You Emails
To send a Thank You Email to your contact list: 
1. Under Distributions, select Email.
2. Locate the Distribution record for which you need to send a thank-you email.
3. There are two ways to add the thank you email.
   1. Select the Green Schedule Reminder button.
   2. Or, click the drop-down, and select Schedule Reminder.
4. The email editor opens up for you to populate the message and set up the distribution parameters.
Distribution Metrics
In this article: 
* Distribution Summary
* Distribution Metrics
* Distribution History
Distribution Summary
The distribution summary provides you an overview of your collected responses and metrics from your survey, broken down by channel. It includes:
* A bar chart displaying recent response trends.
* A table showing all responses collected.


Distribution Metrics
Recent Responses: This bar chart is interactive, hover over any date to see the exact count by distribution channel.


All Responses: A table showing all responses collected for each distribution channel used. 
* Distribution Channel—The channel that was used (Preview, Anonymous Link, or invite over email).
* Audience Size—The number of links distributed.
* Surveys Started—The number of surveys that were started by participants.
* Responses—The number of responses collected.
* Completion Rate—The number of responses collected divided by the number.


You can monitor several distribution metrics that will help you determine the quality of the contacts, anticipate when to pause response collection, detect issues with the call to action of the survey invite, or identify issues with completion rates.
You can monitor bounced emails, email fails, surveys started, surveys finished, etc.


Below is a table of metrics that you can track when monitoring distributions:
Metric
	What it tells you
	Emails Sent
	The current number of emails delivered out of the total distribution.
	Emails Failed
	The number of failed emails out of the total distribution. Emails often fail if the email address wasn’t properly formatted.
	Surveys Started
	The number of surveys sent out in the distribution that have been started.
	Surveys Finished
	The number of surveys sent out in the distribution that have been submitted.
	Emails Bounced
	The number of emails that were rejected by the recipient server.
	Duplicate Emails
	The number of duplicate emails prevented from sending. Duplicate emails are emails with the same message and recipient as another email that went out.
	Complaints
	The number of notifications Qualtrics servers receive from the email provider when a recipient clicks ‘Report Spam’ (or equivalent) for a Qualtrics originated email.
	Distribution History
With Distribution History, you can download a file that contains a list of all recipients that the survey invitation was sent to, along with the current survey invite status and the link that was generated for each contact. You can download all of your distributions to one file, or you can download the history for a single distribution.


To download the distribution history for an individual distribution:
1. Navigate to the relevant Distribution.
2. Click the drop-down arrow to the right of this distribution.
3. Select Download History.


To download the distribution history for multiple distributions at once:
1. Specify the date range by using the From and To filters at the top-left, if applicable. 


	Tip
	This option is useful if you would only like to download distribution history for a specific period of time.
	2. Click Download History.


Once you have downloaded Distribution Histories, you can view up to 25 downloads over the last 7 day period under the Downloads section of the Distributions tab.


To find out more information about what each column in the Distribution History refers to, please see this support page.
Lesson 5
Navigating Data & Analysis
In the previous sections, you learned how to plan, build, and distribute your survey. Once respondents complete the survey their responses will be recorded in Data & Analysis. In this section, you will learn how to navigate this tab and manage your data.
In this article: 
* The Data and Analysis Tab
* The Data Section
The Data and Analysis Tab
As responses are recorded from a survey project you can find, view, analyze and manage the responses in the Data & Analysis tab.


Sections in the Data and Analysis Tab 
In the Data & Analysis tab, you will find subsections for Data, Text, StatsiQ, Crosstabs, and Weighting. 


The focus of this certification is the Data Section.


	Note
	You can learn about Text, Stats iQ, Crosstabs, and Weighting in the CoreXM Expert certification, the CustomerXM Expert certification, and the EmployeeXM Expert Certification.
	The Data Section
In the Data section, your survey raw responses, including metadata, question answers, and embedded data, are stored to view and manage. Here, you should browse your data and familiarize yourself with high-level answers and trends. You'll quickly identify commonalities and understand the format of variables. 
In the Data section, there are many functions that can help you navigate and manage your data, including: 
* View individual responses
* Filter responses
* Edit or delete responses
* Import and export data
* Create custom fields
* Manage Responses in Progress
In this module, you will learn each of these functions.
Now that you know the overview of the Data & Analysis tab, you will learn how to understand and manage your responses.
Understanding and Managing Responses
In this article: 
* Defining Recorded Responses
* Viewing Responses
* Editing Responses
* Deleting Responses
Recorded Responses
When you enter the Data & Analysis tab, you will land on the Recorded Responses page by default. Recorded Responses contains all the responses recorded for a survey project (that are not still in progress), and includes all the data that can be displayed in reports or exported from the platform.
In Recorded Responses, the following types of data will be displayed:
* Responses that were completed and submitted by respondents.
* Test, preview, and imported responses.
* Incomplete responses that were recorded systematically by the incomplete survey response settings in Survey Options.
* Responses in Progress that were manually recorded by you. 


	Note
	Responses in progress are covered in detail later in this course.
	

Viewing Responses
You can view an individual response summary including the answers to questions, embedded data, and metadata.
To view an individual response: 
1. Ensure you are viewing Recorded Responses.
2. Locate the Response you wish to view in detail.
3. Under Actions, click the drop-down. 


4. Select View Response.


5. You will see a summary of all of the individual responses, and you can download this to PDF if needed. 
Editing Responses
You can edit recorded responses inside the Qualtrics platform if needed. For example, you can remove profanity from a text response, or change an answer choice.
Editing an Individual Response 
1. In the Data & Analysis tab, click Edit.
2. The Data Table view will reveal editable cells. 


3. Click a table cell to edit.
   1. Text Entry - you can directly edit the text. 


   2. Numeric Questions - use the drop-down to select the new choice. 


Any changes you make are reflected in the data table, data table file exports, and report results. 


	Tip
	When you are done making edits, click on the Edit button again to save the changes and prevent any new changes. 
	Restoring Original Data 
A gray triangle appears in the table cells that have been edited. 


When you click on the gray triangle, a box appears showing the following information:
* Original—The original survey response.
* Edited—When it was last edited.
* Edit Made By—Which user made the edit.
To restore the original response, click Revert to Original.  


Deleting Responses
Occasionally data needs to be deleted, for example, you may want to delete preview or test data so that it does not skew your results. 
1. Locate the responses you wish to delete.
2. On the left-hand side of the Data Table, select the checkmark for the responses to delete.
3. Click With Selected > Delete.


4. Carefully consider the warning that appears before proceeding with the deletion. 




	Tip
	Make sure you are only deleting data you do not need as this action cannot be undone. 
	Editing Your Data Table
In this article: 
* Customizing the data table columns
* Navigating the data table pages
* Filtering the data table
* Saving and re-loading filters
Customizing the data table columns
In the Data & Analysis tab, you can customize the data columns displayed so that you can view important data, and also hide less important columns from view. This allows you to have a quick and focused view of what matters most to you when you view this tab.
Possible data fields include questions, survey metadata (start date, response type, IP address, etc), contact list fields, and embedded data fields.
To customize the Data Table columns: 
1. Open Tools.
2. Hover over Choose Columns and select the data or questions that you want to include in your view.


3. A checkmark appears next to the displayed fields.
4. To remove a field from view, unselect it in this menu.
Other Options in the Data Table 
You can interact with an individual column by clicking on it. This allows you to sort the table, hide, or move the column. In addition, for some question types, you can view the response entries as numeric values or answer choice text.


Navigating the data table pages
Over time as the project collects a lot of data, additional pages are created to contain the data. You can navigate between the pages using the page navigation at the top and bottom of the table. Select the page number to jump to a page you’d like to view.


To adjust the number of responses per page:
1. Open Tools.
2. Click Select Page Size.
3. Designate the number of responses per page.


Filtering the data table
There are many reasons you may need to filter your data, including:
* To view the data of a subgroup or segment.
* To find responses from a certain timeframe.
* To locate all your test and preview responses for deletion.
You can filter the data based on any fields, including survey metadata, contact fields, embedded data, and question data.
To use filters: 
1. Click Add Filter.
2. Select the Field you'd like to filter by.
3. Select the Filter Operator to determine the type of condition (is, greater than, is empty, and so on).
4. Select the data criteria to filter based on.




	Note
	You can select multiple values as filter criteria as in the gif above.
	The response viewer automatically updates to display only responses that meet the filter condition(s). The filter and the bottom of the response viewer display the number of filtered responses.
Saving and re-loading filters
If you have a filter you commonly use, you can save it.
1. After adding a filter as above, click the plus sign ( + ) next to the filter.


2. This opens the Manage Filters menu.
3. Add additional conditions to your filter.


4. Name your filter.
5. Click Save and Apply.
6. This filter can now be accessed in the future without needing to re-create it.


Exporting Responses
You may find the need to export your raw data. With Qualtrics there are several ways to do this to achieve the format you need. In this section, you will learn about the options most commonly used when customizing data exports.
In this article: 
* Exporting Response Data
* Other Export File Formats
* Compress data
* Viewing order data for randomized surveys
* Multi-value fields
Exporting Response Data
The quickest way to export all of your data to view in products like Microsoft Excel is to export a CSV.
To do this:
1. In Data & Analysis, click Export & Import.
2. Select Export Data.
3. In the Download Data Table, ensure Download all fields are selected. 


	4. Select whether you would like to see the question-answer choice text (e.g. Extremely Satisfied, Somewhat Satisfied, Neutral, etc), or the question choice numeric values (e.g. 1, 2, 3, 4, 5). In most cases Use Choice Text is appropriate to understand your data.


	5. Click Download.
This will export all the raw data in your project, including all responses and all their associated data (answers, Embedded Data, metadata). If this option is unchecked, only the columns currently displayed in your Data Table will be included in the exported file. 
Other Export File Formats
In addition to .CSV, you can export in several different formats. Each format includes an explanation and where it can be used once exported.


	Additional Export Options
There are also many additional export options you can use to customize the way you view the exported data. To view export options in the Data & Analysis tab:
1. Click Export & Import and select Export Data.
2. Click More Options in the bottom left corner.


	3. This will open the menu of additional options. 


	The most commonly used Export Options are addressed below.
Compress data
Compress data as .zip file is a very common option in many software tools. The data export file is combined into a compressed .zip file to reduce the overall file size. This option is selected by default.


	Viewing order data for randomized surveys
Select the Export viewing order data for randomized surveys option to include additional columns of data that contain information on randomization used in your survey. These values will depict the order that a set of blocks, questions, or answer choices were shown to individual respondents.


	Importing Responses
In this article: 
* When to import responses
* Preparing your data for import
* How to import responses
When to import responses
Sometimes, you may need to import data from a different survey into your current one. A few situations this may include are:
* Adding historical data from an old research project.
* Combining response data from an identical survey.
* Migrating from a different survey software into Qualtrics.
Preparing your data for import
Before uploading, your data needs to be in a format that Qualtrics understands. You can use a CSV, TSV, or TXT file. 
For a file to import there are two fundamental rules to adhere to:
1. Each response must be in its row.
2. Each column should align with a survey question or embedded data field, and be presented in the same order as the survey that is currently in Qualtrics. 


	Tip
	If your response data includes special characters (like æ,ѐ, ñ, or ü), we recommend using a TSV file format. Search for these in the file before attempting to import them to identify if they are present.
	Preparing the data file 
The simplest way to prepare your file for import is by exporting a response data file from your current survey project. This will produce a CSV with the data column headers in the order that will work for importing. 




	Note
	Do not delete the column headers from the exported file (first 3 rows). These are needed to help with importing new responses.
	From there, you should remove any of the existing response data in the exported file (see below).


Now paste in the responses to be imported in the appropriate columns. For example, if in your current survey Q2 is a gender question, ensure you paste the data for Gender in that column from the historical data.


Save this file on your computer where you can easily find it again.
Optional Additional Learning: You can read more about this process in the detailed product guide by clicking here. 
How to import responses 
Once your file is formatted as per the above method and ready for import:
1. Click Export & Import and select Import Data.
2. Click Browse and select your file.
3. Verify that the correct delimiter is selected for your file type. The default is “Comma,” but change this to “Tab” if you are uploading a TSV file. 


	4. Click Upload.
After a few seconds, a configuration screen will appear. This screen provides you the opportunity to review the contents of the file you are importing and make sure the data values from your import file map to the correct fields in your survey project.


In the Configuration window there are three main components available to help you confirm the formatting and alignment is correct before importing:
1. The first 2 rows of response data from your imported file. 
2. The column headers of the imported file.
3. The Fields menu displays the fields in your current survey project that these new responses will be mapped to. Qualtrics will map these fields to match the column headers in the file as best as possible, but you can use the dropdown menus to make any required edits. 


If the data you are importing does not have a particular field, you can choose the Ignore Column option in the dropdown menu.


	Tip
	The imported file does not require metadata fields such as Start Date, Status, IP Address, Progress, etc. These can be ignored. 
	

When finished, click Import Responses and your data will begin to display in the Data Table. It may take more time to load when importing larger data sets.
The result will be that your imported data will be appended with any other data you already collected (if any). You can easily identify imported responses using the Response Type field in the data table. 


You can now analyze this data together (covered in Reporting Survey Results).
Managing Response in Progress
In this article: 
* Defining Responses in Progress
* Viewing Responses in Progress
* Managing Responses in Progress
Defining Responses In Progress
Responses in progress are survey responses that were started by the respondent, but they have not yet submitted the response. In Data & Analysis, you can see how many of these responses you have.


The Responses in Progress page is where you can view, manage, or delete these responses. For each response in progress, the table lists a survey session ID, start time, last activity, last question, and progress.


Viewing Responses in Progress
In Responses in Progress, you can select which columns you would like to see. To do this, perform the following:
1. Click Tools.
2. Select Choose Columns.
3. Select desired columns to display.


To view an individual response in progress:
Click on the Survey Session ID (first column) to view the participant’s survey progress and answers.


Managing Responses in Progress
The main action you will do with this type of response is to close it or delete it. This can be done either manually or automatically:
* Automatically: In the Building a Survey module you learned how to configure your Partial Completion settings in Survey Options. These settings govern when an incomplete response will be automatically moved to Recorded Responses.
* Manually: You can manually close or delete responses in progress in the Data & Analysis tab.
Close or Delete partial responses 
* Closing a response in progress will move it to Recorded Responses.
* Deleting a response in progress will permanently remove it from your data.
Not all responses in progress are worth recording for analysis, and conversely, not all should be deleted.
You can use the data in the Responses in Progress page to decide which to record and which to delete. In the example below, Last Question and Progress are useful fields to help you make this decision.


In the above example, the response with 55% Progress is worth closing and using in your analysis, while the one at 36% Progress may be one you choose for deletion.
Manually Closing Partial Responses 
1. Select the response(s) to close.
2. Click with Selected.
3. Select Close.


4. In the cautionary window, select I am sure I want to close X Response(s).


	Note
	When you click Close, this action cannot be undone and the response will be permanently moved to Recorded Responses.
	To Delete Partial Responses 
1. Select the response(s) to delete.
2. Click with Selected.
3. Click Delete.


4. In the cautionary window, select I am sure I want to delete X response(s).




	Warning
	When you click Delete, this action cannot be undone and the data will be permanently deleted.
	Automated Response Data Quality Checking
An important part of data management is ensuring only quality responses remain in the dataset which you will use for reporting and decision making. Doing this manually is possible, but once you have large amounts of data, it's great to have a systematic helping hand running in the background, that's why we built the Expert Review - Response Quality Checker.
In this article: 
* Introducing Expert Review - Response Quality
* Enabling Response Quality checking
* Filtering out poor quality responses
Introducing Expert Review - Response Quality
In rare cases, poor quality data can be recorded for various reasons including:
* Poor survey design, resulting in respondents speeding through the survey.
* In rare cases, Bots can create responses (if using a publicly accessible link, e.g. posted on your website).
Once you have large amounts of data, it can be difficult to detect this manually. The Qualtrics Expert Review - Response Quality is a tool that runs in the background checking several quality factors of your incoming data. It tells you the quality of the data you have collected. It can also help you filter for this data, making it easier for you to clean your data at the end of your research.


This tool checks for several quality markers in your data including:
* Speeder Detection
* Bot Detection
* Sensitive Data
* Duplicate Respondents
Speeder Detection 
Participants who have finished your survey very quickly will be flagged as Speeders by Qualtrics. This is checked when Qualtrics uses our algorithm to see if they selected answers to get through the survey quickly, rather than taking their time to provide you with quality data.
Bot Detection 
Apart from detecting Speeders, Qualtrics can determine if your survey was completed by a human or a robot by using Google’s Invisible ReCaptcha. However, there are multiple ways to prevent the likelihood of you receiving bots in your survey.
Optional additional learning: For more information refer to this Product Guide page. 
Enabling response quality checking
To use this functionality, you must enable the below within the Survey Protection Section. See the instruction below to enable this feature:
1. Click the Survey tab.
2. Select Survey Options and click on the Security tab.
3. To enable quality detection, check the following boxes below:
   1. Prevent Multiple Submissions
   2. Bot Detection
   3. RelevantID


Filtering Out Poor Responses
You can filter out all the responses you collected that have been flagged so that you only see results from high-quality data.
To filter responses using Expert Review:
1. Select Filter Out Poor Quality Responses.


2. Now that you’ve used this filter, it will be saved, so you can use it later or apply it to Results and Advanced-Reports.


Lesson 6
Basics of using Results
The Anatomy of the Reports Tab
After you’ve collected survey data, you can use the Reports tab to visualize and share your findings.
In this Article: 
1. The Results Section
2. The Reports Section
Anatomy of the Reports Tab
The first thing you'll notice is there are two ways to visualize and present data in this tab. Results and Reports are both available, each with distinctive and different functionalities to be aware of.


The Reports Section
The Reports section is designed to give you more options for customization. 
Use this method of reporting if you have a specific layout preference you wish to build. This is the most fine-tuned way to present your aggregate data and requires additional planning time and skill to build the report before communicating with stakeholders. 




	Note
	The CoreXM Expert Certification course will cover how to use these customizable Reports.
	The Results Section
The Results section is designed to save you time. 
When you first access Results you will notice autogenerated data summaries. With these auto-generated visualizations, the Results section is the easiest way to find your aggregate results and create reports quickly.
Use this tool to check in on your data, or to create simple graphs and tables that communicate trends with key stakeholders.


The focus of this Certification is the Results Section.
Next, you will begin by taking a closer look at what is contained within an autogenerated Results report.
The Results Report Types
You can use a Results report to quickly and easily check the results of the questions and Embedded Data fields collected in your survey. It is possible to see the survey project results without having to do any customization by leveraging the Default Report.
You can also customize the Default Report, or create new reports to cater to different audiences, or explore additional trends. 
In this article: 
* The Default Report
* Creating Other Reports
* Copying a Report
The Default Report
After collecting data in a survey, when you click on the Results tab, you’ll see that a report has already been generated for you. This is called the Default Report.


Pages in the Default Report: 
On the Default Report, each survey question and embedded data field are given their Page. To see the data contained in each, click on the page.
You can use the navigation sidebar on the left side of the screen to quickly jump to each page to view the results of a particular question.


What you will see for each question: 
Each page contains two or three visualizations that display the results from that question. Once you clicked on a question Page, scroll to see these.
Examples below are for an Overall Satisfaction multiple choice question:
A graphic visualization 


A statistical Summary 


A Response breakdown 


You can also make changes to these visualizations, (this will be covered in a later section).
Viewing your O-data or Embedded data 
A Page will also be automatically created for an Embedded Data/ Operational Data collected in the survey. In the screenshot below, you can see the page created for the Embedded Data field named ‘Region’.


Click on the Embedded data field you wish to view.
Creating Other Reports
You can create multiple reports for the same survey project. There are a few reasons why you would do this:
* You have multiple stakeholders who want to visualize data differently, so can create a report to meet each stakeholder’s needs.
* You are interested in exploring the data in a different segment of responses, so you can create a report per segment.
For example, one report might show data from the West region (for the West Region manager) while the other report displays data from the East region (for the East Region manager).
To create an additional report view: 
1. Click the report selection dropdown menu.
2. Click Create New Report.
3. Name the report (e.g. East Region Report).


After creating the new report, it will initially look like the Default Report, but you can now customize it. For example, you can filter the whole report to only see data from the Eastern Region (addressed in a later section of this module).
Copying a Report
Another way to create multiple reports is to copy reports. This is a great time saver if more than one of your reports is similar. Instead of starting from scratch each time, you can copy an existing report then make small edits where needed.
Using the previous example, you could first create your East region report. From there, you can make a copy and make small changes to create the West region report without starting over.
To copy a report: 
1. Click the report selection dropdown menu.
2. Click Copy Report.


Navigating between the reports you created 
When you create a copy of a report or a new report, you can toggle between them in the Report Selection Dropdown. 


The Report Settings Menu
Before customizing a new report, you need to define some global settings to help you gain consistency and present a professional report.
In this article: 
* Report Settings
* Saving Default Settings
Report Settings
When you start working on a new report, the Report Settings menu should be the first place you visit.
In this menu, you can control what you see in a report at the overall/global level. The changes you make here will apply to all portions of the report.
Setting up your preferences at this level in the report can help you systematically apply consistent overall views for the Report Audience, and saves you time when applying these settings to future reports.
To Access Report Settings: 
1. Click on the Cogwheel.
2. Click Report Settings.


The settings you can control in Report Settings include:
1. Default Metrics: Select between the choice count or the percentage to be displayed as your preferred metric on visualizations. 
   1. The Choice Count is the raw number of respondents.
   2. The Percentage is the proportion of respondents who selected that choice.
2. Decimal Places: displayed for statistics. Specify how many decimal places to display in visualizations and statistics by default. 
3. Default Color Palette: Use this option to apply your organization’s color scheme to personalize your report. You can either use a preset palette or create your own by defining colors one by one.
4. Fonts and Spacing: Set the size and spacing of text on the report. Choose between small, medium, and large, depending on your audience’s preference and needs.
5. Default Visualizations: In the previous section you learned that each question page will have 2 or 3 default visualizations. This setting governs which these are. If you are interested in including only tables or graphs, but not both, you can modify this setting to remove all visualizations of a particular type from every page. 


Saving Default Settings
Once you have settled on a set of options that you like in the Report Settings, you can save them as your default report settings. 
To Save the Report Settings as your Default:
1. Click on the drop-down arrow next to "Apply my default settings".
2. Click Save as my default settings.


Now that the settings have been saved, you can apply these settings to any other report. 
To apply the settings to a report: 
1. Access Report Settings.
2. Click Apply my default settings.
3. The settings you’ve saved will be applied. 
Modifying Question Pages
Now that you’ve learned how to set up the structure and settings of your report, you can start to customize the contents of the report. 
In this article: 
* Setting up Question Pages
* Creating and Editing Visualizations
* Adding Notes to a Page
Setting Up Question Pages
In the previous section, you learned that in the Default Report one page is generated for every question and Embedded Data field in your survey. To communicate survey results you often need to carefully select which data is shown, and which is not. It is also important to consider the order in which it will be presented.
The structural changes you can make to the report include: 
1. Hiding a Page.
2. Reordering Pages.
Hiding a Page: 
If there is a particular field that is not important or relevant to the story your report will tell, then you should hide the page. 
It is good practice to carefully consider the relevance of each page to the story and your audience, and then de-select any pages that do not directly contribute to this.
By doing this you can tell a clearer story, as well as maintain the audiences' attention and get your point across more succinctly.
Hide a page by De-selecting it from the left-hand sidebar, as shown below.


	When you hide a page, you will no longer see the visualizations it contains when looking at the report. The page will also be omitted when you share the report. 
At any time, you can re-select the page to add it back into the report.
You can also hide pages by navigating to the Edit Report menu under the Cogwheel.


	This menu displays a birds-eye view of each page in the report with a corresponding checkbox. To hide pages, deselect the corresponding checkmark. 


	Re-ordering Pages: 
You can change the order of pages in your report to help tell a clear data story.
1. In the left-hand navigation sidebar, hover your mouse over the checkmark.
2. Then click and drag each page to a new location.


Creating and Editing Visualizations
As you saw earlier in this course, each page contains two or three default visualizations for each question or Embedded Data. 
You can customize each of these visualizations or add more visualizations to the page.
Watch the video below to learn how to create and customize a visualization.
<!-- iframe instead of embed for d:videodata --> 
To recap the video, some key components of building visualizations include:
* The visualization type: Select from common graphs like bar charts, pie charts, and breakdown bars, or display your data as a simple table. The selection of visualization types available will differ by the type of data. For a text field, you can choose to display the full response or a word cloud.
* Display options: This includes how values are sorted, the display of axes and a legend, and how the portions of the visualization are labeled. The exact selection of options differs for each visualization type.
* The color palette: The colors defined in report settings will be seen by default, but you can make adjustments on each visualization.
* The labels: By default, the labels will be the choice text or field values directly from your survey. You can simplify the labels if your values are lengthy and hard to read on the visualization.
* The visualization’s title: Use a simple but specific title that makes it clear what this visualization contains.
* The metric: By default, you’ll see the metric selected in Report Settings. You can change to another metric like percentage or even use basic statistics like average or median.
* The number of decimal places for any numbers.
* You’ll also notice the data source selection which specifies which question or field the visualization is based on. This option is not editable on default pages but will be editable on custom pages which will be discussed in a later article.
Adding Notes to a Page
A useful customization that you can make to a page is adding a note. A note is a block of text that appears below your visualizations and will be seen on the report by stakeholders when you share it with them.
Use a note to: 
* Add commentary or describe some of the visualizations on that page.
* Summarize any insights or conclusions you’ve found from examining the data.
This is particularly useful when sharing reports with executives to communicate important insights to them alongside the data. See the below example:


To add a note to a page: 
1. Click on the question page you want to add a note to.
2. Below the Visualization, click Add Note.


Then, you can customize the text with the Rich Content Editor.


Using Filters and Breaking Out Pages
Now that you’ve learned about the basics of creating visualizations, you can learn about the advanced reporting features that allow you to customize how your data is presented to stakeholders.
In this article: 
* Using Report Filters
* Using the Breakout By Functionality on Visualizations
* Applying Display Options to Improve Visualizations
* Using the Breakout By Functionality on the Whole Report
Using Report Filters
Report Filters can be used to display the results of the survey filtered by a specific segment(s) of data. 
Report filters apply to whole reports. For example, you can use filters to provide the West Region manager with a report that only displays the data from the West region. 
To add a report filter: 
1. Click the Add Filter button at the top of the Results interface.
2. Find the field you want to filter on:
   1. This can be a field from another survey question.
   2. Or a field from your O-data/Embedded Data.
3. Select the field to base your filter on. 
4. You will be prompted to configure the operators, and the specific value to filter on.


You can also select multiple values for a report filter. In the example below, you can see the whole report is filtered on both the South and West regions combined. 


Using filters from Multiple Questions or Fields 
You can create more advanced filters by clicking the + button next to the filter condition you created earlier. This will open up the Manage Filters menu. This will allow you to apply filters of multiple categories such as filtering by country and region simultaneously.
When creating a filter based on more than one field:
* Select Any if you would like the filter to be met by a respondent who meets any of the conditions. For example, East region OR West region.
* Select All if the respondent must meet all conditions. For example, they Like Chocolate AND Strawberry ice cream.


Saving Filters for Future Use 
After creating filter conditions, you can save the filter you built for future use. To do so, while you are specifying the filter criteria, also give the filter a name, check your filter conditions, and click Save and Apply. 
Once saved, the filter will be available on the left-hand side of the Manage Filters menu on other reports so that you don’t have to build the filter from scratch each time.


In the above example, this filter will display any responses from the West or South regions, AND where the manager is Gilbert White. This is because we use the All operator. If we had instead used Any, the filter would be met by any response from the west or south regions OR where the manager is Gilbert White.
Using the Breakout By Functionality on Visualisations
It's important to be able to show specific visualizations broken down by groups so you can see their relative size and impact. 
* For example, breaking out overall satisfaction by Gender, or Location, etc.
* Or, breaking out ice cream flavor preference by Gender. 
Breakout by takes the results for one field and splits them out by another field in your survey’s data. 


Before applying Breakout by, you will have a visualization that shows the overall results (such as the below chart displaying Overall Satisfaction Ratings).


You can split out these satisfaction categories by data from another field in your survey. This is when Operational Data/Embedded Data is particularly useful.
For example, to see how satisfaction varies by Store Region you can Breakout the Satisfaction Question by Store Region. 
To Breakout a Question by another field:
1. Click on the question/chart you wish to break out.
2. Click on the Breakout By dropdown.


3. Choose which fields you'd like to break down the chart by.
   1. You can use other questions from the survey:


   2. Or you can use your O-data by clicking Embedded data.


Once you add the field, the visualization splits its results across the different categories present in the breakout variable selected. 
For example, see how satisfaction breaks down in each of our four Geographic Regions below.


Applying Display Options to Improve Visualization Layout
When breaking out a Bar Chart, the default display is set to Horizontal Bars. 
To improve the way data displays consider altering the Display Options for the visualization.


A common display option when breaking out a visualization is to use stacked bars to more easily compare the trends in each region. To stack a visualization, select Stacked Bars.


You can also display percentages instead of counts when comparing different segments. 
You can switch the Metric to show percentage using the Metric dropdown on the right-hand side of the visualization. 
As you can see the below chart has been set to display the Stacked Chart in Percentage terms. 


Interpreting the Breakout. 
With the above visualization, you can see there is a smaller percentage of dissatisfied and extremely dissatisfied customers in the South Region compared to others. 
Knowing this, you can create an action to uncover what the key operational differences are in the Southern region that produces fewer unhappy customers, and more extremely satisfied customers. 
Using this breakout by feature, you’ve found a valuable insight that can help lead you to create positive change in the other regions of your organization.
Using the Breakout By Functionality on the Whole Report
In most cases, you’ll use breakout by on just one visualization at a time. However, you can add a breakout field to your entire report.
Breaking out an entire report allows you to display every visualization in the report to be broken out by a specific field. 
For example, if you have a manager interested in comparing all questions across all your geographic regions, this option will save you some time when building a report for them.
To Breakout an entire report: 
1. Select Add Report Breakout.
2. Select a field to break out the report by.




Adding Custom Pages
So far, you have examined the Default Report and how to customize the Question Pages in this report to suit your reporting needs. You have also learned that each Question Page displays one question or o-data field at a time. It is also possible to display different fields together, and this section explores how to do this using Custom Pages.
In this article: 
* Custom pages
* Building custom pages
* Managing custom pages
* Deleting custom pages
Custom pages
A custom page can include visualizations based on multiple questions and pages. For example, if you’d like to see a report on the overall restaurant satisfaction alongside a visualization of the number of visits to the restaurant, as well as Satisfaction broken out by the number of visits, you can do so with a custom page.
To create a custom page:
1. Navigate to the Question Sidebar.
2. Click the blue Create Custom Page button. 


Building a custom page
To Build a Custom Page:
1. By default, the page is called "New Custom Page". Rename the Page by clicking on the title text above the first visualization.
2. By default, the first visualization is the first question in your survey, change it by selecting the required field from the Data Source dropdown. 
3. Add an additional Visualization to display in this Custom Page by clicking Add Visualization. 
4. Add a Note to the Page, by clicking Add Note. 


To help you decide on which visualization types to add to a custom page, we created a one-pager you can download and keep on your desk for future reference. Scroll to the end of this page to download the PDF.
Managing custom pages
Custom Pages always appear at the top of the report, before the default question pages. If you create more than one custom page, you can reorder the pages by dragging and dropping them into place in the left-hand-side navigation.


Deleting a custom page
If you decide you don’t need a custom page, you can delete the page by clicking Page Options. 


Sharing a Report
Once you finish building and editing your report, it’s time to distribute it to your stakeholders so that they can view the data and insights visualized in a digestible way. 
In this article: 
* Sharing Reports
* Public Report Link
* Exporting a Report
* Schedule Report Email to Stakeholders
Sharing Reports
As the report builder you have been privy to the visualizations you built, the data and insights they produced, and some of the recommendations you'd like to put forward. The next stage is to disseminate these results to open them up for discussion and brainstorming on important business decisions.
Before sharing any reports, you should always carefully check all of the following:
* The Report Settings preferences have been applied.
* The appropriate metric is displayed on each visualization.
* For each additional Report, check the appropriate filters are applied (e.g. for the East Region report, that the East filter is applied).
* For each visualization Break-out, check that the Display options are selected that optimizes how the data will be viewed by stakeholders.
* Review all the Notes added to the report to check for coherence in the story you are telling and the recommendations attached.
* Check the order of the Pages is effective at communicating the story, as well as ensuring that you hide any visuals not relevant to the story. 
The Results Tab offers several different options for sharing your report. The sharing options can be found under the Share Report menu.


Public Report Link
The most commonly used option is the public report link. This feature will generate a web link that you can share with stakeholders to view the report in their browser without needing a login for Qualtrics. 
When a stakeholder clicks this web link, they’ll see the report exactly as you have created it. Any filters you’ve added will apply, and only the pages you’ve chosen to display will be seen. 


	Tip
	A benefit of the sharing option: As new responses are collected in your survey, the public report will update in real-time, so you don’t need to worry about creating a new link to send results to stakeholders over time.
	To create a Public Report: 
1. Click Share Report.
2. Select Manage Public Report.
3. This will open the Manage Public Report editor. Check the box for Public Report Available.
4. Copy this small URL. This is what you will use to share your report with others. 


	Tip
	To see what your stakeholders will see, you can preview the Public Report by clicking on the URL.
	

Controlling Access to the web link: 
* Protected Access - You can add an Access Code to the web link, which acts as a password. Only viewers who enter the code correctly will be able to see the report. This is an important option to use in most cases when using the sharing method.
* Unregulated Access - In cases where you want to share the report very broadly, for example on your website, simply remove the Access Code. When your report is ready to be shared online, copy the link, and hyperlink or embed it on your web page. 
Exporting a Report
You can export your entire report to other formats so it can be viewed offline, in other tools, or printed for a meeting.
When you're ready to export a report, select the report to export from the Reports Dropdown.
You can export a report to the following formats:
* PDF file.
* Word document.
* Powerpoint slides.
* .csv file to be presented in a spreadsheet.


When you have selected the format to export into, you will be prompted to specify which pages should be included in that export.


You can also export a specific page of a report. To do this:
1. Click on the page you want to export.
2. Under page options, select Export Page As.
3. Select the format to export the visualization to.


Lastly, you can export individual visualizations as an image file by clicking on the additional options icon in the upper-right corner of the visualization.


Schedule Report Email to Stakeholders
You can schedule emails of your results to stakeholders, and these stakeholders will not need a login for Qualtrics to view the results. 
These are sent directly from the Results section of Qualtrics and can be sent as a single email, or a recurring email that sends weekly or monthly, at a specific time. 
In crafting the results email, write a brief message to accompany the report and select the report attachment’s file type. As with exporting a report, you can select from PDF, Word, PowerPoint, or CSV.
To Schedule a Report Email: 
1. Select the Report to share from the Report Dropdown.
2. Click on Share Report.
3. Select Schedule Report Email.
To set up the Report Email: 
1. Specify the contacts that should receive the Report by selecting or creating a Contact List.


2. Specify the From details, including the name and email.
3. Specify when the Report Email should be sent.
4. Write a clear and compelling email subject for the stakeholders.


5. Select the format in which the email should be shared.
6. Type your email message, and use the rich text editor to professionally format it. 


	Tip
	You can also include the Public Report link in this email body for them to access this dynamic report. 
	7. Click Save, and the email will be sent as scheduled.


You can also set up multiple scheduled emails on the same report. So, if one group of stakeholders such as a team of middle managers should receive the report every Monday, while another team like the c-suite executives should just see it on the first day of every month, that can be accomplished by clicking Add Scheduled Report.


Catering Results to Different Audiences 
Now that you have the practical tools to create, customize, and share your report, there is one more element of report building that is important to understand - catering to your audience. 
Great reports communicate effectively with the audience they are presented to. In building your Results Reports it is important to know that different audience types have:
* Differing data and metric needs
* Different amounts of time to view reports
* Different abilities for interpretation 
By applying this in report design you can get the audiences' attention and communicate your points to them.
In this article: 
* Catering to your audience
* Using Notes to engage and tell a story
* Being consistent in design
Catering to your audience
It is extremely important to consider the audience for your report while building it so that when you share it, this audience can digest the information. 
Ask yourself who the report is designed for - is it an executive who is responsible for a large part of your organization? Or a manager who is in charge of one specific region or team? Or in some cases, both?
Below are some practices that will help you build reports that suit these audiences.
Crafting Reports for Executives: 
* Reports for this audience should be as concise as possible. Ensure it only contains the most relevant visualizations for their day-to-day decisions by hiding all other visualizations from their report. (Review the Modifying Pages section to achieve this). 
* Executives are busy, therefore it is advisable to avoid the need for them to filter the report themselves. You should apply any relevant filters in the Report you are building before sharing it with Executives. (Review the Adding Filters and Breaking Out Visualizations section to achieve this). 
* For this audience, it is good practice to make use of the Breakout By feature so that the executive can compare different regions, business units, or another variable of interest. (Review the Adding Filters and Breaking Out Visualizations section to achieve this).
* Minimize scrolling in a report. The executive will rarely scroll through multiple pages to find what they’re looking for.
* Make use of Notes. This audience can interpret data but prefers not to in order to minimize time spent on the task. Use notes to explain the findings and recommended actions of a visualization. 
* Create a dedicated Executive Report that adheres to the above principles while displaying only the data and breakouts that you know are most crucial to their decisions and processes. (Review the Results Report Types section to achieve this). 
Crafting Reports for managers: 
* This audience typically needs more detail than an executive team because they will use the data to help them understand their operations, and report to the Executive team. You will hide fewer pages in their reports, but ensure they are ordered appropriately based on what is important to this audience. (Review the Modifying Pages section to achieve this). 
* This audience will often dedicate more time to interpretation and discussion of the results, provide different views, and use the Breakout By feature to facilitate this. (Review the Adding Filters and Breaking Out Visualizations section to achieve this). 
* You should also apply a filter when appropriate. If a manager is only responsible for the operations of one region, be sure that a filter is in place to only show that segment. Recall that you can easily copy reports, so it’s easy to create a series of reports that are sent to different managers.
* Managers responsible for business segments, regions, or operations will dedicate the time to review the data for these areas in more detail. Ensure you discuss these needs and how they align with key performance measures before you begin building the report in Qualtrics. 


	Note
	If you have a large or complex system of executives, managers, and employees that should each see a unique segment of data (and in some cases restrict private data related to their performance), it is worth considering Qualtrics Dashboards which allow for more dynamic filters and data restrictions at scale. Dashboards are covered in depth in the CX and EX Certification courses.
	Using Notes
The notes feature (see Modifying Pages for a refresher on this feature) can be used to provide important context to the visualizations you present. For example, if your organization has a goal associated with a metric being displayed, you can add that to a note to remind viewers of the goal, as well as provide an assessment of performance against it. 
You can also use a note to help provide a describe a more complex visualization that viewers may not fully understand at first glance (such as providing a chart broken out by different categories such as the below).


If you have finished collecting data, you can also use notes to summarize conclusions that you’ve found from examining the data. Be careful about doing this with an active study, as new responses could render your conclusions out of date! It's best practice to wait until the data collection has ended for a survey project before reporting findings to stakeholders. 


Being Consistent in Design
Any audience viewing a data report will appreciate consistency to lower the cognitive load for interpretation. Consistency in the following will help nurture engagement with the report:
* Consistent timing of report distribution to stakeholders.
* Consistent use of Visualization types for specific metrics over time (e.g. if your target for average satisfaction is reported in a Gauge chart one month, do not change it to another chart type in the next month). By changing the chart type for key metrics, you increase the effort for the audience to interpret the data.
* Consistent use of your organization's color palette in the data visualizations. You can include logos where appropriate, such as in the email sharing the report with your stakeholders. 
* Consistent use of the right visualization type for certain types of data. There are many visualization types available to you when building a report, but you don’t want to overwhelm viewers with too much variety and complexity.
* Consistently use the Notes feature. It is best practice to ensure these are used in the same way over time, to the same degree. Also if your report is ongoing, e.g. monthly, then it's important to ensure that each set of Notes is updated to summarize the insights or updates from the new months' data. 


L2
Lesson 1 - Introducing Customer Experience Management
Building and Sustaining Customer Experience Management Programs


Defining Customer Experience Management
Customer Experience is pivotal to an organization navigating today’s global economy. In previous years, companies could compete almost solely on product features, but the overall experience with the company has become increasingly important; consumers are more selective now than ever. Throughout this course, you will access information geared to help you and your organization master program management, research methodology, and Qualtrics configuration. Use the articles in this course to help you build the right infrastructure at your organization to tackle any Customer Experience problem.
In this article: 
* What is Customer Experience Management?
* Reflecting on Customer Experience
* Business Impact of Customer Experience Management
What is Customer Experience Management?
Customer Experience (CX) is the quality of the relationship that a customer has with your organization. Beyond goods and services, it is also about the quality of the interaction. A good experience makes customers less likely to churn, more likely to buy more products from you, and more likely to refer others to buy from your company.
In order to deliver good experiences, a company needs to understand its customers' collective experiences with the organization. Customer Experience Management (Customer XM) infuses customer insights into every decision at every level of an organization. Customer XM facilitates customer-centricity — reporting and real-time data to the teams that are empowered to act. A state-of-the-art CX company is informed by aggregate data on how to deliver astounding customer-centered solutions.
However, “State-of-the-art CX” is not a tagline.
* Forrester learned that public companies classified as CX Leaders outperformed CX Laggards by nearly four times over an eight-year period.
* Bain & Co found that industry NPS™ leaders experienced two times the revenue growth over their peers.
Qualtrics CustomerXM turns customer feedback into effective action. With Qualtrics, you are in control. You will adjust to new trends quickly. You will generate true time-to-value while addressing a key query: How quickly and effectively can you aggregate actionable data to enhance an individual customer’s experience with your company and its products?
Reflecting on Customer Experience
Take a moment to reflect on your own experiences as a customer. We are constantly making judgments, weighing our options, and assessing the best value. Think back to the last experience you had as a customer that impressed you, or perhaps one that disappointed you.
The feeling you walk away with after an interaction is very powerful. Over time, those feelings add up to develop a relationship with that organization. The strength of that relationship is often what determines your likelihood to recommend or share your experiences with others.
Some organizations deliver these interactions very well. They are much more likely to cultivate a strong, loyal customer base.
Other organizations fail to meet customers’ expectations. These brands risk developing a negative reputation that contaminates efforts toward customer acquisition. Does any organization come to mind?
Think of someone running a small boutique. A great boutique manager takes the time to invest in each customer – learning their preferences, cultivating a relationship. Over time, the manager is able to better tailor suggestions of products the person may be interested in or make recommendations for outfits that explore unfamiliar combinations of patterns and prints. This relationship makes the customer feel valued and understood, and the manager is able to naturally identify and take advantage of cross-sell and upsell opportunities. 
CX programs are implemented not only to scale this feeling for customers but also to enable organizations to better manage development according to expressed customer sentiment. Organizations manage CX programs through integrated processes and workflows to deliver the corresponding change management. Scaled CX management allows organizations to listen and react to customers in a sustainable fashion.
Business Impact of Customer Experience Management
Why do we care about CX? What impact can a CX program have within an organization?
Ultimately, you need to take a look at the financial impact of a CX program within an organization. CX can contribute by growing the top line or shrinking the costs of business. CX program managers should not fixate on just moving a metric but must deliver a meaningful ROI to the organization.
There are four main avenues that Qualtrics sees its customers translating CX into financial impact. 


Customer Retention is critical to the longevity and profitability of an organization. Customer retention refers to the efforts made by an organization to hold on to their customers. It is important for organizations to view customers not as one-time transactions, but as long-term relationships. It is far more cost-sensitive to retain customers or limit the churn of customers. Investing in retention will result in happier customers, happier customers will refer their friends, and word-of-mouth referrals have significant monetary value.
Customer Lifetime Value is a predictive model that evaluates how much a customer is worth to an organization, including going forward. Well-managed CX programs improve how well an organization knows its customer base in order to prioritize according to the potential returned value. As an organization better understands its customers and their corresponding value, it can strategically focus on how to expand the customer investment, maximizing cross-sell or upsell opportunities. It also allows an organization to prioritize customers with high customer lifetime value in recovery effort to ensure their business is retained.
Cost to Serve indicates the burden placed on an organization to deliver a product or service to a customer. Reducing cost to serve could mean improving support resources or building digital self-serve capabilities in the customer journey where appropriate. CX programs allow organizations to react more nimbly to keep the customer at the heart of all development. Whether through prioritization or internal operations, organizations can detect what is and is not working according to the customer. Over time, this rich data can empower directors and VPs to make more educated decisions when determining future strategy.
Cost of Acquisition represents how much an organization spends to attract new customers. These efforts can be quite expensive for an organization to overcome. A well-targeted CX program reveals defining characteristics of the customer base. This knowledge can heavily influence how an organization strategizes to attract new potential customers and ultimately grow their share of the market. Customer retention and word-of-mouth referrals both reduce acquisition costs.
To read more on the XM Institute's global study of "ROI of Customer Experience", download the full report here. 
Introducing the XM Maturity Model
In order to establish a CX program that is capable of driving sustainable CX improvements across your organization, you need a few guiding principles. The XM Maturity Model will help you identify the strengths and improvement areas of your program.
In this article: 
* The Benefits of a Maturity Model
* The XM Operating Framework
* The XM Competencies and Maturity Stages
* XM Maturity Model in Action
* Advancing to Higher Levels of Maturity
The Benefits of a Maturity Model
Mastering customer experience is a journey, and when you embark on a journey it can be helpful to have a guiding roadmap; a model. Using the XM Maturity Model, you can lay out the future state of your program to gain a clear understanding of the essential capabilities that are required in order to derive value for your organization. 
Second, the model will help you create internal alignment around the design and execution of your CX program. It points everyone in the same direction, trying to accomplish the same goals. 
Third, having this structured approach will help you identify your program’s strengths and weaknesses. You might be excellent at collecting customer feedback, but poor at using that feedback to make strategic decisions. Or you might be great at communicating the importance of CX to your employees, but you are not great at convincing your executives to invest in customer experience efforts. This maturity model and the XM competencies that the model is based on will help you see in which areas you succeed and in which areas you need to improve in order to advance your program. 
Lastly, and perhaps most obviously, having a maturity model is going to help you track progress towards your ultimate CX goal. This model outlines the practices and behaviors you will need to master in order to get there. Now that you have learned about the “why” of the maturity model, you can turn to the “what.”
The XM Operating Framework
The maturity model is built upon the XM Operating Framework, which comprises technology, competency, and culture. This framework will help you understand and examine all the various components that help you build a successful CX program.


Technology is a key piece of any CX program because it is the tool that empowers everyone inside of your organization to collect, understand, and, most importantly, act on experience and operational data. The technology piece of the framework is absolutely essential for your program because it enables the development of the XM skills and actions that your company needs to demonstrate in order to be customer-centric; it brings XM to life. Without the technology piece of this model, you would not know how to improve the experiences that you deliver to customers. 
Culture is all about the mindsets and beliefs of the people inside your organization that will help you embrace and nurture the key competencies of XM. The experiences that you deliver to your customers are a reflection of your culture and operating processes. If CX focus is not embedded into your culture, it is difficult to maintain focus when leadership changes, company priorities shift, or resources are diverted elsewhere. So, to make sure your CX program is sustainable, you need to create an environment where XM competencies and customer-centric skills and actions are allowed to mature and prosper. Culture allows you to gain and sustain momentum for CX efforts.
Finally, Competency refers to the skills and actions that an organization needs to master in order to excel at XM. The XM Maturity Model is essentially a framework that describes how organizations should build and strengthen these six competencies. In order to evolve your CX program, you need to master these competencies -  they are absolutely the heart of this maturity model. The competencies are exactly the same for each of the four core XM experiences: customer, employee, brand, and product.
The XM Competencies and Maturity Stages
While the six XM competencies are the same across all XM experiences, the specific actions that should be taken by an organization to implement each practice will vary across experience areas and use cases. For now, you will learn about the actions taken for CX.


Lead: Architect, align, and sustain successful XM efforts. Driving XM transformation requires a strong program and active support from senior leadership.
Realize: Track and ensure that XM efforts achieve business objectives. For XM efforts to have a lasting positive impact, they must align with the overall priorities of the organization.
Activate: Create the appropriate skills, support, and motivation. People generally gravitate toward the status quo. To help overcome that tendency, the organization must ensure that employees have all the appropriate XM-related training and support needed.
Enlighten: Provide actionable insights across an organization. At the center of XM is the constant flow of data being transformed into useful information and shared with those most capable of taking the appropriate action.
Respond: Prioritize and drive improvements based on insights. An organization must act on what it learns by making constant improvements as insights are uncovered.
Disrupt: Identify and create experiences that differentiate the organization. Truly successful XM efforts go beyond simply reacting to problems. They proactively develop innovative experiences that give the organization a competitive advantage.
So, what is the relationship between these six competencies and the XM Maturity Model? Well, the maturity model provides a roadmap for how organizations go about mastering those competencies. Companies get stronger and stronger at Lead, Realize, Activate, Enlighten, Respond, and Disrupt over time. As they build up their skills and adopt more customer-centric behaviors, they progress through five stages of maturity:


Essentially, if the six competencies are what you need to do, then the maturity model categorizes the level at which you are doing them.
You are not going to become excellent at these competencies overnight. You need to improve them over time. It is possible to move through the stages faster or slower depending on your company’s level of investment and dedication, but you are not going to go from the Investigate stage straight to the Embed stage. As you work on your CX program, you may improve in one competency more quickly than another, but it is important to remember that these competencies act as a system and they work together.  So, if you are trying to build a sustainable CX program that drives long-term value for the company, you are ultimately going to have to master all six of the competencies to make progress through the five stages of maturity.
Challenge: Maturity Level Assessment 
To determine your organization’s overall CX maturity level and your performance in each of the six XM Competencies, complete our online assessment. Once complete, review your program's strengths and weaknesses and the guidance on how you can mature your program. Here is an example of some of the information you will receive:


XM Maturity Model in Action
Part of becoming familiar with all of this new terminology is learning to define each stage, identify key behaviors, and implement changes to advance your program.
Stage 1: Investigate 


In this stage, the organization does not understand what customer experience is or why it is important. They are not thinking about it; they are not talking about it; they are not actively working to improve it. Companies in this stage do not see CX as a strategic opportunity; they are often focused on other strategic opportunities such as product leadership or cost control. However, they may be doing some CX-adjacent work, such as investigating and improving customer support or relationship management. 
If your company is in this stage of CX maturity, you are going to need to identify the first steps for your CX program given your organization’s business objectives, structure, and skillset. What are the easy, quick wins? 
Do you already have some surveys deployed? Great! Go look at what insights you have already collected. Have your employees complained about rules that inhibit their ability to help customers? Awesome! Get rid of those rules. Get some small wins under your belt, and leverage those wins to demonstrate the value of CX efforts and build buy-in from your senior leaders. That support is going to help you get the resources and investments that you need to begin expanding your CX efforts.
Stage 2: Initiate 


As awareness and support of CX start to build across the company, you advance to the next stage of maturity - Initiate. In this stage, leaders are starting to get on board. A few, isolated CX efforts begin. Usually, these efforts start with chasing customer pain points that have been identified in an existing survey. 
Now that leaders understand the value of CX, executive education kicks-off. This means that executives are starting to learn more about customer experience, and often establish a small, ad-hoc group that is responsible for exploring what the organization needs to focus on to improve the experience it delivers to customers. Together, executives and this group start developing a strategy and roadmap; they start putting some guidelines and guardrails around their CX efforts. 
The organization also tends to put a more formal customer listening program in place. This is important because customer feedback and insights are a very clean, concrete tool that communicates problem areas and opportunities for improvement. This program will help build up that support and buy-in for CX efforts. Take those few people you have converted to the cause and leverage them to build wider understanding and cross-functional support of CX. There will be a few early adopters, but you will need to continue that push to get more leaders on board. IT, HR, Finance, and all other areas of the business should be engaged. Even if these departments are not yet doing much in the CX realm, if you do not get them on board early, you are going to run into challenges down the line when you are trying to make cross-functional improvements to customer experience.
Stage 3: Mobilize 


When a company is in this stage, its executives view CX as a strategic priority for the business. It might not be the first or second priority, but it is on the list. As a result, executives have appointed a full-time CX team that is responsible for distributing insights and driving experience improvements. This is the stage where your CX program really starts to hit its stride. Companies start seriously investing in their voice of the customer efforts, doing some more advanced analytics like predictive, speech, and text. They will start explicitly linking CX to ROI and business results. 
This is also the stage where that Activate competency really begins to power up; where the company starts working on the people side of things with much more purpose and energy. For example, the CX team can start internally sending out customer experience-focused communications and setting up awards and recognition programs that celebrate the employees that are demonstrating customer-centric behaviors. 
Although certain executives and employees are starting to evangelize the CX message, the company itself is not yet making any deeper strategic changes to its underlying culture and operating processes. Companies in this stage tend to be focused on treating the symptoms of bad experiences; fixing individual pain points, but not going after the fundamental or systemic problems that are the ultimate cause of those bad experiences. So, it is fairly common and acceptable for companies to remain in the Mobilize stage for a while! 
In this stage, tremendous improvements can be made to customer experience. Those improvements just tend to be uneven across the company. This means that, in order to move on to the next stage of maturity, the CX team really needs to start working cross-functionally to drive action and improve pain points. The team also needs to educate employees - all employees, not just the frontline - on what good CX looks like and how they can demonstrate customer-centric behaviors in their everyday role, whether they are internally-facing or externally-facing.
Stage 4: Scale 


This stage is really where CX efforts start to move on from just being about finding and fixing those isolated interactions to redesigning and rethinking broader, cross-functional operations and company culture. This is where you start tackling those deeper, systemic problems that result in bad experiences for customers. Companies in this stage have strong CX practices and skills in place, and they are systematically using the insights coming into the organization to identify and improve experiences. 
Often this means that instead of the CX team needing to distribute customer insights, CX tools, and methodology to the rest of the organization, the rest of the organization is now knocking on the CX team’s door asking them for customer insights and guidance. The entire workforce is invested in improving the experience that the company delivers to customers. Executives are all-in on customer experience in this stage. The CX team is operating with a formalized mission, vision, and governance structure. The company is redesigning its processes based on customer insights and has thoughtfully designed its metrics program to measure the progress of its CX efforts and the impact those efforts are having on loyalty and business objectives. Companies have ingrained CX into their processes, especially their people processes like hiring, performance management, and incentive systems. This encourages the entire workforce to improve customers’ experiences. 
Consistency is vital in order to advance your program to the final stage of maturity. You need to use your customer feedback, insights, and metrics consistently to improve experiences and make strategic decisions. In this stage of maturity, a lot of CX work shifts to a change management challenge - overcoming organizational tendencies and middle manager apathy. What companies often find in this stage is that they still have pockets of leaders sprinkled throughout the organization who are resisting the CX message. It is important to get those leaders on board or at least make their objections less audible and problematic in order to move to the fifth and final stage of maturity.
Stage 5: Embed 


In the Embed stage, CX is an absolutely integral part of your company’s culture and operating processes. It is infused into everyday decisions and practices and is not managed as a separate activity. It is not talked about as a separate thing, it is just the way the company operates. Every employee from every role maintains a customer-centric mindset and demonstrates customer-centric behaviors, and these mindsets and behaviors are reinforced and sustained by structures and processes that the organization has put in place. 
CX is embedded into processes and decisions about which projects to fund or which budget requests to grant. Essentially, when a company is in this ideal, difficult-to-obtain stage, no one inside the organization will ever say, “CX is not my job.” Everyone feels a sense of empowerment and ownership for the experience the company delivers to customers. 
In fact, because these CX skills are distributed across the organization, the centralized CX team often becomes really small again. They become mainly responsible for the overarching CX strategy and goals, for coordinating CX training, tools, and methodologies across the organization, and enforcing company-wide standards to prevent any business groups from delivering off-brand interactions. They act like a hub to connect people with the relevant business groups or centers of excellence that are best equipped to help. 
It is worth noting that you are not done optimizing CX simply because you have achieved stage 5 of maturity. Your customers are dynamic; your company is dynamic; the technology that you use is dynamic; the market you are in is dynamic. To sustain differentiation, you have to continue to work on understanding who your customers are, what they expect from interactions with your organization, what your business needs are, and what your position in the market. If CX becomes a thing that leaders can simply check-off and say, “We are done!” chances are your organization is going to shift its focus and lose ground in this area over time. To maintain this level of CX maturity, the organization has to be enabled to continuously listen, to deliver insights, and to rapidly adapt to the needs and expectations of your customers.
Advancing to Higher Levels of Maturity
Organizations pass through these five stages of maturity, from Investigate to Embed, on their XM journey as they master the six XM competencies - and it is a journey! In the early stages, CX teams can progress in isolated parts of the organization without creating too much disruption enterprise-wide. But to truly mature and create sustainable CX success, you need commitment and discipline in order to embed CX across functions, teams, systems, tools, and departments. 
A quick way to outline the organizational shift that you need to see as you transition through Stage 3, Mobilize, to higher stages of maturity represents what we call the shift from “fluff to tough.”


	Fluff
	Tough
	Belief
	“Great CX is important to our success!”
	“Our brand and values require great CX”
	Focus
	CX improvement projects
	Sustainable customer-centric operations
	CX Team
	Drive change across the company
	Empower change agents across the company
	Leadership
	Executives support and endorse CX efforts
	Executives embody and reinforce customer-centric values
	VoC
	Closed-loop VoC program
	Ongoing insights from integration of X-data and O-data
	Culture
	Employees engaged as needed to support initiatives
	Employee engagement embedded into HR practices
	Metrics
	CX-specific dashboards
	Balanced operational scorecards, including CX
	The early stages of maturity, “fluff,” focus on CX improvements around the business without addressing underlying operational and cultural issues. The higher stages of maturity, “tough,” are about changing how the company operates and creating a more customer-centric culture.
Understanding Types of Customer XM Programs
Now that you have an understanding of the Customer Experience Management discipline and the XM Maturity model, you can learn about the specific programs that organizations can implement in order to perfect their Customer Experience.
In this article: 
* Relational Studies
* Customer Care Feedback
* Post Location Visit Feedback
* Digital Feedback
Relational Studies
A relational study is designed to evaluate the overall health of the relationships that your organization has with its customers. Relational studies are most prominently performed in the Business to Business (B2B) space, where a business is able to measure the overall relationship of an account by sampling many stakeholders. Accounts that are likely to churn can be identified through a successful relational study, and steps can be taken to mitigate the risk.
Relational studies are sent to customers on a regular basis, and not after a specific transaction. An annual basis is the most common option, but the cadence can be more often if your business is one where churn happens more frequently. Because they are not sent after a specific transaction, relational studies can measure the full picture of your customer experience, instead of just one specific channel.
Relational studies aim to measure a few things:
* The overall experience the customer has working with your organization
* The customer’s future intent in terms of likelihood to renew
* How much the customer trusts your organization with their business
* Strengths and weaknesses of your organization’s customer experience by understanding satisfaction at each touchpoint
* Issues that are important to your customers that are communicated through open-ended feedback
Customer Care Feedback
A customer reaching out to your organization in order to get help can be considered a moment of truth for your customer experience. If your team is able to solve a customer’s issue or resolve their frustrations, their perception of your organization will improve. It may even improve to a level higher than before the issue was found since they will see that you will go above and beyond to ensure their satisfaction. 
As an example, imagine that you order a pair of shoes from an online retailer. Now, say that the package was lost or sent to the wrong location. Upon reaching out to the retailer’s customer care team, they offer to re-send the package, as well as giving you a voucher for a free pair of shoes to be used in the future. Since the retailer heard your issue and provided a satisfactory resolution, you will be likely to have stronger loyalty.
For this reason, it is incredibly important to capture feedback from customers after they reach out to your customer care team. You will use studies like this to not only rate the customer’s satisfaction with the interaction, but to confirm that their issue is actually solved to the customer’s expectations. If it is not, a ticketing system must be set up that can route the ongoing issue to someone on your team empowered to solve the issue. 
Additionally, customer care feedback is an essential tool in training your own customer care team. A feedback system that maps responses to a specific employee that worked with the customer can be used to surface training opportunities for specific individuals. Feedback from these interactions should be made available to managers who can coach their reports on providing a quality customer experience.
Post-Location Visit Feedback
It is also important to gather feedback from your customers after more typical interactions with your business. If your business is a brick and mortar shop where customers buy goods in person, it is important to capture feedback on their experience in the store. You will want to understand how effective your employees were in assisting a customer, how easy it was to navigate the store and find what they were looking for, and whether they enjoyed the overall experience. You can use a study like this to surface issues like a checkout staff that needs training on their friendliness, or unexpected insights like music being played too loud.
This use case can be broadened to other industries. At an airline, you will want to capture feedback on a passenger’s overall experience, from the security line to the flight. For a healthcare provider, you can gauge the overall experience a patient had while receiving treatment. 
If the transaction is one where a customer’s email address or phone number is captured, an automation can be set up to send the customer a survey shortly after their experience. Or, you can print survey links or QR codes on receipts that customers receive after buying a good in person.
Additionally, social review site data should be used in tandem with feedback surveys. This data can be brought into Qualtrics and included with your survey data so that you are viewing all transaction-based customer feedback in one place.
Digital Feedback
Our final use case centers around the digital experience. More and more business is being conducted through digital channels, like a website or mobile app. So, it is extremely important to capture feedback on the experiences customers have on these channels. Persistent feedback tabs can be placed to give customers an option to provide feedback at any point during their experience. More targeted invitations can also be placed on pages or sections of the website or app where you would like to learn more. If you know that there are certain tasks that customers have trouble completing, you can dive deep into learning why.
In addition, you can make requests for feedback after transactions have been completed. You can either use an invitation that appears on the website or app as soon as the transaction has been completed, or you can send them an email at a later date.
With digital feedback, it is important to understand the overall satisfaction the customer had with the experience. But it is equally important to understand how easy it was to complete their task. One of the biggest draws of completing transactions digitally is its ease and convenience. You need to ensure that the digital tools your organization leverages are truly providing this experience.
Lesson 2 - Capturing Customer Experience Metrics
Incorporating Best Practices in a Customer XM Survey
Overview of Basic Survey Building
In this section of the course, you will learn about building surveys to capture Customer Experience data. In the Qualtrics Platform Essentials Certification course, you learned about the basics of building surveys in Qualtrics. You will now apply that knowledge to the CX discipline. If you need to review any of these features, please return to the Qualtrics Platform Essentials course.
As you log in to Qualtrics, you’ll arrive at the Homepage. The Homepage displays all your active surveys, workflows, tickets, and more. You can learn more about the Homepage components in this basic overview. 


The Projects page is where all of your projects are stored and can be accessed. It is also where new projects can be created. Most commonly, your projects are surveys or dashboards. 


Qualtrics provides a wide variety of Question types. In CX, you’ll primarily use basic question types like Multiple choice, Text entry, and Net promoter score®.
You should be familiar with basic question and answer options such as Force response.


The Rich Content Editor is where you can add styling to your survey questions and answers, and where you can insert content like an image. 


The Look and feel menu is where you can apply styling to your entire survey. You can apply a theme containing your organization’s branding, modify interactive elements of the survey, or change the text font and color. 


Use Skip logic to skip respondents to a later point in your survey if they select a specified answer choice on a question. 


Use Display Logic to create conditions under which a question or answer choice can be seen. 


Embedded Data are additional fields that you collect about a respondent, beyond survey questions. Most often, these are operational data fields that are stored in a mailing list.


Piped Text is dynamic text that is brought into a survey or email message. The text can be pulled from other survey questions, or from information stored in a mailing list of contacts. 


The Survey Options menu is where you can make some adjustments to a survey’s behavior.


When you finish building a survey, you will Publish it in order to activate and distribute it. When publishing, you’ll see ExpertReview recommendations that advise you on changes you can make to your survey, to improve the quality of the data you collect.




Structure of a Customer XM Survey
While the use cases of Customer Experience research may differ, many surveys that you build will follow a similar structure. You will learn about each component of this structure, from the beginning of the survey to the end.
In this article: 
* The Survey Preamble
* Collection of an Overall Metric
* Key Drivers
* Open-Ended Feedback
* Operational Data
The Survey Preamble
A survey preamble should be a short passage of text that opens the survey. It provides the customer with an idea of what to expect while taking the survey — like the expected time commitment and a brief statement of the purpose of the survey. It should also serve as a warm greeting that thanks the customer for taking the time to provide feedback. After reading a preamble, a customer should be more comfortable with providing feedback because they know that it won’t take much of their time and their voice will be heard.


Most organizations put a version of their survey preamble in the survey’s invitation email. If the email inviting them to provide feedback doesn’t set some expectations, the customer won’t click your survey and see the preamble you’ve written. It’s important to even set survey length expectations when sending the link through a less common channel, like printed on a receipt.
Collection of an Overall Metric
The first question a respondent should answer is your overall metric. This is a metric that key stakeholders at your organization will use to track the performance of your CX program. This metric should be a common metric that allows for easy comparison over time and to competitor businesses. In some cases, employee compensation might even be tied to this metric. Now, briefly consider the two most common options for an overall metric:
* Net Promoter Score® (NPS®)
* Customer satisfaction (CSAT)
NPS® measures how likely a customer is to recommend your organization to a friend or colleague. It has been shown that a high score in NPS® correlates with less customer churn and more revenue. One reason that NPS® is so popular is that it uses a very rigid question structure. This makes the NPS® score easy to compare to competitors and benchmark over time.
The question text of an NPS® question is: “On a scale from 0-10, how likely are you to recommend [Your organization] to a friend or colleague?”


Respondents are then broken into 3 groups based on their response:
* 0-6: Detractor
* 7-8: Passive
* 9-10: Promoter
The NPS® score is then calculated as (% of promoters - % of detractors). This score, which can range from -100 to 100 is what is commonly reported.
Because NPS® aims to capture a customer’s overall relationship with your organization, its use is most appropriate for relational studies. 
We do not recommend using this question in post-transaction feedback, when a customer is fixated on one specific interaction, instead of their experiences with your organization as a whole.
Consider the following table which lists further pros and cons of NPS®.
Pros
	Cons
	Easy to understand, thus more likely to be used and discussed
	Often used as a transactional metric, but lacks diagnostic capabilities when used in this manner
	Separates high scores (Promoters) from low scores (Detractors) rather than dealing with averages
	Too much effort is focused on eliminating Detractors instead of creating Promoters
	Used globally
	Requires a large sample size (1000+)
	Likelihood to recommend is often correlated with business objectives
	Other metrics are often more strongly correlated with business objectives
	Broad appeal
	Regional differences and customer segment differences can vary widely
	The other overall metric you can capture is customer satisfaction (CSAT). This is a simple question that asks customers to rate their overall satisfaction with the experience. This question is usually posed on a five or seven-point scale, where the scale increments from Extremely Dissatisfied to Extremely Satisfied. 
CSAT should be used in transactional studies as it can be worded to be specific to one interaction. CSAT can also be used as a key metric in a relational study for an organization that finds that the metric more closely aligns with their business objectives and strategy than NPS®.


Because of the variances in the way this question is structured from organization to organization, CSAT is often reported as a percentage of customers who are satisfied. On a five-point scale, this would be the customers who select the top two options, also known as a top-two box, while on a seven-point scale, this would be the top three options. This metric is considerably easier to compare.
When asking a CSAT question, be sure to pose the question in the context of the specific transaction. So if you are fielding a post-digital purchase survey, the question could read “Please rate your satisfaction or dissatisfaction with the experience you had purchasing a pair of shoes from our website.” This will allow the customer to recall the interaction and ensure they are providing feedback on the interaction you expect.
Key Drivers
The next set of questions on a typical customer experience survey are known as the key drivers. These are the specific elements of the customer experience that impact the customer’s overall satisfaction. Identifying and acting on problematic key drivers is how you improve your customer experience. You may see that you have a lower than expected score in an overall metric, but it is crucial to identify an aspect that is driving that score. You can then take action on that aspect and track your overall metric to see if you notice an improvement.
Depending on the type of study you are fielding, your key drivers will vary. For a digital study, you’ll want to understand how easy it was to complete the transaction. For a post customer care study, you’ll want to learn more about the representative the customer worked with, by inquiring about that representative’s friendliness, knowledge, and effectiveness in communicating a solution. For a physical location feedback survey, you’ll want to ask about the employees the customer worked with, and the overall atmosphere of the location.  For a relational study, you may ask about the specific channels the customer has used to work with your organization.


Each question in a series of key drivers should follow the same structure. Most often, key driver questions ask the customer to rate their satisfaction with a specific aspect. Make sure to use consistent formatting, not just with the other key drivers, but with the overall CSAT question.
So, how should you determine which key drivers make sense for your program? As you’ll read next, open-ended questions can be used to learn what your customers care about and can inform you of what driver metrics to track. In addition to open-ended response data, you can also analyze support interaction transcripts, public reviews, or social media to see what topics customers often think about.
Open-Ended Feedback
The final aspect of a typical CX survey is open-ended feedback, where a customer can write about their frustrations or praise. Up to this point in a survey, a customer is able to provide feedback, but only on the drivers you’ve identified. If a customer has frustration with an aspect of your service that isn’t called out in your other questions, they can raise that concern here. Open-ended feedback allows customers to define what is really important to them.


You may be intimidated by analyzing these responses, as you might not have time to read through every word. Qualtrics offers Text iQ analysis that allows you to categorize these responses and see what topics customers are mostly talking about.
In order to receive the best possible text data, it’s important to ask a specific question. Instead of just asking customers to provide comments, you can ask them what they’d like to see improved the next time they interact with your team. It’s also wise to make these questions optional. Many customers providing feedback won’t have comments to provide, so you shouldn’t require them to write a response here.
Open-ended questions can also help you determine your key driver questions. If you are building a new study and do not know which drivers you’d like to measure, you can omit them at first. After collecting responses and reading through the open-ended comments, you might notice that many customers are talking about the same aspect. Perhaps for a retail store, many customers are remarking that it is hard to find what they are looking for. You can then consider adding a key driver question related to the ease of finding goods so that you can track how it correlates with your key metric and see how it improves as you make changes.
Operational Data
Thus far, each type of information you have learned about is Experience Data (X Data). In order to have an impactful Customer XM program, you’ll need to pair your X Data with Operational Data. Operational Data is additional information you’ve stored about your customers that can be brought into the survey’s dataset to improve your ability to find interesting insights. Common examples of operational data include:
* Demographic information: This will allow you to find trends in certain geographic areas or with a specific type of customer
* Company information: For a B2B relational survey, the customer the respondent works for must be included in order to visualize your responses by customer. Other information such as the respondent’s business unit within the customer may also be useful.
* Employees worked with: In a customer care follow up survey, this could be the representative they worked with. Or with a B2B relational study, this could be the customer success manager or account executive who is responsible for your organization’s relationship with that customer. Including this information will make it easier to route issues and action items to the right person.
* Purchase history: This could allow you to see if satisfaction is lower or higher for customers that use a specific product or service.
In most cases, the operational data fields you collect won’t be seen by the customer as they complete the survey. These fields are most useful for you when building a dashboard to visualize your results. You can use these fields as filters, or as fields to find trends in all of the X Data metrics you’ve collected in the survey.
Challenge: Create a Survey 
To complete all the challenges in this certification course, you must first create a Qualtrics training account. 
To create a training account:
1. Click the profile icon in the top right corner and click Training Account.
2. After reading this page, click Create my training account.
3. Once your account has been created, agree to the terms and conditions and click Let’s go.
4. Log in to your new Qualtrics account to complete all challenges in this course. You can access this account at a later point by clicking the profile icon > Training Account and logging in again.
 
In this challenge, you will create a new survey. Referring to the previous section, build either a relational study or a post-location visit transactional study. Choose the study type that more closely aligns with the goals of your CX program. When creating the survey, write questions as if you are capturing data for your own organization.
1. After logging into your training account, create a new survey project.
2. Select an overall metric to base your study on, and create a survey question to capture that metric. 


	Tip
	Recall that an overall satisfaction metric is more important for transactional studies. NPS is more appropriate for relational studies.
	3. Write a series of 4 to 5 key driver questions to capture data on satisfaction with a specific and actionable aspect of the service your organization provides.
4. Apply Question randomization to your key driver questions so that each respondent only sees two questions.


	Tip
	To access the Question randomization menu, click on the Block that contains your key driver questions and select it from the Block behavior section.
	5. Add a Text entry question that captures feedback on a specific aspect of your customer service. If you’d like, add Display logic based on the answer to another question so that only some customers see this question.
6. Add a new question at the beginning of the survey that asks if customers would like to participate. If they select No, apply Skip logic to remove them from the survey.
7. Add a preamble to the beginning of the survey that gives customers a sense of the types of questions they will be asked and how long the survey will take to complete.
8. Use the Rich Content Editor to modify styling elements of the preamble and any other questions. Consider bolding keywords or phrases within your questions.
9. Use the Look and feel menu to apply your organization’s branding to the survey. Consider using appropriate text and background colors and add your organization’s logo.
10. Add a Custom End of survey message that thanks respondents for their participation in the survey.
11. Publish your survey. View ExpertReview to see if there are any improvements you can make to your survey.
 
Check your work: 
1. Preview your survey to ensure it is working as expected. Be sure to note the appearance of both the desktop and mobile versions of the survey.
2. On your first attempt, indicate on the first question that you would not like to participate. Ensure you are immediately skipped to the end of the survey.
3. On the second attempt, indicate on the first question that you would like to participate. Ensure you see the following questions.
4. If you have added display logic, use multiple previews to ensure the conditions work as expected.
5. Verify that your custom end of survey message is seen as expected.
Implementing Survey Methodology Best Practices
Now that you’ve learned about the typical structure of a CX survey, it’s time to consider some best practices of survey methodology to ensure that you are receiving accurate and actionable feedback from your respondents.
In this article: 
* Survey Length
* Recommended Question Types
* Best Practices for Questions
* Best Practices for Answer Scales
Survey Length
With a CX survey, it’s very important to keep the survey length top of mind. Customers are providing their time in order to give feedback, so you need to ensure that your survey is short and to the point. It’s important to determine exactly what information you need and keep your questions focused on that requirement. 
You may find that you need to iterate your survey to keep it as short as possible. If a new potential key driver emerges, it makes sense to create a question to capture information on it. But, you’ll want to consider removing another question that you aren’t as interested in so that your survey doesn’t continue to grow.
The recommended maximum survey length varies depending on the type of study. A relational survey that is only completed once per year could take up to 10 minutes, but a post transactional study sent every time a customer makes a purchase or reaches out to your customer care team shouldn’t take longer than 3 to 5 minutes to complete on average.
Recommended Question Types
The Qualtrics survey platform does provide a wide variety of question types. With CX surveys, we recommend using the basic types that customers are used to seeing. Most CX surveys primarily use Multiple Choice questions to capture overall metrics and key drivers. The Text Entry type should be used for any open-ended questions. Be sure to give customers plenty of room to type by using a larger box. Descriptive Text items can be used to create a preamble.
Matrix Tables can be used, but be careful. A large matrix table will encourage customers to straight-line by quickly selecting the same choice for each row, not carefully considering each item. In general, it is advisable to split a matrix table into multiple-choice questions in order to get the most accurate data.
Finally, there is a specific Net Promoter Score® question type that you’ll want to use if you’ve chosen to include an NPS® question. This question behaves like a multiple-choice question but is programmed to make calculating an NPS® score and displaying NPS® groups easy when building your dashboard.
Best Practices for Questions
There are a few best practices to consider when writing your survey questions and answers. Following this guidance will prevent your data from being biased and will ensure that customers clearly understand each question you are asking.
Avoid leading questions. These are questions that contain unnecessary wording in the question text that influence a respondent to answer in a specific manner. For example, a question that reads: “Our customer care team works tirelessly to meet your needs. Please rate your satisfaction with your recent interaction.” may influence respondents to not answer honestly because we are telling them how hard our team works. Instead, simply ask for the customer’s satisfaction without adding the unnecessary detail in the first sentence.
Avoid double-barreled questions. These are questions that ask about two separate concepts at the same time. For instance, if you have a question that reads “Please rate your satisfaction with the knowledge and professionalism of the representative you worked with”, you should split this into two questions, one focusing on the representative’s knowledge and one focusing on their professionalism. Following this practice will make it much easier to determine what action to take if the results on a question are lower than expected.
Use a simple and clear word choice. It’s imperative that respondents understand exactly what your question is asking the first time they read it. Using an advanced or uncommon vocabulary may make your question difficult to comprehend. Be sure to avoid using jargon that may seem clear to you, but won’t be clear to the average respondent.
Best Practices for Answer Choices
Now, you can take a look at the answer scales of survey questions. There are some important best practices to follow in order to obtain the highest quality data.
First, make sure your question scales center around a midpoint. For CSAT questions, we recommend using 5 or 7 point scales, and that’s not an accident. There should be a midpoint value that corresponds to a neutral feeling, with an equal number of scale points on each side. Including a midpoint is important to capture those respondents who do not have a strong feeling about the question you are asking. For a CSAT question, you’ll have a neutral choice in the middle with an equal number of “dissatisfied” and “satisfied choices.” If you have more choices on one side of the scale than the other, you’ll have more respondents select the side with more choices.
Next, consider the direction of your answer choices, whether they go from negative to positive, or positive to negative. The most important factor to consider here is that it is recommended each question has a scale that goes in the same direction. If the first question starts with “Extremely Dissatisfied” and ends with “Extremely Satisfied,” then the negative end of the scale should be the first choice for each question. In Qualtrics, it will be easier to display your data in an intuitive way if negative choices appear first, so it is generally recommended to follow this guidance. However, it is permissible to lead with positive choices if your organization has done that traditionally.
It is also important to make sure that your answer choices are tailored to the question being asked. If a question asks how satisfied a customer is, the answer scale should contain the word “satisfied.” If the question asks how easy something was to complete, the answer scales should include “Very Easy” or “Very Difficult.”
If you ask any multiple-choice questions that aren’t on a defined scale, such as a question that asks customers to select the products they’ve purchased, you should randomize the order of the choices. Respondents are more likely to select the first choice they read, so as long as there isn’t a natural order to your choices, randomizing their order will reduce bias because different respondents will see different items at the top of the list.
Finally, avoid including “Don’t Know” answer choices on most questions. Each respondent should have an opinion on basic CX questions asking them to rate their satisfaction with their experience. If they don’t have a strong feeling, the neutral choice in the middle of the scale is present for that reason. Including a “Don’t Know” choice invites respondents to skip questions and will prevent you from understanding customer feedback quite as well.
If you are interested in learning more about survey methodology, please watch the Implementing Research Methodology series on XM Basecamp.
Building an Advanced Survey
Introduction to the Survey flow
In this article: 
* Accessing the Survey flow
* Reading the Survey flow
* Editing the Survey flow
Accessing the Survey flow
The Survey flow tool maps the survey experience of your respondents. This is very helpful when you need to structure your survey beyond a simple line of questions. The Survey flow tells the story of everything that happens to a respondent once they click on the survey link.
Access the Survey flow in the Survey builder by selecting the option in the navigation bar at the top.


Reading the Survey flow
To read the Survey flow, it is important to understand the following:
* The gray line with arrows on the left links the blocks together. This is the “flow.”
* The flow always proceeds from top to bottom.


The Survey flow above is easy to follow:
1. Starting at the top, respondents will first be presented the Introduction Block and all 3 questions in it.
2. After that, they will be presented the Demographics Block and all 4 questions in it.
3. Respondents will then be presented the Research Topics Block, where they will see 3 questions.
4. Finally, at the end, there are no more elements in the flow, so the survey session ends and follows the settings for End of Survey block in the Survey builder.
Editing the Survey flow
When you first view the Survey flow, you will only see the Block(s) of questions you have already created. However, here you can add other elements to the Survey flow to create different survey experiences. This can include respondents being redirected to different blocks of questions, being tagged with additional information, having a condition randomized, or ending the survey early. To create these experiences, you will need to add elements and organize them accordingly in the Survey flow.
Adding an element is done by clicking Add a New Element Here at the end of any grey arrow pathway or by clicking Add Below on any element.


From there, click on the element you want to add in the menu that appears.


We will be going into detail on some of these elements throughout this module.
Moving an element can be done either by clicking on an element and using your arrow keys on your keyboard, or by clicking Move on an element, dragging it to its new location, and dropping it.




Duplicating Elements 
As you create different pathways in the Survey flow, you may have a situation where an element needs to appear in multiple pathways. Use the Duplicate feature on any element to create another instance of it.






	Note
	If you duplicate an element with other elements nested within it (for example, a Branch, which is covered in a later article), everything nested within the element will also be duplicated.
	After you make edits to the Survey flow, you have two options:
* Click Apply to keep your changes.
* Click Revert and return to the question editor without making changes.


Organizing Survey flows with Groups
In this article: 
* Utilizing the Group Element
Utilizing the Group Element
As the size and complexity of your survey increases, you may have a collection of elements you want to keep in a fixed order, but will need to move around the Survey flow. The Group element allows you to do this easily while keeping your other elements in order.
Unlike other elements, Groups do not have any effect on the survey experience itself. They are only meant to help with organizing your Survey flow.
To create a Group and add elements to it:
1. Add a new element and select Group.
2. Click on the Group and name it.


3. Move the desired elements so they are nested within the Group.


When moving larger Groups, we recommend selecting the Collapse option on the Group element to better view the rest of your survey.
Creating Pathways with Branches
In this article: 
* Utilizing Branches
* Branches vs. Display Logic
Utilizing Branches
Branches use conditions to guide respondents through blocks and other elements defined in the Survey flow. Use Branches when only certain respondents should see particular Blocks, be directed out of the survey, or be tagged with additional data. Branches create pathways in your survey, and are one of the most commonly-used elements in the Survey flow.
In the example below, we want respondents to see the block titled "children" if they previously indicated that they have children in the demographics block


Respondents will see the Demographics Block, and will then get to the Branch. If they meet the condition of having children, then they will be directed to the Children Block and then brought back to the Travel Plans Block. If they do not meet the condition, then they will not follow the branch and instead see the Travel Plans Block immediately.
Conditions in Branch Logic are created the exact same way as conditions in Display Logic are (covered in the Qualtrics Platform Essentials certification course). You can still create multiple conditions using “And if” / “Or if” operators as well as use Logic Sets.


In the example above, we want to show the Amusement Park Block to respondents who meet one of the following conditions:
If the respondent has children
OR IF 
the respondent has no children AND they plan to travel to an amusement park


	Note
	You can nest any element within a Branch, including other Branches. When you move a Branch in the Survey flow, all elements nested within it move with it. This also applies to deleting a Branch- deleting a Branch will also delete all elements nested within it.
	Branches vs. Display Logic
A common question that comes up is when someone should use Branch instead of Display Logic. They are very similar, but each has their own advantages.
Branches are helpful when you need to either show or hide an entire block of questions to respondents based on a condition. You could apply the same Display Logic to 20 consecutive questions, for example, but using a Branch to accomplish the same outcome is much more efficient. Branches can also be used with other Survey flow elements besides Blocks of questions. Display Logic can only be applied to questions.
Display Logic, on the other hand, is more precise and can help make customized experiences within a Block. It also has the ability to display or hide a question within the same page of a survey. Branches can only operate with Blocks in this regard, which create Page Breaks and do not allow for displaying questions on the same page.
Customizing End of Survey Experiences
In this article: 
* Utilizing End of Survey Elements
* End of Survey Options
* End of Survey Best Practices
Utilizing End of Survey Elements
In the Survey builder, within the End of Survey block, you can control the survey ending experience for all respondents (covered in Qualtrics Platform Essentials). However, you may have surveys where you need to provide survey endings to certain respondents that are different from what is set up in the Survey builder. You also may need to direct respondents out of the survey before reaching the end of your survey. This could be because they do not fit the demographics you are looking for, or answered “no” to a consent form question at the beginning.
The End of Survey element allows you to customize different survey endings for respondents. By adding this element into the Survey flow and nesting it within a Branch, you can create different endpoints in your survey.


In this example, any respondents that answer “No” to the consent question in the Introduction Block will meet the Branch condition and be redirected to the End of Survey element. Their survey session will end immediately and they will not see the rest of the survey.
To accomplish this in the Survey flow:
1. Add an element and select Branch
2. Add a condition to the Branch


3. Add a new element and select End of Survey
4. Move the End of Survey element so that it is nested within the Branch


End of Survey Options
As mentioned earlier, an End of Survey element will provide whatever survey ending experience that is set in the End of Survey block of the Survey builder. To override these settings for the respondents that are directed to a particular End of Survey element, click Customize on the element and check the Override Survey Options box.




Many of the options available to customize End of Survey elements are the same as what is available in the End of survey message menu. These include:
* Default end of survey message
* Custom end of survey message
* Redirect to a URL
* Send additional thank you email
* Do NOT record personal information (“Anonymize Response” in Survey Options)
* Show Response Summary
In addition to these options, there are several more options available:
* Do not increment quota counts: If you are using Quotas, responses that are directed to this End of Survey element will not count towards them, even if they did meet the condition to do so.
* Flag Response As: This option works in tandem with a built-in field (Q_TerminateFlag) that will allow you to track which responses were screened out early due to not meeting a demographic or due to exceeding a Quota count for a certain condition.
* Do NOT record survey response: If you do not want to have any record of a response from certain survey takers, select this option. We do not recommend this option in most cases, as partial data can still be useful in research.
Once you are done making edits to an End of Survey Element, click OK. A checkmark will appear next to the Customize button to indicate the element has been edited.
End of Survey Best Practices
If respondents are being directed out of the survey early because they do not match the demographics you are looking for (or any similar reason), use a custom end of survey message to explain that to these respondents. It can be a confusing experience for someone to begin a survey and then be told they are done after answering just a few questions.
If you use the Do NOT record personal information option for an End of Survey element, it is helpful to let your respondents know as soon as possible in the survey that their identifying information will not be tied to their responses. This can influence how respondents answer in these situations.
Using the Redirect to URL option is a great opportunity to showcase your organization to respondents by automatically navigating them to your website after submitting a survey response. You could also redirect customers to a review site to provide a testimonial for your company after taking the survey.


	Note
	No end of survey message will be displayed to respondents that are redirected to a URL.
	Incorporating Additional Information with Embedded Data
In this article: 
* Utilizing Embedded Data
* Setting Embedded Data Values
* Variable Types
Utilizing Embedded Data
In addition to the answers respondents provide in your surveys, there is often additional data that you will need to incorporate into the survey, analysis and reporting of your research projects. This is Operational Data; the data your organization or company already has collected from any source. The Embedded Data element in the Survey flow allows you to leverage supplementary data in a multitude of ways within a project.


Embedded Data is structured into two parts: a field name, and a value. Field names describe related variables (gender, school, degree, title). For example, a field named “Country” can have one of multiple values, like “India”, “Japan”, or “Kenya”.
Embedded Data Examples
	Field Names (Variables)
	Values
	Color
	Red, Black, Yellow...
	Status
	Active, Inactive
	Social_Media(Site that respondent was referred from)
	Twitter, Instagram, LinkedIn...
	Job_Title(Collected from a question or a mailing list)
	CEO, Professor, Analyst...
	Number_Items_Purchased
	0, 1, 2...
	Some additional items to take note of for structuring Embedded Data:
* While Embedded Data fields are not always case-sensitive, we do strongly recommend matching cases since some exceptions may exist for certain organizations. Additionally, other software platforms your organization could integrate with Qualtrics may not be as lenient.
* Avoid unusual characters like emojis, periods (.), and hashtags (#) when naming your Embedded Data, as they will not appear properly in parts of the platform.
* Remove spaces in the names and values of the Embedded Data you use. When Qualtrics communicates with other platforms, spaces can cause issues with encoding the data. We recommend using underscores to prevent the need to encode spaces in any possible integrations you use. For example, “DateOfBirth” or “Date_of_Birth” is better to use than “Date of Birth” as a field name.
To set up an Embedded Data field in the Survey flow:
1. Add a new element and select Embedded Data
2. Click Create New Field or Choose From Dropdown and type your field name, or select an existing field from the dropdown (dropdown choices will be covered later in this article)


3. If applicable, set a value by clicking on the blue Set A Value Now text


4. If you would like to add additional fields, click Add a New Field to include additional fields in the element


Setting Embedded Data Values
Embedded Data values can be set via three methods:
* Manually in the Survey flow
* From Outside Sources (Mailing List, URL, etc.)
* From Built-In Variables
Manually in the Survey flow 
Create values manually to add completely new variables to your data. By doing so the same value will be assigned in all responses that come to this element in the Survey Flow.


In addition to typing in a value, you can also insert Piped Text into a value (Piped text is covered in an earlier article). This provides the option to pull in dynamic values for Embedded Data fields, such as a response to a question within the survey.


In the example above, there is Piped Text inserted in the value box that is pulling in the respondents' answers from where they typed in their first name and their last name. The value of the field "Full_Name" will then contain a single value of these answers combined.
You can access Piped Text options via the blue dropdown menu when setting a value.


From Outside Sources (Mailing List, URL, etc.) 
Oftentimes, the value of your Embedded Data field is stored outside the survey, such as in a Mailing List or appended to the end of the respondent’s survey link.
Mailing Lists are used for distributing surveys in Qualtrics. As an example, in addition to a respondent’s name and email address, there may also be information included in the Mailing List on their job title, region, and enrollment status.


If this Mailing List is stored in Qualtrics, then these fields are available to include in the dataset of any survey each respondent completes. Adding an Embedded Data element in the Survey Flow allows you to pull this information into a survey response.
Notice that to the right of a field there is text saying “Value will be set from Panel or URL”. A “Panel” is another word for a Mailing List. This tells you that you do not need to click on the Set A Value Now option.


As long as the field name listed in the Embedded Data element exactly matches the field name in the Mailing List, then Qualtrics will automatically pull in the value for each respondent into their survey response.
If you only want to include a couple of fields from your Mailing List in a survey, you can manually type those field names in. If you want to include all fields from a Mailing List in your survey’s data set, there is a tool that allows you to accomplish this quickly.
To include all fields from a Mailing List:
1. Add a new element and select Embedded Data
2. Click Add from Contacts in the element or select the option under the blue dropdown arrow in the field text box


3. Select the Mailing List you would like to pull field names from. These fields will appear in the popup once you select your list.


4. Click OK


	Note
	If you have XM Directory, this process will populate all Embedded Data fields in the directory, not just the mailing list. From there, you'll be able to select which Embedded Data fields from the directory you'd like to pull into your survey.
	

	Tip
	As a best practice, we recommend placing Embedded Data elements that are set from a mailing list at the beginning of the Survey Flow. This allows them to be easily referenced and potentially used in the survey with Piped Text, Branch Logic, Display Logic, and Quotas.
	You can still bring Embedded Data into a survey from an outside source without using a Mailing List. This is more common when you are posting an anonymous link on different websites or are working with a third-party panel company to manage your respondents on a different platform.
Recall from earlier that to the right of a field there is text saying “Value will be set from Panel or URL”. The “URL” is referring to the survey link. You can add Embedded Data field names and values to the end of the survey link via query strings.


If you would like to learn how to format and use query strings with Qualtrics, please view our support page for additional information.
From Built-In Variables 
The last method used for setting Embedded Data values is accessing fields that Qualtrics automatically computes on its own each time a survey is taken. These fields are known as Survey Metadata.
To include a Survey Metadata field:
1. Add a new element and select Embedded Data
2. Click Create New Field or Choose From Dropdown
3. Click on the blue dropdown arrow and highlight the Survey Metadata option


4. Select your desired option from the dropdown
When these fields are selected, there is no Set a Value Now option. This is because these fields are reserved for Qualtrics to set the value for. Instead, it says "Reserved Embedded Data fields cannot have custom values".
Some of the more common Survey Metadata fields used include “Referer” and “Q_URL”.
* Referer will provide the URL the respondent came from to access the survey. For example, if a respondent clicks on a survey link while at www.qualtrics.com, then the Qualtrics website will appear as the value for this field. For many surveys, however, you will see a URL for the email provider the respondent uses.
* Q_URL will display the link the respondent used to access the survey. This is helpful for troubleshooting setups that require data to be carried over via the URL. Most of the time, this value will be the Anonymous Link or an Individual Link emailed to them.
To see the detailed definitions of the other Survey Metadata fields, please view our support page to learn more.


	Tip
	As you begin adding Embedded Data fields to your Survey flow, be sure to utilize the Existing Embedded Data option under the blue dropdown arrow of the field text box to easily copy field names you previously used in your project.


	Variable Types
Variable types provide instruction on how to interpret an Embedded Data field within Qualtrics. For example, the “Last_Month_Traveled” field for a respondent may have a value of “June”. While this is a text value, we also know that it is a discrete value because it can only be one of twelve options (12 months in a year). In numerous instances like this, adjusting the variable type allows you to tell Qualtrics to reflect that, which will affect how Embedded Data can be used in analysis as well as in reports.


By default, the variable type of an Embedded Data field is set to “Text”, but that is just one of seven options within Qualtrics. The possible variables types are listed below:
* Text Set: a field that contains a limited number of possible values. For instance, if you have a multiple choice question with 5 choices, the only possible values in that field are the 5 choices. There is a specifically defined “set” of values, so a text set is the appropriate choice.
* Multi-Value Text Set: this is similar to Text Set, but where more than one value can be included, like a “select all that apply” question. It can also be used when a field contains a list of objects, like the countries that a respondent has visited in the past.
* Number: used when you have continuous data, with a large or unlimited number of possible values. A field containing a respondent’s height or income would be a good candidate. Numeric value fields will be compatible with any calculations or formulas used in Qualtrics.
* Number Set: when you have numeric data with a limited number of possible values, just like a text set. A simple example is a multiple choice question with a scale. Each choice can be represented by a number, for example from 1 to 5. The only possible values in this field are 1 through 5, so a number set makes sense. Like with a text set, you should use number sets when appropriate.
* Text: a field that contains a short answer with an unlimited number of possible values. A common example is a respondent’s name or email address, or any time you have a fill in the blank question.
* Date: interprets the value as a part of time. Must be in YYYY-MM-DD format.
* Filter Only: limits the function of a field to essentially serve as a search function. Allows you to use filters to search for any text contained within a value. For example, filtering your data for the term “United” in the field “Country” can result in both “United Arab Emirates” and “United States of America” appearing in the results
To adjust the variable type of an Embedded Data field:
1. Click Options on the lower-right corner of an Embedded Data element


2. Select an option from the dropdown in the Variable Type column for each Embedded Data field


3. Click OK
Randomizing Survey Elements
In this article: 
* Utilizing the Randomizer Element
* Randomizing Blocks
* Randomizing Embedded Data Values
* Evenly Present Elements
Utilizing the Randomizer Element
As mentioned in the Qualtrics Platform Essentials course, randomization can be an important tool to use to help improve data quality in a survey. In addition to randomizing answer choices and randomizing questions, you can also insert the Randomizer element into your Survey flow to randomize elements.


By default, a Randomizer will present all of the elements nested within it in a random order. However, you can set Randomizers to only randomly present a subset of elements, such as 3 of 5 Blocks or 1 of 10 Embedded Data elements. To set this number, click on the text box in the Randomizer element and type in your desired number.


You can nest any elements inside a Randomizer. However, we will focus on the two most common uses of randomization in the Survey flow:
* Randomize the order in which a respondent sees different Blocks
* Randomly select a value for an Embedded Data field to assign a respondent a condition
Randomizing Blocks
To mitigate the bias respondents can have as a result of the order in which they are shown questions, you may want to randomize the order respondents see certain blocks.
Another case can be that you have 10 blocks of questions to collect data on, but you are concerned about survey length. With the Randomizer, you could set it to randomly display only 5 of the 10 blocks to a respondent. Note that this method only works if the blocks do not use anything like Display Logic or Piped Text that depends on the other Blocks that are also being randomized.
For our example, we are sending a survey to university students. We want to ask them about their classes, their interactions with student counselors, and the dining options on campus. The questions on each of these topics have been grouped into Blocks (named Class Block, Counselor Block, Dining Block). We are going to randomize the order respondents see each of these blocks to mitigate any potential bias that may occur due to the order the blocks are presented.
To randomize the order of blocks in the Survey flow:
1. Add a new element and select Randomizer
2. Move the appropriate Blocks so that they are nested under the Randomizer
3. Ensure that the Randomizer is set to randomly present the correct number of elements


In the Survey flow above, all respondents will see the Introduction Block. From there, they will reach the Randomizer, which will display all three blocks (Class, Counselor, Dining) to them in any sort of order. Respondents will not know these elements are being randomized as they complete the survey. From there, everyone will be shown the Conclusion Block.
Randomizing Embedded Data Values
In experimental research, you will need to manage different groups of respondents so that they are presented with different conditions that you can measure against. You can use a Randomizer and Embedded Data elements to remove any bias from the researcher in assigning these conditions.
For our example, our survey will be asking all respondents how they evaluate a stranger on several criteria. However, there will be two different experiences for the respondents:
* Experience A: Respondent is provided the name of the stranger with a brief description and is asked to evaluate the stranger on several criteria.
* Experience B: Respondent is shown a video (in a Text/Graphic question) of the stranger talking about their hobbies and interests. They are then provided the name of the stranger with a brief description and are asked to evaluate the stranger on several criteria.
The only difference between these two experiences is that those with Experience B will see a video of the stranger and those with Experience A will not. We want Qualtrics to randomly assign these conditions to respondents, and will use Display Logic to only show the video to those with Experience B. We will use Embedded Data fields to tag respondents with this information, where the field name is “Experience” and the value will be either “A” or “B”.
To set this up in the Survey flow:
1. Add two Embedded Data elements to the Survey flow. Set the field to be “Experience” in both of them. Set the value in the first element to “A” and in the second element to “B”


2. Insert a Randomizer into the Survey flow, and move both Embedded Data elements so that they are nested in the Randomizer
3. Set the number of elements presented in the Randomizer to “1”. This ensures that the field is applied a value once.


4. Ensure that this setup is located before the blocks where the video and question are located. It is often easiest to set this up at the very beginning of the Survey flow.
5. Click Apply
Once that is complete, use Display Logic to only show the Text/Graphic question with the video in it to those that have the field “Experience” equal to “B”.
To set this up in the Survey builder:
1. Go to the question with the video hosted in it, and add Display Logic to it
2. Set the logic to display this question only if the following condition is met: Embedded Data // Experience // Is Equal to // B


What Qualtrics is now doing is randomly assigning a condition to respondents the moment they begin the survey. Eventually, respondents will get to the video, and the Display Logic on that question will only show the video to those that have the field “Experience” equal to “B”. The rest of the survey will be the same for both experiences.


	Important
	In any setup similar to the one just mentioned, your Embedded Data fields should be listed in different elements and not all in the same element.
	In the screenshot below, the randomizer is set to present the only element nested within it.


With this setup, every respondent will be "randomly" presented with the single Embedded Data element. So in this example, Qualtrics will read the element line by line, updating fields and values as it moves top to bottom. This will result in all respondents having the field “Color” set to the value “Purple” in the data.
Instead, make sure the Randomizer and Embedded Data elements are arranged like this:


This way, the Randomizer will select only one element of the five, and will set the value of the “Color” field to be one listed in whichever element is randomly selected.
Evenly Present Elements
Due to the nature of randomization, it is possible that some outcomes will happen more often than others. For example, 100 respondents take a survey and are randomly assigned one of two conditions: A or B. 60 of the respondents could be assigned Condition A while the other 40 are assigned Condition B.
If you want to make sure that outcomes are randomized evenly in your Survey flow, you can check the box labeled “Evenly Present Elements” on the Randomizer element


By checking this box, Qualtrics will start to count each outcome for a randomizer, and will skew the randomization to be more likely to select the outcome with the lowest count. 


	Tip
	We recommend only using this option when you have a small number of responses (<100). With larger numbers of responses, using non-skewed randomization is the best option even if the random outcomes are not perfectly even.
	Lesson 3 - Closing the Loop with Customers
Closed-Loop Feedback Overview
Closed-Loop Feedback Overview and Best Practices
Closing the loop with customers is about establishing your credibility as a business and developing personal relationships with your customers. It is letting your customers know they have been heard and communicating the action you have taken based on their feedback or the resolution you are planning.
In this article, you will learn the importance and purpose of closed-loop feedback.
The Purpose of Closed-Loop Feedback
For many companies, there is almost an inundation of customer feedback. A clear differentiator between CX leaders is a robust closed-loop feedback program that allows the company to avoid the repercussions of that inundation. 


	Dictionary
	Closed-Loop Feedback: a systematic process to acknowledge root cause and rectify customer feedback.
	Closed-loop feedback is not intended to be punitive in nature, a checkmark activity, or perceived as additional work. It is an integral part of best-in-class CX programs.
This process helps your teams deepen and strengthen relationships with your customers in real-time; it gives you yet another opportunity to resolve concerns. It is a competitive differentiator. And finally, listening to your customers encourages future survey participation, which means more and more opportunities for improvement.
While using customer feedback to drive improvement and take strategic action is necessary, it is not sufficient for full customer experience management. Yes, it is important that an organization act on the insights they collect, but your customers want to go on that journey with you; they want you to communicate these actions every step of the way. They expect that you will listen, answer, and act on their feedback. In many ways, closed-loop follow up is the core vehicle by which experience management systems help drive ROI.
One Qualtrics customer is running multiple in-depth programs to enable their experience management system, but the truth in how they have closed the experience gap in CX can be seen in their ability to listen, answer, and act. They’ve identified key drivers of low satisfaction through robust dashboards that disseminate relevant feedback to each respective department. They leverage Qualtrics Text iQ to analyze massive amounts of open-ended responses to find unique opportunities to surprise and delight their customers, and, with Qualtrics’ automated ticketing capabilities, they are able to initiate action to their agents who can directly address customers’ negative responses and surprise happy customers. It’s a perfect demonstration of using dashboards and Text iQ to listen and then engaging with customers by answering their feedback and acting on it appropriately via automated ticketing. 
Closed-Loop Feedback System Design
Companies that have voice of the customer programs often put a closed-loop process in place. These efforts often focus solely on immediately responding to a customer after they respond to a survey, but this represents only a piece of the puzzle that an organization needs to address and action.
In this article: 
* Levels of Action
* Inner and Outer Loops
Levels of Action


Consider a restaurant chain as an example of this diagram in action: A customer responded to a survey and stated that the bathroom was dirty. 
The Immediate Response action is to reach out to the restaurant customer who responded and help take care of their ongoing concerns.
The Corrective Action would be to get the manager or employee to clean the bathroom in that restaurant.
Continuous Improvement means creating a new process for restaurants to check and clean bathrooms on a regular basis.
And as part of new restaurant layouts, the Strategic Change could be to design bathrooms so that they don’t require as much time from employees to keep them clean.
However, you can not have strategic change without the implementation of a robust inner and outer loop process. A closed-loop process requires action at all levels within the organization. Just because you are following up with customers, does not mean you are actually changing anything. Operational changes can start to reflect score improvements in as early as 6 months, but there will come a point that the returns on these changes flatline. But systemic changes typically take six quarters to manifest and you can expect an additional lag in your financial improvement. That is why it is important that you put a closed-loop system that operates at the frontline, management, and executive levels.
Inner and Outer Loops


The Inner Loop is likely the piece that most organizations are familiar with and act on. At the foundation, this is when the customer follow-up happens. However, there are a lot of other moving parts, too. The inner loop promotes individual behavior and learning. Front line employees who receive timely feedback have an opportunity to immediately change the customer’s experience. This also impacts your employees by enabling them to feel part of the process instead of hearing complaints and always saying no. Management, on the other hand, is able to obtain an objective view of the performance and take corrective cross-functional action to improve the level of service delivered. The inner loop also allows you to validate the customer concerns:  how widespread is the problem? What needs to be done to fix it? How much would it cost? The answers to these questions allow you to identify the quick wins (high impact, low cost, easy to execute), and appropriately act with priority in mind. Additionally, when problems can’t be solved at the front line, you’re able to escalate the problem and make management aware of the problem. You may also consider putting together a business case to change the process or issue. 
A great example of this is a large B2B Energy company that made the decision to close the feedback loop with customers who self-identified as detractors. When feedback suggested that customers highly valued empathy from service representatives, the organization trained their employees on how to tailor their tone of voice and word choice to convey understanding and build rapport. As a result, the company received more positive comments, and customer churn decreased by 5%. 
The Outer Loop is different: it supports improvements that go beyond the individual or team; these are structural improvements. The problems the outer loop solves usually involve new policies, processes, technology, pricing, or product changes. Because of this, it’s likely that in order to solve the problems, the outer loop has to cut across multiple functions and require significant investment. Thus, a team of cross-functional champions must engage to solve customer issues by identifying key issues and root causes and action planning. The executive team can get an aggregated view of the common issues and then communicate business improvements both internally and externally to demonstrate customer-centric actions.
A good example of this was seen by a government agency that leveraged the outer loop process to identify key FAQs and customer challenges through open-ended feedback responses. Once they determined root causes, they were able to define an action. They applied these insights to optimize the UX of their primary site for all customer queries. As a result, volume decreased and there was a 5x increase in efficiency of customer feedback, which ultimately decreased the agency’s cost to serve.
However, determining the specific process will depend on the business model and operating environment. So, it is worth noting that the type of front-line follow-up process you design, and the level of time and money invested in the process will vary depending on your business model. It is up to you to evaluate your unique situation and determine what will be both feasible and effective for your organization.
Typically, B2C businesses have a high volume of transactions, low revenue per customer, and there is often a shared relationship across the business for each customer. So, closed-loop is usually centralized to understand root causes and reduce attrition. The follow-up is usually owned by a specialized team. There may also be script templates for follow-up owners to use in their customer conversations that have been created by the CX team.
For B2B type businesses, it is quite the opposite. Typically, an account manager with senior involvement will own the closed-loop process, but in order to ensure issue resolution, it may also be an empowered people manager. You should aim to preserve the existing relationship between customer and employee, by fostering an environment that promotes open dialogue, instead of scripted responses.
Building a Ticketing System
Creating Workflows and Tasks
Now that you understand the importance of building a closed-loop system, you can begin to create this framework in Qualtrics by using the Workflows platform.


	

	Workflows and tasks will be set up for your brand by the Qualtrics team as part of the implementation process. However, as you launch new surveys in the future, it is important to understand how they are configured.
	Workflows are available in Engagement and Lifecycle surveys, allowing you to follow up with employees in real-time to take immediate action and resolve ongoing issues.
In this article: 
* Creating Workflows
* Adding Tasks
Creating Workflows 


	Dictionary
	Workflows: Allow you to trigger tasks based on various events. For both the inciting event and the resulting task, you have a lot of options, most of which are inside the Qualtrics platform and some of which are outside.
	An Event is what starts the workflow. It can be scheduled, or it can be tied to a specific event. Workflows that are Started at a specific time are useful when you want a task to occur on a regular basis - e.g. daily, weekly, or monthly. Workflows Started by an event are most useful if you want to base a task on something specific happening in Qualtrics – e.g., sending an email based on how a respondent filled out a survey. In that example, the survey submission would be the event, and the email would be the task carried out.
Conditions use logic to decide when workflows are triggered. Conditional statements apply All or Any to drive filtering criteria. Not all events require conditions and the available conditions will depend on the selected event.
Tasks are the outcomes that are triggered in response to the event and condition(s) being met. You can add up to 5 tasks per action to follow-up on your feedback.
To create a Workflow:
1. Navigate to the global navigation menu and select Workflows. From here you can create, edit, copy, and delete all the workflows set up for your account in one central area.




	Tip
	Workflows can also be set up from the Workflows tab within a survey project. These workflows will be specific to that particular project.


	2. Click Create a workflow.


3. Specify whether the workflow should run on a schedule or when an event takes place.




	Tip
	You can also use a template to streamline the creation of your Workflow. Similar to survey templates, workflow templates are preconfigured solutions which can be plugged into a variety of integrations. The templates that are available to you may be dependent on your account permissions.
	4. Select Get started.


5. Specify the frequency of your workflow schedule,


OR, If you chose the Started by an event option, specify the event type.


6. Depending on the Event type, you can specify a Condition. Rename your Workflow


Adding Tasks
There are numerous options to choose from when defining a task. Some task types include:
* Tickets are used to assign ownership of a task to an individual or role so you can take quick action. You can then leverage powerful ticket management tools, like the mobile app.
* Email Tasks allow you to send an email notification to someone when a survey response is completed and specified conditions are met. You can use Email Tasks for a variety of cases, such as sending respondents a record of which events they signed-up for in a registration survey.
* Email Tasks allow you to send an email notification to someone when a survey response is completed and specified conditions are met. You can use Email Tasks for a variety of cases, such as sending the training team an email when a new employee is dissatisfied with their onboarding training experience.
* XM Directory allows you to save contact information and embedded data to your XM Directory. It also allows you to distribute a survey to individual recipients or contact lists. This functionality is covered in more detail in the XM Directory module of this course.
* Calculate Metrics Task allows you to set up automated workflows that will notify you when there is a trend or event observed in your data. You can set up a Calculate Metrics task to notify you via email when there is a 5% increase in your overall CSAT within a week, for example.
* Integrations allow you to connect Qualtrics with a number of applications to maximize the power of both platforms. The key integrations include Salesforce, Slack, Zendesk, FreshDesk, Microsoft Dynamics, ServiceNow, and Hubspot.
* Web Services interact with Application Programming Interfaces (API) to trigger actions. This allows you to pass information between systems in cases where there is not a built-out integration. These can be complex but may enable you to update, add, or delete contacts from your contact lists, for example.
Email Tasks
Email Tasks send emails when a Workflow is triggered. You can designate recipients and pipe in data from the survey responses (survey question text and answers, Embedded Data values, and/or quota information). For example, detractors can be emailed a custom message after filling out a questionnaire, or managers can be emailed when tickets are assigned to their team.
Email Tasks send emails when a Workflow is triggered. You can designate recipients and pipe in data from the survey responses, such as survey question text and answers. For example, the training team can be emailed feedback an unsatisfied employee provided that could improve the training program.
To create an Email task:
1. From your Workflow, click Add Task.


2. Select Email as the task type.
3. Supply the recipient email address(es) to whom your message will be sent.


	Tip
	You can include multiple email addresses by separating them with a comma and a space. Each email address will receive an individual email. You can also use Piped Text to dynamically pull in email addresses.
	4. Enter a subject line.
5. Choose when you want the email to send in relation to the time the response was submitted. You can send it immediately or after a set period of time.


6. Write the body of your email.
7. By default, a copy of the respondent’s answers are not included in the email, but you can select to Include Response Report. It is important to consider the intended recipient, the level of information they need, and the sensitivity of the data when making this decision.




8. Click Save.
If you want emails to go to different recipients based on changing conditions (e.g. supervisors in different departments, a follow-up to the recipient and a report to you), you can add another Workflow. Then, specify different conditions on each Workflow and enter different recipients for the email tasks.
Tickets Task
A Tickets Task creates alerts. They allow you to assign ownership of the follow-up so you can take quick action. You may also use ticket tasks to monitor larger trends for issues that are reported, or standardize workflows and expectations for following up with customers. A large part of building a successful closed-loop process is the ability to document escalation and activity through case management.
A Tickets Task creates alerts. They allow you to assign ownership of the follow-up so you can take quick action. You may also use ticket tasks to monitor larger trends for issues that are reported, or standardize workflows and expectations for following up with patients. A large part of building a successful closed-loop process is the ability to document escalation and activity through case management.
In this article: 
* Ticket Components
* Creating a Tickets Task
Ticket Components
Priority indicates the level of urgency and can be useful in assisting your frontline agents with prioritizing their work (low, medium, or high). Higher spend customers could be given high priority, while others are medium, for example.
Priority indicates the level of urgency and can be useful in assisting your frontline agents with prioritizing their work (low, medium, or high). 
Ticket Names can be static (“please follow up”) or use Piped Text to create dynamic names based on a response.


	Troubleshooting
	If you want to be able to filter by Ticket Name later on when you are doing your reporting, do not use Piped Text.
	Ticket Group specifies the group of users that will have access to this ticket. You can choose from a list of Ticket Groups, or you can pipe the value from a survey question, Embedded Data field, or contact information. The value of any field you pipe in must exactly match the name of the Ticket Group you want to add your tickets to. You will learn more about this in the upcoming Setting Ticket Permissions article.


	Tip
	If no group is selected, or if the group is invalid (e.g., a misspelled value), the ticket will be moved to the unassigned group.
	Owner assigns the ticket to a specific individual or team. You also have the option to notify the user or all users in the team via e-mail when a ticket is created.


	Tip
	It is also possible to assign tickets to users or teams based on Embedded Data that you set in the Survey Flow. For more information, check out our support page.
	Ticket Summaries provide ticket owners with a quick view of the ticket's nature. The Score contains a number such as CSAT or NPS, and Comments are text like the respondent's open-ended feedback. These fields are often pulled from Questions and Embedded Data. 
Ticket Data adds additional information to the ticket. These fields can be customized however you like, pulling in survey responses, Embedded Data values, and much more. Oftentimes, information that enables the ticket owner to follow-up with the customer is listed here, like the customer’s email or phone number. However, you can also hide certain fields so they don’t appear to the ticket owner.
Follow-up Details prompt ticket owners to answer a set of questions so that the organization can learn more about the follow-up interaction or the root cause of the issue. For example, “What channel did you use to follow-up?” [Email/Phone/Chat/In Person]. Responses to Follow-Up Detail questions can also be reported on later in your ticket reporting dashboard. They are an incredibly powerful tool that can provide a lot of additional insight to you and your teams. 
Root Causes define the list of possible reasons for the ticket’s creation. If you add root causes, you will also have additional options when you click Show Advanced Options that determine Root Cause behavior based on ticket Status (e.g. Open, In Progress, Closed):
* A root cause is required for the following statuses: When configured, ticket owners will not be able to switch their tickets to selected statuses unless they provide root causes. This can be especially helpful for statuses that track escalations or unresolved issues.
* Prevent users from setting root cause for the following ticket statuses: This prevents ticket owners from selecting a root cause in cases where it might not make sense. For example, in a ticket that’s still open, there might not be any insight into the root cause of the issue yet.
Enabling allow users to view the full record adds all information recorded in the survey response onto the ticket. If there is sensitive information in the survey that the follow-up owner should not have access to, disable this option and include any information that is necessary to successfully close the ticket in the Ticket Data section.
Templates allow you to save Ticket Task settings for reuse, making the creation of a Ticket Task fast and efficient. Brand Administrators can create templates that can be used across tickets in a brand, even if they are being set up in different surveys.
Creating a Tickets Task
1. From your Workflow, use the plus (+) button to add a Task
2. Select Tickets as the task type.
3. Set a priority level.
4. Give the Ticket a name. If desired, use the Piped Text menu to pull in dynamic information.
5. Specify the Ticket Group by either selecting a group from the dropdown or piping in a value.
6. Designate an individual or team as the owner by typing in a username or team name, and determine whether or not they should be notified via email.
7. Set the Ticket Summary Score and Comments based on your survey. Remember that the information included here should give a high-level overview of why the ticket was created.


8. Specify any Ticket Data fields that will enable the ticket owner to close the loop.
9. Add any Follow-up Details question that you are interested in tracking and reporting. Choose whether or not to Force Response on each question.


10. Create a group of Root Causes that your team can select from as the cause of the issue when they resolve the ticket.
11. Determine whether or not users are able to view the full record.


12. Save your Ticket.
Challenge: Create a Ticket Task 
1. Open the survey that you created in the previous module.
2. Create a Workflow that is started by an event, and give it a name.
3. Select Survey response > Newly created responses. Then, rename your Workflow.
4. Based on your survey, create a conditional statement that will trigger the workflow for customers that specify they have an ongoing issue.
5. Create a Ticket Task that is not assigned to a Ticket Group and is assigned to you as the Owner. Include any necessary customer information that will enable you to close the loop.
6. Once you are finished, trigger your ticket by completing the survey with the Preview Survey link. Ensure you meet any conditions you may have specified.
Workflow Run History and Notifications
As you develop more robust surveys, you may start utilizing Workflows to help automate certain tasks. 
In this article: 
* Workflow Run History
* Workflow Notifications
Workflow Run History
While the Workflows tab automates certain outcomes in reaction to survey responses or other events, the Run history tab displays a table of all the previously triggered Workflows.
All Workflows will be ordered by date starting with the most recent Workflow.




	Note
	Workflow Run history is only retained for 30 days after an action has been triggered. Once this timeframe has passed, any reporting on that action is deleted.
	* Workflow name specifies which Workflow was evaluated.
* Started by shows your event type.
* Tasks Included details the tasks triggered for the Action.
* Started on records the time stamp.
* Task status denotes whether the task was successfully completed.
* View details records the JSON payload for the Workflow. The JSON payload is particularly useful if your workflow has failed, as it will contain information to identify the cause. The JSON payload will appear in a pop-up after you click View details.
Workflow Notifications
You have the ability to set up notifications for when a workflow and its tasks fail for all workflows, as well as when a workflow succeeds for scheduled workflows. Notifications are sent to your chosen recipients through email and the in-product notification feed. Workflow notifications will state the name of the workflow, whether it failed or succeeded, which task failed/succeeded, and provide a link to the Workflows Reporting page where your recipient can view more information on the workflow’s status.
You can set up these notifications in two ways, directly from the Notification settings tab of the desired Workflow.
1. Find the Workflow you wish to add a notification for and edit via the three-dot menu.


	2. Click on the Notification settings tab of the Workflow.


3. Search for a recipient by email, username, or name and click add.


4. Once the recipient is added, you can choose what type of notifications you want to send using the checkboxes. 




	Note
	You must have a Workflow set up in order to create a notification for it.
	If you would like some assistance resolving common workflow failures, please see our support article here.
Configuring a Ticket Management System
Following-Up on Tickets
Once you have learned to automate the creation of follow-up tasks, you can begin to close the loop with your customers by addressing their needs.
In this article, you will learn the process of viewing and acting on tickets on the Follow-up page.
Viewing and Actioning Tickets
As soon as a ticket has been created and assigned to their account, the ticket owner can view it on the Follow-up page by clicking Tickets via the global navigation menu. 


On the Follow-up Page, a user can view any open tickets assigned to them, as well as any tickets associated with teams or groups to which they belong. Brand Administrators can view all tickets created across the entire brand. You can utilize the follow-up page to contact the respondent, change the status of a ticket, assign a different owner, and more. 




The Follow-up page has a number summary bar with key metrics and a table with tickets assigned to you.
* My active tickets / My teams’ active tickets: The number of tickets that have not been switched to the “Closed” status.
* My tickets open more than 24 hours: Tickets that have been marked with a status other than “Closed” for more than 24 hours.
* My new tickets in 24 hours: Tickets created within the past 24 hours. This only includes active tickets. Moving a ticket to a status of “Closed” removes it from this metric.
* Avg. resolution time: The average time it takes to resolve a ticket.
To appropriately address tickets, you first need to absorb the ticket information. Click on each ticket to expand it and view its details. 




One of the first things that may give you information about the nature of the ticket is the Ticket summary - it shows a high-level summary of the customer’s response. The administrator who set up ticketing in your organization may add important content to the summary of the ticket. If you do not see this section, it means no summaries were set up.
One of the first things that may give you information about the nature of the ticket is the Ticket summary - it shows a high-level summary of the patient’s response. The administrator who set up ticketing in your organization may add important content to the summary of the ticket. If you do not see this section, it means no summaries were set up.


Ticket data can provide you with additional context. It might list the customer’s contact or account information, for example. If given the permission by your administrator, you can click Show embedded data and Show full record to show the full survey response that was completed by the respondent. Additionally, you can also click on View customer activity to see previous interactions and touchpoints with that customer. 
Ticket data can provide you with additional context. It might list the patient’s contact or account information, for example. If given the permission by your administrator, you can click Show embedded data and Show full record to show the full survey response that was completed by the respondent. Additionally, you can also click on View patient activity to see previous interactions and touchpoints with that patient.




	Note
	XM Directory is needed in order to have access to the View customer activity feature.
	

Once you’ve consumed all of the necessary information, you can begin to take action. In the top-right, you can change the Status of the ticket. Closed or Resolved indicates that a ticket is no longer active, for example. 


The priority of a ticket is how urgently you want the task described in the ticket addressed. Change the priority by clicking Priority and selecting a new one.
You can change who the ticket is assigned to by clicking on Assign to, typing the full name of a user or team, and pressing Enter on your keyboard. You can choose anyone in your organization’s Qualtrics license. 
Root cause is not always included in every ticket, but when it is, click the Root cause dropdown to select one before closing a ticket. 
With Ticket groups, each member of a group owns their individual tickets, but other members of the group will be able to view and edit the tickets depending on their permissions. This is different from Ticket Teams, in which users are placed into teams and then ticket ownership is assigned to the entire team. Click the Ticket group dropdown to assign the ticket to users within your chosen group. You will only be able to assign the ticket to those already added to the Ticket group. 




You may also need to address any Follow-up Detail questions that are posed to you. These are often questions that your organization wants to understand about the ticket process. 




The Activity section of the ticket allows a user to add comments that detail the ticket progress. It will also record when any changes are made to the ticket. 




When you are working on a ticket, you may need to send an email to the customer, someone on your team, or your manager to provide an update. Compose an email by clicking Send email.
When you are working on a ticket, you may need to send an email to the patient, someone on your team, or your manager to provide an update. Compose an email by clicking Send email.




Any emails sent or received through a ticket will appear in the Activity section of the ticket. Whenever someone replies to a ticket email, the ticket owner will also receive an email notification letting them know a message has been received.


Ticket owners can then access the ticket in Qualtrics by clicking the link in the email. This method of communication allows the owner and the respondent to have a conversation that does not involve the ticket owner’s personal email inbox.


	Note
	If 2-way email in ticketing is not enabled, this process will use the ticket owner's personal email. For more information on Follow Up Emails, check out our support page.
	

Another option is to disable the ability to send an email from a ticket. This option might be appropriate if you use your own system to communicate with customers or will have agents reach out to customers by phone.
Another option is to disable the ability to send an email from a ticket. This option might be appropriate if you use your own system to communicate with patients or will have agents reach out to patient by phone.
The Sub-ticket feature allows a ticket owner to create a secondary ticket that refers back to the original. The user can assign the secondary ticket to a different owner. For example, let’s say a customer indicates they were highly dissatisfied. Their feedback indicates that their experience with customer support was negative, but that they also have an issue with their sales representative. You can create a sub-ticket for the sales representative and another sub-ticket for the support representative, asking them each to follow up with the client separately.
The Sub-ticket feature allows a ticket owner to create a secondary ticket that refers back to the original. The user can assign the secondary ticket to a different owner. For example, let’s say a patient indicates they were highly dissatisfied. Their feedback indicates that their experience with patient support was negative, but that they also had an issue with the online appointment portal. You can create a sub-ticket for the support representative and another sub-ticket for the IT representative, asking them each to follow up with the client separately.




Using Follow-Up Page Tools
The Tools menu on the right-hand side of the page includes a number of options that enable you to run a systematic closed-loop process. 




These tools can be categorized into two groups:
* User customization options-allow a front line agent to customize their personal Follow-up pages.
* Admin tools-allow an administrator to specify organization-wide settings on the Follow-up page.
In this article: 
* User Customization Options
* Admin Tools
User Customization Options
The Manage exports feature allows you to export all ticket data in the brand (with no limit). The export can be filtered by the specific project the tickets come from, the ticket owner, status, priority, ticket group, creation date, and more. Tickets can be exported in CSV or TSV spreadsheet formatted files. For example, you may want to export your tickets created through your contact center survey for external analysis or to store them in a database. You can accomplish this by tailoring the settings in Manage exports accessed in the Tools menu.




	Tip
	Administrators can make these ticket exports available to all non-admin users by enabling certain Ticket settings, which you will read about shortly.
	The Ticket format feature allows users to select the columns they see when viewing tickets on the Follow-up page. Columns to select include ticket key, ticket name, ticket creation time, owner, and ticket data. If you are a Brand Admin, changes will affect all users in your brand.


Ticket forwarding allows individual users to enable automatic ticket reassignment to another user for when they are out of the office. This functionality ensures that tickets do not get assigned to someone who may be out of the office, but rather get reassigned to someone who will be able to quickly follow up with customers.
Ticket forwarding allows individual users to enable automatic ticket reassignment to another user for when they are out of the office. This functionality ensures that tickets do not get assigned to someone who may be out of the office, but rather get reassigned to someone who will be able to quickly follow up with patients.


Admin Tools
Ticket Settings are options Brand Administrators can enable for their entire brand. They can determine what happens to a ticket when someone’s out of the office, whether users are allowed to email customers from tickets, notifications, and more.
Ticket Settings are options Brand Administrators can enable for their entire brand. They can determine what happens to a ticket when someone’s out of the office, whether users are allowed to email patients from tickets, notifications, and more.


* Disable “Send email” button in tickets: This option disables emails in tickets. This means no user can send an email from a ticket.
* Enable ticket forwarding feature for users: Selecting this feature will make it so that users can assign their tickets to someone while they’re out of office.
* Enable ticket assignment email notifications: This option allows a ticket owner to be notified when someone manually reassigns a ticket to them.
* Allow users to create sub-tickets: When disabled, users will not be able to create sub-tickets on any tickets they own.
* When an inbound email is received:
   * Change ticket status: When enabled, the status of a ticket will be automatically updated to the status of your choosing when a response comes in.
   * Send email notification to ticket owner: When enabled, an email will be sent to the ticket owner when a response comes in from the customer.
   * Send email notification to ticket owner: When enabled, an email will be sent to the ticket owner when a response comes in from the patient.
Ticket reporting datasets are the ticket fields you can report on in your dashboards. This includes information like status, ticket owner, priority, and so on, but it also includes various ticket data. Before you can set up ticket reporting, you must create a ticket reporting dataset.


	

	The configuration of both ticket reporting datasets and dashboards will be set up for your brand as part of the implementation process.
	

Manage permissions is discussed in-depth in the next article. At a high level, it allows for more granular control of who has view and editing access over certain tickets. 




The Manage teams feature allows Admins to group users into teams so tickets can be assigned to a group. All members of a team will see these tickets. When a ticket is assigned to a team, no individual is designated as the owner until the first available member claims the ticket. This functionality is covered in more detail in the Dashboard Users and Roles module of this course. 






	Tip
	Ticket Groups created in the Manage permissions window are a great alternative to Ticket Teams.
	Custom ticket status controls the status levels ticket owners can assign to their tickets. Open and Closed are available by default, but Admins may add more as needed. In the example below, 3 new statuses have been added: In Progress, Out of SLA, and Reopened. The default Closed status has been renamed to Resolved.
You can also customize how tickets transition from one status to another. For example, once a ticket is resolved, you may never want it to be changed back to Open or In Progress. Instead, you have a custom status called “Reopened” to indicate tickets that were once closed.


Ticket workflows allow you to define escalation rules for tickets. Not only can you reassign tickets that have not been acted on since creation, but you can also reassign any tickets being neglected by their owner. The focus on customer attention makes this feature ideal for any closed-loop program. There are three workflow actions to choose from:
Ticket workflows allow you to define escalation rules for tickets. Not only can you reassign tickets that have not been acted on since creation, but you can also reassign any tickets being neglected by their owner. The focus on patient attention makes this feature ideal for any closed-loop program. There are three workflow actions to choose from:
* Re-assign ticket: Transitions ownership of the ticket to a specific person that will handle the escalation. In the following example, a ticket will have its owner changed if it has not been resolved within 3 days of the ticket’s creation date.


* Change status: Changes the status of the ticket (e.g., from Open to In Progress). In the below example, a ticket will change to the Out of SLA status if it has not been resolved within 2 days of its creation date.


* Schedule Email: Schedules an email to be sent that contains tickets that meet the defined conditions (e.g. alert managers to high-risk tickets, or remind employees of open tickets). The below example will send an email to managers containing all tickets in the Open status.




If your organization uses large teams, it may not be practical to assign new tickets to an entire team. The Manage queues option allows you to automatically assign tickets to the next available representative.


After the queue is created, representatives will be able to select the queue and click Assign me ticket from queue to be assigned the next ticket in the queue. Once a ticket has been assigned to an individual owner, it is removed from the queue.


Setting Ticket Permissions
Ticket permissions allow for more granular control of who has view and edit access over certain tickets. When specifying groups of users with access to certain tickets, you can add users manually or set up an automatic enrollment to make ongoing user changes easy to incorporate into your ticketing framework.


	Tip
	Ticket Groups are a great alternative to Ticket Teams, which are created using the Manage Teams option covered in the previous article.
	In this article: 
* Creating Ticket Groups
* Adding Users to Groups Manually
* Automatic Role Enrollment
* Specifying Groups Upon Ticket Creation
* Using Groups on the Follow-up Page
Creating Ticket Groups 


	Note
	Only Brand Administrators, CX Administrators, and any user with the Manage CX Users or Ticket Admin user admin permission enabled can create and edit these groups.
	1. On the Follow-up page, click Tools > Manage permissions




2. Click Create > Create ticket group. 




3. Enter a name for the group. 




4. Click Save.
For every ticket group you create, there are two levels of access, or Roles, users can be a part of: 




* Edit: Edit all tickets in the group. This includes changing assignments, status, ticket group, and priority; adding comments and sub-tickets; sending emails; and performing other actions on the ticket that the ticket owner can perform.
* View: The user can view all information on the ticket, but they cannot make any changes. That means they cannot change the ticket assignment, status, group, or priority; add comments or sub-tickets; send emails; nor perform any other actions the ticket owner can perform.
Once you have created your groups, you can add users to them. You can manually add users, or you can set up automatic enrollment so that as users who fit a certain condition are uploaded, they are automatically added to groups.
Adding Users to Groups Manually
1. Select the group you want to add users to. 




2. Select the level of access you want to give.
3. Click Add users.
4. Click Search for an individual and type in their name or username.


5. Select the user you want to add and add more users as needed.
6. Click Save.
Automatic Role Enrollment
Whenever CX users are added with the User Admin tab of any Dashboards project in the brand, you can include user attributes. These are basically additional columns of information that can be used to refine user data and permissions. In this case, user attributes can be used to assign users to ticket groups so it’s faster and easier to add users in bulk.
Even as user attributes are updated, automatic group enrollment will also update accordingly. Users who no longer fit conditions will be removed from ticket groups, and users who now fit the group will be added.
1. Select the group to which you want to add users. 




2. Select the level of access you want to give.
3. Click Add automatic role enrollment.
4. Click Add Condition > New Condition.
5. Select a user attribute from the dropdown.


6. Select Equal to and type in a value that matches the metadata field of the users you would like to be assigned to the ticket group.
7. If there’s an additional attribute you’d like to add, click New Condition or New Condition Set and add the value(s).
8. Click Done Editing > Save.


	Note
	Upon saving the automation, it will add all existing users that match the criteria to the role immediately.
	Specifying Groups Upon Ticket Creation
When creating tickets in Workflows, make sure to specify the group to which the ticket should be added.


	Tip
	If no group is selected, or if the group is invalid (e.g., a misspelled value), the ticket will be moved to the unassigned group.
	When assigning a Ticket Group, you can choose from a list of available Ticket Groups, or you can pipe the value from a survey question, Embedded Data field, or contact information. The value of any field you pipe in must exactly match the name of the Ticket Group to which you want to add your tickets. 




Using Groups on the Follow-up Page
From the Follow-up page, existing tickets can be manually assigned to a group using the Ticket group dropdown. 




You can also filter by Ticket group for easier sorting. 






	Note
	Only groups you belong to will appear in the dropdown. The exceptions are users who are Brand Administrators, CX Administrators, and anyone with the Manage CX Users or Ticket Admin user admin permission, who will be able to view and edit all ticket groups.
	

Lesson 4 - Managing a Customer Directory for Distribution
XM Directory Administration
Managing the XM Directory
Effective contact management is essential to a successful CX program. Qualtrics XM Directory simplifies customer outreach by providing one platform to track and organize contacts. For every response received, you can view its data in the context of the information you already have about that respondent. This could be their responses to previous surveys or information you have accumulated about the customer relationship. The combination of these data sources is invaluable in understanding who your customers are and why they feel the way they do.
In this article: 
* XM Directory Overview
* Contact Frequency
* Identity Resolution
* Directory Messages
* Manage Directory
XM Directory Overview
XM Directory can be accessed by clicking on the Directories option in the Navigation Menu of your account, and then selecting Contacts Directory.


The functionality of XM Directory differs based on the user's account permissions. Some users can control organization-wide settings, while others may only be able to add or update contacts and send messages. For more information on controlling account permissions for XM Directory, view our support page.


* The Summary tab is the landing page you arrive on when you first go to your XM Directory. From this page, you can observe things like contact statistics and engagement percentages.
* Directory contacts tab contains every single contact added to your organization’s directory across your entire brand.
* The Accounts tab may not be visible in all Accounts. It contains the accounts from your Account Management Command Center. You can view details for your accounts such as the account health, ARR, account team, and other account details you imported from Salesforce or your SFTP Server.
* The Segments & lists tab allows you to divide your contacts into segments based on demographics, needs, priorities and common interests. It also allows you to group contacts together into Mailing Lists for message distribution. An individual contact may be enrolled in multiple lists.
* From the Distributions tab, you can send emails with or without surveys to a mailing list, a sample, segments or even a single contact at a time.
* The Automations tab allows you to integrate your own servers to automate contact imports to mailing lists and automatically schedule out survey invitations to those lists.
* Directory settings enable your organization to maintain consistent brand-wide communication. This includes Contact Frequency, Identity Resolution, Directory Messages, and Manage Directory.
Contact Frequency
Prior to adding contacts and scheduling emails, it is recommended to use the Directory settings tab to set up and maintain the hygiene of your directory. The first brand-wide setting that you can leverage is Contact Frequency. These rules allow you to dictate how often a customer receives communication from your organization in a certain time period, preventing over-contacting. This is especially useful if a contact is included in multiple lists.
You can set two global rules that will apply to every contact in your brand:
* Maximum messages per a specified period of time
* Number of days between messages


In the example above, a single contact can be sent three messages per month but cannot receive more than one message per week. You can use one or both of these criteria to create contact frequency rules across your entire directory. If you select more than one, all requirements must be met before the recipient receives a message.
You can also use Custom Rules to set Contact Frequency rules that will override the directory rules for specific mailing lists or surveys.
To set up Custom Rules:
1. Click Create Custom Rule.


2. Choose whether the rule will apply to lists or surveys.
3. Select the list(s) or survey(s) this rule will apply to.
4. Select whether this rule will apply to all messages or just survey invitations.


5. Specify the criteria that you will apply to your selected lists or surveys.


   1. Always allow contacts to receive the messages sent to this list/survey regardless of directory contact frequency rules: This option overrides any Directory Contact Rules you have set. If you send messages to the lists/surveys specified by this rule, this rule will apply instead of whatever the Directory Rule states. This rule cannot be mixed with the other two rules described below.


	Tip
	This setting always overrides all other rules. Otherwise, if different rules apply to the same distribution, the rule with the most restrictive setting will apply.
	   2. Limit how many messages contacts can receive when they’re sent to this list: Specify how many messages contacts can receive and within what timeframe.
   3. Specify how much time needs to pass after the last message a contact received before being able to receive a message sent to this list: Specify, in days, how much time has to pass between messages.
6. Click Add Rule.
Identity Resolution
Identity Resolution allows you to automatically merge contacts that have the same information in the field(s) you choose by screening against other profiles in the directory. To merge newly added contacts, you can create a rule. Once you have created this rule, each time you import contacts to the directory, automatic deduplication works to merge your contact profiles and ensure that duplicates are not created. Not only does this prevent the creation of identical profiles for the same contact, but it also provides an easy way to update recipient information over time.


You can select from five field options as the criteria for the Identity resolution rule:
* Email
* Phone
* External Data Reference
* First Name
* Last Name




	

	You cannot select to merge based on First Name or Last Name until you have first chosen either Email, Phone Number or External Data Reference. This is because contacts may have the same first name or last name, so it is not best practice to use these fields independently.
	Selecting a combination of choices will require every selected field to match in order for the contacts to be consolidated. For example, if you select Last Name and Email, Qualtrics checks the list being imported against the contact directory to see if any of the contacts have the same Email and Last Name. If those two fields match, even if other fields are different, the contacts will be consolidated to include all available information. If one or both of the fields are unique, a new contact is created. 
To merge existing duplicate contacts in your directory, simply use the dropdown to select the field(s) on which to base this deduplication and click Merge duplicates.




	

	Don't forget to click Save when you have completed your desired actions!
	Directory Messages
With Directory Messages, you can change the messages that are displayed when a contact subscribes to or unsubscribes from a mailing list or the entire directory. The entire brand can have the same custom messages.


	Note
	You will repeat the steps in this section for each unique message you want to create.
	1. Go to your Library.
2. Select Messages Library.
3. Click New Message.


4. Set Message Type to Subscription Messages.


5. Name your message so it’s easy to find later.
6. Use the Piped Text button to add special subscription links to your message.


   1. Subscribe to List: When the recipient clicks this link, they will rejoin the mailing list.
   2. Subscribe to Directory: When the recipient clicks this link, they will opt back into the directory.
   3. Unsubscribe from List: When the recipient clicks this link, they will opt out of the mailing list, but still be opted into the directory.
   4. Unsubscribe from Directory: When the recipient clicks this link, they will opt out of the directory, and thus receive no distributions sent to any mailing list they’re a member of.
7. Type the text of the link, and click Insert to place it in your message.
8. Finish writing your message.


9. Click Create Message.
Once you’ve created subscription messages in your library, you can set them in Directory Messages by selecting them from the drop-down lists.


Manage Directory
Sometimes, you may have different departments in your organization that maintain a different pool of contacts. For instance, maybe users at your organization are only interested in contacting customers within their specific region. You can create multiple Directories for each region to keep these groups separate. An organization can have up to 5 Directories present in their brand by default, and with certain licenses, up to 20 Directories.
When using multiple Directories, each Directory is completely separate. That means that if the same contact is found in more than one Directory, they will have a separate profile in each one. This also means that each Directory has its own set of Directory Settings.


	Tip
	It is best practice to use as few Directories as possible in order to store the most information about each contact in one place.
	In order to set up multiple Directories:
1. Click the Directories dropdown.
2. Click Create Directory.


3. Enter a name and click Create.


4. Toggle between Directories using the Directories dropdown.
5. Navigate to the Manage Directory page under Directory Settings to rename or delete a Directory.


After creating Multiple Directories, you may decide that you wish to restrict access to some directories for certain users in order to have better control over Directory access. For example, only users who are in the EMEA region should have access to an EMEA-specific Directory. This is accomplished by creating XM Directory Roles. With this feature, you have the ability to specify which users have access to Directories, as well as being able to grant users certain permission over these directories.
The first step in setting up XM Directory Roles is to enable the role-based access setting for the intended Directories. This setting needs to be enabled individually in each desired Directory.
To enable role-based access:
1. Navigate to the desired Directory using the Directory Dropdown
2. Click on Directory Settings
3. Select Manage Directory
4. Check the option to Enable role-based access 




	Note
	Once Enable role-based access is selected, users on your license will no longer have access to that particular Directory until a Role is created that grants specific permission to view that Directory.
	After enabling the role-based access for Directories, you will then be able to create the Directory Roles that control each Directory.
To Create a Directory Role:
1. Navigate to the Directory Dropdown
2. Select Roles


3. Click Create a role
4. Enter a name for your role
5. Click Create


6. To attach this role to a specific directory, click Add a Directory


7. Choose the relevant Directory


	Note
	By default, users added to this Role will be able to create and edit mailing lists, as well as send emails in this Directory.
	If desired, enable the permission to Manage directory. This will give the users who have been added to this Role administrative rights, allowing them to manage the Directory Settings


To Add Users to this Role:
1. Click Add Users
2. Search for users by entering their name or email
3. Click Add


Challenge: Applying Directory Settings
1. In your account, create Contact Frequency rules that allow contacts to receive five messages per month but only one message every four days.
2. Create a Custom Rule for the survey you created in the previous modules that always allow contacts to receive messages regardless of directory contact frequency rules.
3. Set your Identity resolution to be based exclusively on a contact’s email address.
Configuring Your Customer Directory
Creating Mailing Lists
Once your directory is set up, you can begin adding contacts. You can add contacts in both the Directory contacts and the Segments & lists tabs. The processes are similar, but the outcomes differ. Contacts that are uploaded to Segments & lists are also included in the overarching directory, whereas contacts uploaded in the Directory contacts tab are not added to Lists by default. For this reason, it is more common to add contacts from the Segments & lists tab.
Unlike the Directory, contact lists are individually owned, so creating a list in your account does not automatically mean another user in your brand will be able to use or edit that list. By adding contacts to Segments & lists, you can send surveys and emails to large groups of people rather than sending distributions one by one.
In this article: 
* Manually Creating Lists
* Creating Lists From a File
* Creating Samples
* Sharing Lists
Manually Creating Lists
The Manual Input option is a quick and easy way to add a small number of contacts to a list. It can be used when typing contacts by hand or copying from an Excel sheet. It is not recommended for large numbers of contacts.
To manually add contacts to a List:
1. Navigate to the Segments & lists tab.
2. Click on the Lists section on the left
3. Select Create a list


4. Name the list > click Confirm 


5. Select Manual Input.


6. Fill out the available fields so that each row corresponds to a separate contact.


7. Add any custom Embedded Data fields by clicking the green + button. You can select the placeholder title and replace it with your intended field title.


8. Click Add Contacts.
Creating Lists From a File
The Upload a File option will prompt you to upload a file containing your contacts. This method requires a specific format to upload the file successfully and is recommended when you are adding or updating many contacts at once.
To add a list from a file:
1. Click Create list.
2. Name your list and click Confirm.
3. Select Upload a File.


4. Click Select a file to choose a CSV or TSV file from your computer.




	Tip
	You can also Download a sample template (seen in the above screenshot), fill out the appropriate columns, add any desired Embedded Data, save, and import the file.
	5. Verify contact import conditions during the import process. Any directory-wide settings for merging duplicate contacts will show up here. These settings are managed in the Directory Settings tab of the directory. These settings will apply to your import. 


6. Scroll down to review the Verify Fields section to make sure the information looks right. If a field has not been properly recognized, click on the field name to view a dropdown of options and select the correct field.


7. Click Upload the file.
8. Click Add Contacts


Once the process is finished, click View Import Details to view the import results summary. You will see the number of new contacts, updated contacts, and failed contacts which may be due to invalid email addresses, for example.


Creating a Sample
Samples are groups of people from the same mailing list created randomly or based on specific criteria. They can be useful to test your survey with a subset of people before distributing it to a widespread list, for example. Like mailing lists, samples are individually owned and not visible to the entire organization.
To create a sample:
1. Click Samples on the left of the Segments & lists tab
2. Select Create a sample.


3. Name your sample.
4. Select the relevant mailing list as the source.
5. Designate the desired sample size by typing a Number of contacts or specifying a Percentage of source mailing list.
6. To specify conditions that contacts must meet to be included in the sample, click Add Sampling Criteria.


7. Select the source, operand, and desired value in the Choose Condition drop-down.


8. Click Create.
If the number of contacts that meet your criteria is less than the Sample size specified for the Sample, only the members that meet the criteria will be included. This could result in a smaller sample than the size that was indicated. To change the criteria of your sample, click the 3 dots to the right of the sample, and select Edit.


From this menu, you can also delete, copy, and export your samples. Similar options exist for Lists.
Sharing Lists
As mentioned, Lists are automatically owned by individual users, and thus cannot be viewed or edited by other users. However, if you belong to a Group that has been created by a Brand Administrator, you can share lists you have created, as well as view other shared lists within that group.
In the Segments & Lists tab, you will see any Groups you belong to under the Shared list folders section.


To share a list with a group, click the 3 dots to the right of the list > select Share and choose the relevant group folder to share with. 


Challenge: Uploading Contacts to Lists
1. Prepare a file to upload contacts by downloading the sample template file in Qualtrics. This is found in the Upload a File menu when creating a mailing list.
2. Open the file and delete the contact in row 9.
3. Add a new contact to the file by filling out the provided columns.
4. Add one new Embedded Data field of your choice, then assign values for that field to the remaining contacts.
5. Upload the newly saved file into your account.
6. Verify the contacts have uploaded correctly using the View Results option.
Governing Contacts in Lists
Once your contacts have been uploaded, you can edit their information, remove them from lists, opt them in and out, and much more. All of these settings can be controlled from both the Directory Contacts and Lists sections. Updating contact information helps to maintain the accuracy of your customer database and keeps your organization’s communication consistent.
In this article: 
* Managing Contacts
* Searching and Filtering Contacts
* Updating Embedded Data
* Sending Message Triggers
Managing Contacts
You can view all contacts in a mailing list by selecting that mailing list from the Lists section. The default columns are Opt-In Status, First Name, Last Name, Email, Reference ID, and Language. However, you are able to specify the default columns you want to see in the contacts table. Clicking a contact will reveal the contact profile, which is broken down into three sections: Attributes, Lists, and Statistics.


* Attributes display basic contact information like name and email address, any Demographic information assigned using Certified Questions, and Embedded Data fields assigned to the contact.
* Lists displays all of the lists that a person belongs to.
* Statistics displays some basic statistics on the contact such as the last time they were contacted and how many survey responses they have submitted.
Beneath these tabs is the contact’s timeline. This timeline graphically depicts the different times that the organization has reached out to the contact. Click the arrow icon in the upper right corner of the profile to view this timeline in further detail.


If a contact has submitted any survey responses, you will be able to quickly view all of them on this page. This will provide you with the full picture of a customer’s interactions with your organization in one place.
To update a contact’s information:
1. Open the Attributes tab.
2. Click on the three dots in the upper right-hand corner.
3. Select Edit from the Actions dropdown. 
4. Enter a new value for the desired field. 


5. Click Confirm to save any new values entered.


	Note
	Editing a contact’s information in one mailing list also updates that contact in every other mailing list, as well as the directory.
	Searching and Filtering Contacts
You can search for contact information by using the Search bar in the upper-left.


Filtering contacts is beneficial for viewing a subset of contacts and applying bulk edits. You can apply filters to either an individual list or the entire Directory.
To filter contacts:
1. Click Advanced search.
2. Use the Choose Condition drop-down to select your source. The available conditions are listed below:


   1. Contact info: use this to search for specific contacts based on fields like Email Address and Name.
   2. Embedded data: use this to search for contacts based on any additional fields you have added to each contact like Customer ID and Region.
   3. Opt-out status: use this to find all contacts who are opted in or out of the List or Directory you are viewing.
   4. Mailing list: use this to find contacts who are either part or not a part of specific Lists.
   5. Statistics: use this to search for contacts based on criteria like those who have been created or updated since a certain date, or find contacts who have received a specified number of email invitations or responded to a specified number of surveys in the past.
   6. Transactions: use this to search for any transactional data added to a contact. Transactions track interactions with your customers and save data for each interaction that can be referenced later.
3. Use the dropdown menu to designate whether ANY or ALL of the conditions must apply.
4. Use the blue + New condition to add another criteria or + New condition set to add a set of multiple criteria.
5. If desired, save the filter for future use by enabling Add to my Saved Filters.


6. Click Apply Filter.
Updating Embedded Data
The process of updating contacts is simple, but doing it one-by-one from the Attributes window can be tedious if you have several contacts receiving the same update. Once you have a filter applied, you can select the contacts in the top left and use the gear icon to add them to another list, edit their embedded data, change their opt-in status, or remove them from the list.
To update Embedded Data for multiple contacts:
1. Select all listed contacts.
2. Click the gear icon.
3. Select Edit embedded data.


4. Select an existing Embedded Data field or add a new field.


5. Set a new value.


6. Click Done.
Each contact can only have one value for each Embedded Data field at any given time. This is an important property of Embedded Data. However, in some programs, you might be interested in saving more than one value under the same field.
Consider a feedback program that samples customers each time they contact an organization’s support center. Each time they fill out a survey, they provide an NPS® score. If this NPS® score was simply being saved in an Embedded Data field, the value would be overwritten each time the contact submitted a new response.
Transactional Data is used to keep historical, transaction-based data separate from newly collected transactional information. Typically when this data is saved as Embedded Data, every new response to the same field will overwrite the old data. However, the Transactional Data feature in XM Directory ensures that this data, while overwritten in the survey, is stored in one place for each contact.
Using transactional data to store the NPS® score will allow you to view a contact’s trending NPS® score based on the responses they have submitted.
Transactional data can be configured and saved in your organization’s XM Directory using a suite of API requests. If you are interested in setting this up, the Qualtrics API documentation on transactional data can be consulted here.
Sending Message Triggers
The List Options menu in the upper right-hand corner inside any list allows you to export, rename, and delete the list, or to view samples. If you choose to delete a list, all members of that list will remain in the Directory and all Embedded Data and statistics will be preserved.


In this menu, the Manage message triggers feature sends an email to a recipient of your choosing when someone is added to a mailing list. This email can go to a colleague, regardless of whether they have a Qualtrics account, or the contact themselves.
To set up a Message Trigger:
1. In the Lists section, choose a mailing list.
2. Select List Options > Manage message triggers.
3. Click Create New Trigger.
4. Determine the condition that will trigger the message. At this time, only adding a contact to a list can be used.




	Tip
	You can add additional criteria to restrict the number of emails a contact receives if they belong to more than one mailing list, for example.
	5. Select whether the email will send to the contact, or to an address of your choosing.
6. If this email should contain a survey, select which one under Select Survey. Then, select the Link Type and Link Expiration.




	Note
	For more information on link types, see the Directory Distributions article.
	7. Under Message delay, determine how soon after the criteria happens that the email should be sent out.
8. Set a From email and From name.
9. Set a Reply-to email.


10. Compose your Subject and Message.


11. Click Create Trigger.
Challenge: Updating Contact Profiles
1. From your list, create a filter that returns contacts with USA as their country or Marketing as their department.
2. Update the email address for an individual contact from the filtered list.
3. Select multiple contacts from the filtered list and add a new Embedded Data field to their profile. Input a unique value for each contact.
Directory Segments
Different customers can have different needs, preferences and interests. By identifying the different customer segments that your organization serves, you can ensure that you are asking relevant questions that provide valuable insights on each customer experience.
Segmentation is the process of dividing the contacts into different groups based on demographics, needs, priorities, common interests, and other psychographic or behavioral criteria. Qualtrics allows you to define your segments using the XM Directory, so that you can then design segment-specific survey experiences for your customers.
The benefit of using Segments, in comparison to mailing lists or samples, is that Segments are more dynamic in nature. Contacts can be added or removed from a Segment based on changes to the contacts’ attributes in the Directory. Segments are refreshed every 24hrs meaning that, by default, reviews are made once a day and Segments are updated to reflect any changes to your directory contacts. You also have the ability to rebuild segments at any time, if you do not wish to wait 24hrs - we will look at this in more detail later in this article.
In this article: 
* Creating Segments
* Segment Trends
* Segment Options
* Using Segments in CX Dashboard
Creating Segments


	Note
	This feature is not available in Basecamp Training Accounts.
	Once a Segment is created, all contacts that meet the identified conditions will automatically be added to that Segment.
To Create a Segment:
1. Go to the Segments & lists Tab in the Directory
2. Navigate to the Segments section and click Create your first segment


3. Select whether to create a Segment from scratch or use one of the prebuilt templates to get started


4. Enter a name and description and then specify the relevant conditions that must be met in order for a contact to be added to this Segment


5. Click Create
Once created, this Segment will search through contacts already existing in your Directory in order to build the Segment. This may take some time, depending on the size of your Directory, however, you can safely leave this page while the Segment is being built.


	Note
	There is a limit of 20 Segments per brand, any user with the Access Contacts permission on their account can Distribute to existing Segments.
	Segment Trends
Once your Segment has been created, you can view a chart that tracks changes in membership for that specific Segment. This chart includes total and percent changes in new members and in churned members and can be viewed over different available time periods.


Segment Options
Any user on your brand with the Manage Directory permission enabled will be able to Edit, Rebuild, Copy or Delete Segments by using the Segment Options.
By default, Segments will be updated every 24 hours. However, the Rebuild Segment feature allows you to force the Segment to be refreshed at any time you choose, updating contacts in that Segment using the latest Directory information.
To Rebuild your Segment:
1. Go to the Segments & lists Tab
2. Click into the Segment you wish to rebuild


3. Select Segment Options
4. Choose Rebuild Segment


It is also possible to Edit, Copy or Delete Segments once they have been created.
* Editing a Segment allows you to change the conditions attached to the Segment or to rename it. Once a Segment is edited, it will automatically update.
* Copying a Segment is useful if you plan to create additional Segments that will use a similar format. Once you select Copy, the option to Edit the name and conditions for the copied Segment will appear. When you are happy with any adjustments click copy and the Segment will be built.


* Deleting a Segment will permanently remove a Segment from the Directory. This action cannot be undone and the deleted Segment will be irretrievable.
To Edit / Copy/ Delete a Segment:
* Click on the dropdown next to the Segment and choose the desired action.


Or 
1. Click into the Segment
2. Select Segment Options
3. Choose the desired action


Using Segments in CX Dashboard
Once Segments are created in the Directory, it is possible to report on these Segments in your CX Dashboard. For more information about CX Dashboards, refer to the Visualizing Customer Experience Data module.
In order to make use of Segments in your Dashboard, you will need to enable the Directory Segments feature, within your Dashboard Settings.
To enable Directory Segments in your Dashboard:
1. Navigate to your Dashboard
2. Click on the gear icon to reach your Dashboard Settings 
3. Click on Directory Segments
4. Check the box next to Filter by directory segments in this dashboard
5. Choose the Directory that your Segments were created in
6. Click Apply


Once this setting has been applied, you will see the Segments mapped in your Dashboard Data. You will then be able to use these fields to add Segments to your visualizations and filters.
Using the Directory Contacts Tab
The Directory Contacts tab contains every contact ever created in your brand. This means as everyone in your company that uses Qualtrics’ XM Directory uploads contacts, they all end up in this same directory. Generally, only Brand Administrators should have access to the directory. While this feature can be manually enabled for standard users by selecting the Manage Directory permission from the Directory Settings tab, because the entire brand’s contacts are saved here, it is best to restrict access to only one or two members of your company.
In this article: 
* Overview of the Directory Contacts Tab
* Managing Automatic List Enrollment
* Managing Embedded Data
Overview of the Directory Contacts Tab
The Directory contacts tab contains all the contacts added to your organization’s directory. Any contacts added to a mailing list are added to this directory automatically, but you can also add people straight to the directory itself by using the Add directory contacts button.


The processes for adding, viewing, updating, searching, and filtering contacts in the Directory are identical to the processes you learned previously in the Lists section. The only difference is that you are working with the entire directory, as opposed to one mailing list.
One benefit of filtering to a subset of contacts in the Directory Contacts tab is that you can add this group to a new or existing list, or remove them from an existing list:
1. Apply any necessary filters.
2. Select all of the returned contacts.
3. Click the gear icon.
4. Click Add to another list.


5. Choose whether you want to add or remove the contacts.
6. Select the existing list or create a new one (if you previously chose to add contacts).


7. Click Apply.
Managing Automatic List Enrollment
The Directory options menu in Directory Contacts allows you to manage global behaviors for your directory.


One of the features in this menu, Automatic list enrollment, sorts new contacts into certain lists based on specified criteria. For example, an organization could track the number of responses each contact submits. Contacts who submit more than 10 responses are eligible to receive exclusive invitations to private events. They could then use automatic list enrollment to populate a “Private Events” mailing list with only those contacts who have submitted 10 or more survey responses. Then, the invitations can be scheduled solely to the “Private Events” list instead of filtering through the directory contacts.
To set up automatic list enrollment:
1. Click Directory options > Automatic list enrollment.
2. Click Create New Rule.
3. Select the List.
4. Specify the condition(s).


5. Click Create Rule.
Managing Embedded Data
In the Directory options menu, you can Manage embedded data to edit fields saved across your whole organization. Edits made on this window affect all the Embedded Data in the directory, not just for individual contacts. Specifically, you can update, merge, and delete fields.
For example, a user in your organization has accidentally misspelled an existing field name when uploading contacts. Consequently, the individual created a duplicate field that essentially contains the same information. In the Manage Embedded Data menu, you can correct the misspelled field and merge the two fields together for all contacts.
To update Embedded Data fields, perform the following:
1. Click Directory options > Manage embedded data.


   1. Renaming Fields: Click into or highlight a field to change its name. If you change the name of the field to an existing field, Qualtrics updates all contacts to merge the field values.


   2. Deleting Fields: Select the field(s) you wish to delete with the checkboxes along the left, then click Delete on the upper-right.


   3. Merging Fields: Select multiple fields along the left to merge into a single Embedded Data field. Then click Merge Fields on the upper-right, select the name you want the merged fields to have, and click Merge Fields. If there are multiple values, the newest one added will become the value of the merged field.


2. Click Done.
Distributing Survey Projects
Connecting XM Directory to a Survey
A directory is only as powerful as the data it is connected to. A steady stream of information being pushed and pulled between surveys and the directory is what enables you to truly understand your customers, their behaviors, and their feelings.
In this article: 
* Using Embedded Data in the Survey Flow
* Adding Contact Information with the XM Directory Task
* Sending Email Distributions with the XM Directory Task
Embedded Data in the Survey Flow
By default, when you distribute a survey to a mailing list containing contacts in your Directory, survey response data will include the following fields: FirstName, LastName, Email, and ExternalDataReference. However, to include additional fields in your data, you need to add them as Embedded Data in your Survey Flow.
As a reminder, you will navigate to your survey and add an Embedded Data element for each field that exists in your contact list. The spelling and capitalization of the field name in Survey Flow must match exactly what is found in the mailing list. Do not set a value for the field in the Survey Flow. Qualtrics will search your contact list for a field with the name entered, and if found, will include the value in the survey’s data.


If you forgot to add the Embedded Data fields to your Survey Flow before you collected responses, do not worry. As long as the values were stored in your Directory during response collection, you can add the Embedded Data fields at any time and the data will be included.
Adding Contact Information with the XM Directory Task
The XM Directory task allows you to save contact information and embedded data to your XM Directory. This task can be useful for updating existing information for contacts already in your XM Directory.
To add contact information with the XM Directory task:
1. Select Workflows from the Navigation Menu.


	Note
	Workflows can also be accessed from within a Survey Project, for that particular survey. Use the global Workflows section to create multiple workflows related to various survey projects.
	2. Click Create a Workflow.
3. Click Started by Event > Select Get Started 


4. Choose Survey Response to trigger this Task based on a survey response


5. From the dropdown menu, select which survey this workflow should be based on and click Next


6. Choose Newly created responsesto specify that this Task will be triggered when a new response is created in the survey and click Finish.


7. Rename your Workflow.
8. Click the + symbol and select Condition to create any conditional statement you want to be met in order for a contact to be added to the Directory


9. Click + and choose Task.


10. Select the XM Directory Task.


	Note
	XM Directory Tasks are only compatible with the Default Directory.
	11. Select the Add to XM directory option to save and update contact information.


12. Select a mailing list where the contact information will be saved. You can create a new list or select an existing list.
13. Enter in the contact information or use Piped Text to dynamically fill in the contact fields. In this case, you could use the survey response to fill in the fields you requested with the Piped Text option. Following the example from above, we captured the email and phone number of the respondent. We can then use Piped Text to pull that information from the survey into the contact information.
14. If there are any Embedded Data fields captured in the survey, you can add them to the contact profile in the XM Directory. Click Add or remove embedded data fields to manage Embedded Data saved to your contact entry.
15. Choose your Contact update option. This option decides how your contact’s data is saved.
   1. Save or update embedded data: This option saves your contact’s information as Embedded Data.
   2. Add as a transaction to the contact info: This option saves your contact’s information as Transactional Data.


16. Click Save.
Sending Email Distributions with the XM Directory Task
The XM Directory task also allows you to distribute a survey to individual recipients or contact lists from your XM Directory. This task can be useful for sending follow-up surveys to respondents who have entered contact information in your survey.
To send email distributions with the XM Directory task:
1. Create a workflow, specify the event, and set up any necessary conditions.
2. Add the XM Directory Task.
3. Select the Distribute survey option.


4. Choose your Distribution Type. You can send your survey to an Individual contact or to an entire Contact List.
5. Select Email/Embedded Data as your distribution method.
6. Choose the type of link that is sent. You can send an Individual Link or an Anonymous Link. Both of these links expire 90 days after being sent.




	Note
	See the Directory Distributions article for more information about each type.
	7. Choose when the survey will send. You can set the survey to send Immediately when the workflow fires or Schedule a time to send after.
8. Select how you want to save contact information to your directory. You can Save and update embedded data or Add as a transaction to the contact info.


	Tip
	This option will only be available if you’re sending an Individual distribution type.
	9. Configure who will receive the survey invitation. First Name, Last Name, and Email Address are required. The setup you complete here will depend on your selected distribution type.
10. Select the survey you would like to distribute.
11. Enter the From Address. This is the email address from which the invitation will send.
12. Choose a From Name. This is the name that will appear in your recipient’s inbox.
13. Enter a Reply-To Email. Any replies to your survey invitation will be sent to this address.


14. Create a subject line for your email by typing in the Subject box. You can also load a saved message from your Message Library by clicking the dropdown arrow next to the subject line field.
15. Compose the body of your email.




	Note
	Check out the Creating Engaging Emails section for tips on how to make a survey invitation that’s individualized to each respondent.
	16. Set the number of Days before link expires.
17. If desired, enable the checkbox for Reminder to schedule a reminder email to send to all unfinished respondents.
18. Choose the Reminder delay, which is when the reminder will send. This delay is the number of days since the response that triggered the workflow was recorded.
19. Type a Reminder subject line in the box. You may also select a saved message from your Message Library by clicking the arrow to the right of the box.
20. Load a Reminder message from your Message Library.


21. Click Save.
You can also send SMS distributions using the XM Directory task. If you are curious to learn about it, check out the XM Directory Task support page.
Directory Distributions
Instead of sending email survey invitations from within a survey, you can also send them through the Distributions tab of your XM Directory. The directory also allows you to send emails without survey links in case you need to send a message to a contact list. In addition, you can also generate personal links to be distributed outside of the Qualtrics platform.
Survey invitations can be sent directly from the XM Directory within the Distributions tab. The directory also allows you to send emails without survey links in case you need to send a message to a contact list. In addition, you can also generate personal links to be distributed outside of the Qualtrics platform.


	

	As a Healthcare customer, distributions will be already set up for your brand as part of implementation. View this article if you would like to understand how they are set up and how to modify them.
	In this article: 
* Email Distribution
* Creating Engaging Emails
* Reminder Emails
* Unique Links
* Outbox
Email Distribution
Email distributions that are scheduled here will still appear in the survey’s Distributions tab and vice versa. After setting up the distribution, you can review the set-up and make any edits.
To send a survey invite:
1. Click Create Distribution.


2. Select Email.
3. Click Continue.


4. Select the survey you want to distribute.
5. Click to Change Link Type and Expiration.


The link type determines how contact information is recorded in the survey and whether the respondent can respond more than once to the survey. There are three available link types: 
+ Individual: Each participant receives a personalized link that can only be used once. Contact information from the mailing list is associated with the response in the survey. This is the default link type.
+ Multiple Completes: Each participant receives a personalized link that can be used multiple times. Each time this link is used, a new response is added to your results and the same contact list information is recorded. Note that Reminder and Thank You emails are not compatible with this link.
+ Anonymous: Each participant receives the Anonymous Link, which does not record contact information. Note that Reminder and Thank You emails are not compatible with this link.
6. Click Send this Survey.


7. Select a mailing list.
8. Click Send to List.


9. Schedule when the email should be sent
10. Click Continue.
11. Make sure the From Address, From Name, and Reply-to email fields are populated with the appropriate information.
12. Enter a Subject.
13. Type an invitation message in the body of the email.
14. Click Continue.


15. Review the content and click Edit if you would like to make any changes.
16. Click Send Surveys.


Creating Engaging Emails
When creating email invitations, you have the option to customize and tailor them to your respondents with Piped Text. You can use the feature to insert your recipient’s contact information such as their first name, last name, or any embedded data saved to the contact lists.
To further customize your email invitations to be more engaging and interactive, you can include a survey question in the email. Inline email questions also help boost your response rates. They allow respondents to answer the first question of your survey directly from the email invite before being redirected to continue the survey in a different tab. Only Single Answer Multiple Choice and NPS questions types are compatible.
To insert an inline email question:
1. Select Inline Email Question from the Piped Text menu.


2. Select the question from the survey you would like to insert.
3. Select your desired color scheme. 




4. Click Insert.
Finally, when sending out a survey invitation, you will want to make sure to take all of the necessary steps to guarantee that the invitation email will be delivered to your respondents. Here are a few steps you can take to increase your deliverability rates:
* Use a trustworthy “From” address.
* Send emails only to recipients you know.
* Ask your respondents to add your “From” address to their address books.
* Avoid using terms usually associated with spam, such as “free,” “offer,” and “discount.”
* Be specific about the purpose of the email.
* Brand your emails so that recipients know who it is from.
* Whitelist Qualtrics email servers.


	Note
	For additional information on better deliverability rates, please visit our support documentation.
	Reminder Emails
After you have created your email distribution, you will have the option to send or schedule a Reminder Email to your recipients to remind them to complete the survey. Qualtrics will automatically recognize who has and hasn’t finished the survey and will send the emails accordingly.
To schedule a Reminder Email:
1. Navigate to the Distributions tab and select the original distribution.
2. Click Actions > Send a Reminder.


3. Choose whether to schedule it to send later or to send now. Click Continue.


4. Craft your Reminder message. Click Continue.


5. Review the details of your Reminder distribution and click to schedule/send them.
Unique Links
The Distributions tab of your directory also allows you to generate a spreadsheet with unique survey links for each of your recipients. These are Personal Links that you can distribute using a third-party mailing system.
To generate unique personal links within XM Directory:
1. Click Create Distribution.


2. Select Unique Link.


3. Select the survey you want to generate the unique links for.
4. Click Continue.


5. Select a mailing list.
6. Click Send to List.


7. Select the expiration of the links.
8. Click Continue.


9. Review the content and click Edit if you would like to make any changes.
10. Click Export Personal Links.


Outbox
The page you see when first going to the Distributions tab of your XM Directory is your Outbox. It contains information about your scheduled distributions as well as distributions that have already been sent. When selecting a scheduled distribution, you will be given the option to make edits and cancel it. When selecting a past distribution, detailed information about the distribution will be presented to you.
From the Actions dropdown within the Outbox it is possible to download the distribution history for the selected distribution, whether it's a survey invite, reminder or thank you email.
The Download History feature will download a spreadsheet that contains the survey links and status of the distribution. For more information on the distribution statuses please see this Support Page


SMS Distributions


	

	If your contract includes SMS survey distribution capabilities, the below information will be valuable for you.
	Your respondents may prefer to take surveys from their mobile devices and SMS distributions are a great way to ensure they can do that. You have the option to either send an SMS survey invitation that includes the link to the survey or to send survey questions via SMS so that respondents can take the survey by texting back their answers. To send SMS distributions, you will need to purchase SMS credits.
In this article: 
* SMS Credits and Alphanumeric IDs 
* Importing Phone Numbers
* SMS Survey Invitations
* 2-Way SMS Distributions
* SMS Distribution from within a Project
* Special Characters and Legal Requirements
SMS Credits and Alphanumeric IDs
Unlike other distribution channels, SMS surveys require the purchase of SMS credits from Qualtrics to send out. Factors that influence how many credits are consumed when sending SMS surveys include the recipient’s country, the length of the message, and the characters included in the message.
When you distribute your survey through SMS in the directory, you will be able to see the remaining credits available to your account.


If there are insufficient credits remaining in your account for distribution, you will need to reach out to your Qualtrics Brand Administrator to request an increase of credits for the account. Alphanumeric IDs allow you to send SMS messages from a chosen ID as opposed to a phone number. By default, all SMS distributions sent from Qualtrics are from a phone number (e.g. 888-888-8888), but instead you can request to have Alphanumeric IDs enabled for you brand (e.g. QUALTRICSXM). 




	

	Requests for Alphanumeric IDs can be submitted to our Support Team through email.
	Importing Phone Numbers
Phone numbers for an SMS survey distribution are uploaded by adding the numbers to your contact list. Simply include a column in the contact list for the phone number field. This column may have any name, but ideally should be something that is easily identifiable, such as “Phone” or “Phone Number”.
Formatting for Phone Numbers and Country Codes: 
United States: 
For phone numbers based in the United States, you are allowed to use spaces, dashes, and parentheses provided that you remember to use the country code.
* 1(XXX)-XXX-XXXX
* 1-XXX-XXX-XXXX
* 1-(XXX)-XXX-XXXX
* 1XXXXXXXXXX
* 1-XXXXXXXXXX
* 1 (XXX) XXX-XXXX
* 1-(XXX) XXX-XXXX
* 1(XXX) XXX-XXXX
United Kingdom: 
Numbers based in the United Kingdom must not contain spaces, dashes, or parentheses. Remove the leading 0 after the country code (44) if there is one.
* 44XXXXXXXXXX
Other Countries: 
Include the country code, followed by the number. Be sure to remove any 0’s after the country code and do not include spaces or dashes.
SMS Survey Invitations
SMS survey invitations send survey links directly to your respondents’ mobile devices so that they have easy access to the survey in their mobile browsers.
To create an SMS survey invitation:
1. Go to the Directory.
2. Click on the Distributions tab.
3. Choose Mobile.
4. Click on Create distribution.


5. Select 1-way text message link. Click Continue.


6. Choose the Survey you wish to send via SMS. Click Send this Survey. 


7. Select the List to which you would like to distribute this survey. Click Send to List or Send to Single Contact.


8. Specify when you would like to schedule this distribution. Click Continue. 


9. Next, compose your message. Click Continue.


10. Review your Distribution and make any desired Edits. You also have an option to Send a Test Message.


11. Once you are satisfied with the Distribution set-up, click Schedule Surveys to send or schedule the distribution.
2-Way SMS Distributions
2-Way SMS distributions create a more interactive survey-taking experience for your respondents. They will get SMS messages with survey questions and prompts and should be able to simply text their answers back. This method should only be used for simple and short surveys and is only available in certain countries, please see our support page for more information. Only NPS, Single Answer Multiple Choice, and Text Entry question types are compatible with 2-Way SMS surveys.
Participants have 48 hours to respond to the 2-Way SMS. After 48 hours, if a participant tries to respond to the initial text, they will receive the message, “You are not currently taking a survey,”
To create a 2-Way SMS distribution:
1. Go to the Directory.
2. Click on the Distributions tab.
3. Choose Mobile. 
4. Click on Create Distribution.


5. Select 2-way text message. Click Continue.


6. Choose the Survey you wish to send via SMS. Click Send this Survey. 




	Note
	Surveys that are incompatible with 2-way SMS will be marked with a red triangle.
	7. Select the List to which you would like to distribute this survey. Click Send to List or Send to Single Contact.


8. Specify when you would like to schedule this distribution. Click Continue.


9. Compose your message. Click Continue.


10. Review your Distribution and make any desired Edits. You also have an option to Send a Test Message. 


11. Once you are satisfied with the Distribution set-up, click Schedule Surveys to send or schedule the distribution.
SMS Distribution from within a Project
It is also possible to schedule and send SMS Distributions via Survey Invitation or 2-Way SMS from within a Project itself using a similar process. Navigate to the Distributions tab of your Project and select the SMS text message option on the left.


Then, click on Schedule SMS Distribution to choose the desired SMS distribution type:
* Recipient receives a link to take the survey in their mobile browser
* Recipient takes the survey via 2-way SMS


When distributing through 2-way SMS from within a Project, there are 2 options available:
1. Distributing through a list of phone numbers
2. Distributing through Access Codes
With Access Codes, you specify a chosen code and Qualtrics generates a 10-digit toll-free number associated with this code. You can then distribute this information to your respondents via flyers or posters, for example. Respondents simply text the code to the specified number and this begins a two-way survey via SMS. This method of distribution is beneficial if you do not have relevant contact information, but want to collect feedback from a certain area.


	Note
	Access Codes are only available in the United States
	

Special Characters and Legal Requirements
The number of characters included in each SMS message can be affected by the character encoding of the message. There are two different types of encoding: GSM-7 and USC-2.
The default encoding standard is GSM-7 and it includes the most common characters. You can find a list of GSM-7 encoded characters here. The character limit for GSM-7 messages is 153 characters.
USC-2 encodes less common characters, which includes emojis and Japanese kanji. If your message contains a non-GSM character, the entire message will be encoded with USC-2 encoding. The character limit for a USC-2 message is 67 characters.
If a message exceeds 160 GSM-7 or 70 USC-2 characters, the message will be sent as two messages, and each message will consume credits.
For more information on how SMS credits are calculated, please visit our support documentation.
As phones become more predominant in survey-taking and more heavily utilized for distribution it is important to note they also come with a set of legal requirements. The Telephone Consumer Protection Act (TCPA) regulates any means “to communicate with or try to get into communication with a person by telephone” and has strict opt-in requirements that need to be met:
* State that standard messaging fees may apply
* Include how the recipient can opt-out of the survey at any time
* Identify all companies that will have access to the recipient’s phone number
* Disclose the type of text messages the recipient is signing up for
* Collect consent in writing and ensure it comes from the owner of the device
For more information, read our SMS Terms of Service and also the TCPA Rules Document.
WhatsApp Distributions
WhatsApp is a very popular and widely used messenger app. With the WhatsApp Distribution feature, Qualtrics offers another option for sending out surveys to your respondents. Similar to SMS distributions, WhatsApp distribution allows you to use either a 2-way messaging option, or to send a survey invite within the app.
2-Way: Also known as an interactive survey, will send the Qualtrics survey questions directly inside WhatsApp, and the recipient will message back their responses.
Survey Invite: will send a WhatsApp message that includes a survey link. When the recipient clicks the link, the survey will open in their mobile browser.


	Tip
	Before you can begin to send Distributions through WhatsApp, there is a set-up process that you will need to complete. This process requires setting up a Twilio account and integrating this Twilio account with Qualtrics. A comprehensive outline of these steps can be found on this support page. Twilio is a platform for communications.
	

	Note
	You can also upgrade to WhatsApp Official Business, this is recommended as it lets your respondents know the business they are receiving the message from can be trusted.
	Once the set-up has been completed, you are then ready to get started with WhatsApp Survey Distributions!
In this article: 
* Creating a WhatsApp Message Template
* Importing WhatsApp Number to Qualtrics
* 2-Way WhatsApp Message
* Survey Invite
* Distribution History & Unsubscribing from Distributions
Creating a WhatsApp Message Template
Before you can distribute surveys in WhatsApp, you will need to create messages meeting WhatsApp’s consent guidelines, and submit these templates to Twilio for approval.
Guidelines for creating a message template: 
* Different Language versions of the template will need to be approved separately
* Message templates should avoid the word “survey.” Instead, we recommend that you ask respondents to “share their experience” or “give feedback.”
* If at any point you modify the template after it has been approved, you will need to resubmit the template for approval. Distributions sent using unapproved messages will fail.
* Invite templates must include survey and opt-out links as Piped Text.
Before you submit the template to Twilio, you will need to change the formatting for any placeholder values, like Piped Text, as Twilio does not recognize this formatting.
Please see the formatting in the image below and follow guidelines in Twilio Documentation to ensure your message is properly configured before submitting it for approval.


Once your message has been approved, you can then upload it to your Qualtrics Message Library.


	Note
	You will need to upload the Qualtrics version of the message with the correct Qualtrics Piped Text formatting
	To upload your WhatsApp Message:
1. Go to the Library
2. Select Messages Library


3. Click New Message
4. Select WhatsApp Message Templates as the Message Type


5. Name your Message
6. Set the language of the message if required




	Note
	Every translation of the message needs to be separately approved by Twilio.
	Importing WhatsApp Numbers to Qualtrics
A mailing list must be created for the numbers you wish to send the WhatsApp distribution to. This mailing list must include a column for “Phone” and a column for “whatsapp”, formatting is important here, as these fields are case sensitive.


For phone numbers based in the United States, you are allowed to use spaces, dashes, and parentheses provided that you remember to use the country code. The following are valid formats:
* 1(XXX)-XXX-XXXX
* 1-XXX-XXX-XXXX
* 1-(XXX)-XXX-XXXX
* 1XXXXXXXXXX
* 1-XXXXXXXXXX
* 1 (XXX) XXX-XXXX
* 1-(XXX) XXX-XXXX
* 1(XXX) XXX-XXXX
Numbers based in the United Kingdom must not contain spaces, dashes, or parentheses. Remove the leading 0 after the country code (44) if there is one. The following is the valid format:
* 44XXXXXXXXXX
For all other countries, include the country code, then the number. Be sure to remove any 0’s after the country code. Do not include spaces or dashes.
2-Way WhatsApp Message
For a 2-way WhatsApp message distribution, only three question types are supported:
* NPS© 
* Single Answer Multiple Choice 
* Text Entry 
You cannot include any HTML formatting in your questions. Page breaks are also ignored when distributing a survey via WhatsApp.
WhatsApp surveys are distributed one question at a time. When a participant answers one question, the next question will be sent. Although longer surveys are possible, we recommend keeping WhatsApp surveys simple with no more than two or three questions.
The character limit is 65536. There are no GSM-7/USC-2 encoding concerns.
To Send a 2-Way WhatsApp message 
1. Go to the Distribution tab within the Directory
2. Select Create Distribution


3. Select 2-Way WhatsApp message
4. Click Continue


5. Choose the survey you wish to distribute
6. Select Send this Survey


7. Choose the Mailing List you want to send these messages to
8. Click Send to List


9. Choose the Date and Time
10. Click Continue


11. In the Compose Message section, click the dropdown beside Message
12. Click Load Message and choose the relevant WhatsApp Message from your library


13. If you wish to send a test message to yourself, click Send Test Message, if not, click Continue


	

	Note: Test Messages can only be sent to US numbers
	14. Review your Distribution, you can make edits here if desired
15. When you are happy with your Distribution, select Schedule Surveys


Survey Invite
To send a survey invite via WhatApp that allows respondents to take the survey in their mobile browser, please follow these steps:
1. Go to the Distribution Tab within the Directory
2. Select Create Distribution


3. Select 1-way Whatsapp Link
4. Click Continue


5. Choose the survey you wish to distribute
6. Select Send this Survey


7. Choose the Mailing List you want to send these messages to
8. Click Send to List


9. Choose the Date and Time
10. Click Continue


11. In the Compose Message section, click the dropdown beside Message
12. Click Load Message and choose the relevant WhatsApp Message from your library. If you wish to send a test message to yourself, click Send Test Message, if not, click continue




	Note
	Test Messages can only be sent to US Numbers
	13. Review your Distribution, you can make edits here if desired
14. When you are happy with your Distribution, select Schedule Surveys


Distribution History & Unsubscribing from Distributions
Members of the mailing list that receive WhatsApp Distributions have the option to Opt-out from future surveys sent to this mailing list, consent to taking the survey, or stop the survey. Stopping the survey will block further messages from this current survey, but will not opt them out from future distributions.
* 1, y, or yes: Consent to taking the survey
* 2, n, or no: refuse further messages from this survey, but are not opted out of future surveys.
* 3, stop, stopall, optout, opt-out, opt out: Unsubscribes the respondent from the mailing list, but not the directory.
Additional Distribution Channels
In addition to more common distribution channels like Email and SMS, Qualtrics enables you to send your survey project in less conventional ways.
In this article: 
* Social Media Distributions
* Offline Response Collection
* QR Code
Social Media Distributions
Qualtrics makes it easy to distribute your surveys through social media. Just select your preferred social media from the list of supported platforms, log into your account, and follow the prompts to post your survey link. This method of distribution posts a shortened version of the Anonymous Link to your social media account.


Offline Response Collection
If you wish to collect responses on a mobile device in an environment without an internet connection, you have the option to use the Offline App. For more details, refer to our support documentation.
QR Code 
If you would like to distribute your survey through print media such as posters and flyers, QR Codes (or Quick Response codes) are a great distribution method. The QR Code is a type of barcode that can be scanned by a mobile device’s camera. They are connected to the Anonymous Link of your survey and when scanned will automatically redirect the respondent to the survey. Simply click Download QR Code to download the QR Code as a PNG image file and add it to your print media to start distributing your survey.




Lesson 5 - Visualizing Customer Experience Data
Referencing Data to Prepare a Dashboard
Creating a Dashboards Project
After you have collected data from customers, it is extremely important to get the insights into your key stakeholders' hands. In most cases, you will accomplish this with a dashboard.
In this article: 
* The Purpose of a Dashboard
* Creating a Dashboards Project
* Navigating a Dashboards Project
* Creating a Dashboard
The Purpose of a Dashboard
You will communicate the results of your CX projects to your internal stakeholders with a Dashboard.


	Dictionary
	Dashboards consist of data visualizations, which will be referred to as widgets, that display your data in a visually appealing way.
	Some of the key advantages of using a dashboard include:
* Each viewer can see a set of data that is relevant to them. From C-suite executives to middle management, to front line representatives, each person can see a customized data view, even if you only build one dashboard.
* The dashboard updates in real-time. Any time a viewer wants to see current data, they will just need to log in to their account.
* Because a login is required, your data is confidential and will only be seen by the viewers you select.
* Data from multiple surveys can be included in one dashboard. If you would like to compare data collected in different years or from different touchpoints, you can do so with a dashboard.
* Filters can be customized by each viewer so that they can dive deep and find unexpected insights on their own.
In this module, you will learn how to create your first dashboard and how to manage the tools that you need in order to share your dashboard at scale with your whole organization.
Creating a Dashboards Project
In order to build a dashboard, you will need to create a dashboards project. A dashboards project is a collection of dashboards. If you plan to build multiple dashboards for the same survey, you can build each of these dashboards in one project. Think of dashboards projects as folders; you can use them to organize individual dashboards with a similar objective or audience.
In order to create a dashboards project:
1. Go to Projects.
2. Click Create new project.
3. Click CustomerXM > Dashboards > Get Started.




	Note
	If you have recently created a dashboards project, it will also appear under Recents.
	4. Name your project.
5. Assign your new project to a folder.
6. Click Create Project.
Navigating a Dashboards Project
The Projects page displays all of your projects including each dashboards project that has been shared with you or created by you. 


	Tip
	You can expand a dashboards project directly on the Projects page to see all dashboards within that project by clicking the arrow next to the name.
	You can use the Projects page as a shortcut for various actions on your dashboards and their projects by clicking on the three dots next to the desired dashboard. The options available to you depend on whether you select a dashboards project or an individual dashboard.


* Dashboards project options: 
   * Manage administrators: Add and/or remove project administrators
   * Rename project: Rename your dashboards project
   * Move to: Move the dashboards project to a new folder
   * Delete project: Delete the dashboards project


	Caution
	Deleting a dashboards project is irreversible, so be sure this is your intended action before doing so.
	

* Individual dashboard options:
   * Dashboard settings: Brings you directly to the dashboard's settings to change field mappings, your dashboard theme, and more
   * Rename project: Rename your dashboard
   * Delete project: Delete the dashboard


	Caution
	Deleting a dashboard is irreversible, so be sure this is your intended action before doing so.
	Upon creating a Dashboards project, you will see three tabs:


1. The Data Sources tab is where you can add survey projects whose data the dashboard will be built from. Adding projects here is optional, but does allow you to visualize the surveys the dashboards pull from, and provides an easy way to access the survey project.
2. The Dashboards tab is where individual dashboards are created and managed. In addition to accessing your dashboards and dashboard settings, you can rename, move, copy, and delete them on this tab.
3. The User Admin tab is where Brand Administrators and CX Administrators can manage the user accounts that are used in order to access the dashboard. Users who are not administrators will not see this tab when using a dashboards project.
Creating a Dashboard
After creating your dashboards project, you will need to create a Dashboard.
1. From the dashboards tab of your project, click Create Dashboard.
2. Give the dashboard a name. Be sure the name describes the purpose or audience for the dashboard, so it can be differentiated from others.
3. If you are creating a brand new dashboard, choose to Create a Dashboard from Scratch then click Create new Dataset.
4. If you want to create a new dashboard, but copy the dataset from another dashboard, select Copy Dataset from Dashboard. Edits to the data mapping that are described later in this article will be copied from another dashboard if this option is selected.
5. If you want to create a copy of an entire dashboard, select Create a Dashboard from a Copy.


6. Click Save to create the dashboard.
As soon as you create the dashboard, you are taken to the Dashboard Data tab of the Dashboard Settings menu. You will learn about what you can do in this menu in the next article.
Overview of the Data Mapping Process
Before you are ready to build the widgets in your dashboard, you need to bring data from your survey projects into the dashboard. This process is known as data mapping. Data mapping can be as simple as selecting the survey questions and fields you would like to use in your dashboard. Or, it can involve more complex operations to customize how your data is viewed. In the next set of articles, you will learn about the process of mapping your data and the tools at your disposal for customizing how your results are presented.
In this article: 
* Selecting a Data Source
* Adding an External Source
* Mapping Dashboard Fields
Selecting a Data Source
In order to begin data mapping, you need to select the place your dashboard’s data is coming from. This is known as your data source. There are a few types of data sources:
* A Qualtrics Survey is the most common option and is what this course will primarily focus on configuring.
* You can use Survey Distributions if you would like to report on fields like your email open rate, bounce rate, and survey completion rate, you can add a distribution source.
* Qualtrics Ticketing data can be added so that you can build visualizations based on important fields like average issue resolution time so that you can track the health of your closed-loop program. Ticket data will be examined in a later article.
* If you have set up a Reputation Management project that collects data from social review sites, you can include Reputation Management Data in a dashboard. For more information about this project type, check out our support page.
* The first three options are centered around data collected in Qualtrics, but you can leverage an External Datasource to display insights that you have collected elsewhere.
To select a data source, click the Add Source button from the Dashboard Data tab, then select the type of source. If selecting Survey or Distribution, choose the specific survey. Use the External Datasources option to bring in Reputation Management project data.


If using ticket data, navigate to the Ticket Data tab.
Once your first source is selected, you will be asked to select which fields you would like to include in the mapping. You will see three categories: Metadata, Embedded Data, and Survey Questions. The Metadata category contains fields like a response’s start and end date plus the duration of each response.
By default, every field will be selected, but you can deselect individual fields or entire categories that you would not like to include. Any fields you choose to not include now can be added later, if needed.


Click Add to finish adding your source.
Adding an External Source
In some cases, you may want to display data collected outside of Qualtrics in your dashboard. Maybe you collected survey data on paper or via telephone. Perhaps you are looking to display previously collected customer data stored by your organization.
External data sources prepared as a .csv file can be brought into a Dashboards project as a separate source.
1. Prepare a spreadsheet in the format of the below image. In this example, the external source will be made up of 3 data fields: Customer, Tier, and Rep.


2. Save this file as a .csv and return to the Dashboard Data page.
3. Click Add Source > Import CSV. Select the file you just saved.
4. Use the CSV source menu to confirm that the data is being imported correctly and to give the source a name.


5. Click Add to import the data.
Mapping Dashboard Fields
After adding your source, the data mapper appears.


There are a few important terms to define as we begin to examine the data mapper.
* A field is an individual category of information. A common example of a field is one individual survey question. Think of a field as a column in a data file. Each field is represented as one row on the data mapper.
* A field type is a description of the type of data that this field contains. You will use this to customize how fields can be displayed on the dashboard. The field type for each field is displayed in the first column of the data mapper (1).
* The field name is the name of the field you will see when building your dashboard. By default field names are the full text of your question, or the name of the embedded data field. It is recommended that you simplify these names to make selecting the field easy when you are building dashboard widgets. The field name for each field is displayed on the second column of the data mapper and can be edited by clicking on the name and entering text (2).
* The field source is the individual item from your source that the field is populated by. This could be a particular survey question or embedded data field. The field source for each field is displayed in the third column of the data mapper (3).
You can also remove fields by clicking the X on the left edge of the field.


Each of these items can be customized as you edit your data mapper. You will take a closer look at Field Types in the next article.
Modifying the Data Field Type
The most important selection you’ll have to make while mapping data is selecting the Field Type.
In this article: 
* The Importance of Field Types
* Available Field Types
Defining the Importance of Field Types
As defined in the previous article, field types are a description of the type of data that a particular field contains. So, why is it so important that you select the correct field type for each field? Consider the following example.
Say that you have a question where respondents are asked to rate their satisfaction with your business on a scale from Extremely Dissatisfied to Extremely Satisfied. Now say that when mapping this field into a dashboard you’ve selected the wrong field type. When building your widgets, you find that the below image is the only way you can visualize the question:


This widget gives you a list of all the responses submitted for this question. But there’s no way to understand how most respondents are answering. You can’t calculate an average score or see how many respondents selected each choice. Now, if you make another selection for the field type, you can build a widget like this:


You can learn a lot more from viewing this visualization. It’s clear that most respondents are satisfied now. As you can see, selecting the right field type is essential in building dashboards that allow viewers to find insights.
Available Field Types
So, what are the field types that are available to you? First, consider field types for fields that contain text data.
A text set is used when you have a field that contains a limited number of possible values. For instance, if you have a multiple-choice question with 5 choices, the only possible values in that field are the 5 choices. There is a specifically defined “set” of values, so a text set is the appropriate choice. A text set allows you to build more widgets, such as the bar chart in the example above, or the widget below. When it makes sense to do so, you should use a text set for text data fields.


A text value is used when you have a field that contains a short answer with an unlimited number of possible values. A common example is a respondent’s name or email address, or any time you have a fill in the blank question. The number of widgets you can build with a text value is limited. If you have a large number of possible values, you won’t be able to build a bar chart with that many bars! In our previous example, we initially mapped the satisfaction question as a text value and could only list the responses one by one. 
The open text field type is similar to text value but is appropriate when you have lengthy, full-sentence responses. Any time you have an open-ended question, you should use open text. With this field type, you can either display the full responses or use a word cloud.


A multi-answer text set is appropriate when you have a question where more than one choice can be selected, like a “select all that apply” question. It can also be used when a field contains a list of objects, like the products that a customer has purchased in the past.
Next, consider numeric data field types.
A number set is used when you have numeric data with a limited number of possible values, just like a text set. A simple example is a multiple choice question with a scale. Each choice can be represented by a number, say from 1 to 5. The only possible values in this field are 1 through 5, so a number set makes sense. Like with a text set, you should use number sets whenever it makes sense to do so.


A numeric value is used when you have continuous data, with a large or unlimited number of possible values. A field containing a participant’s height or income would be a good candidate. You can make calculations on numeric value fields, but can’t build bar charts or other visualizations where each value is displayed.
The date field type is pretty self-explanatory; use it any time you have a field containing a date. When editing the field, you’ll be able to select the format of the date to ensure that your data is being interpreted correctly.
It’s important that you understand the makeup of each of your fields so that you can apply the correct field type!
Adding Fields
At any time, you can add additional fields to your data mapping. There are a few reasons why you might do this.
In this article: 
* Adding a New Field
* Adding Field Groups
* Modifying Recode Values
Adding a New Field
If you modify your survey to include a new question or embedded data field after your dashboard has been created, it will not be added to your data mapping automatically. You will need to click Add Field at the bottom of the data mapper to create a new field.


The new field will be blank at first. So, you will need to select the field source, then select a field type and give the field a name. Once you save the data mapper menu, you will be able to use the field in the dashboard.
You can also follow this workflow for any fields you would like to add that you did not include in your data mapping at first.
Adding Field Groups
Field groups are used when you would like to combine multiple fields into one. These can be used when you have a set of fields that you plan to display together within the same widget. Now, when building the widget, you can select the field group instead of each field one at a time. When used correctly, field groups can save you some time!
There are three types of field groups to remember:
A measure group is used when all fields in the group have values that use the same scale. For example, you can map the individual rows of a Matrix Table question together in a Measure Group or a set of multiple-choice questions that all use a 5 point scale. This is a good option when looking to compare the value from a series of key driver questions.


A drill-down group is used when two fields are nested together. For instance, you may have a field that contains manager names, and another with frontline employee names. Once you select a manager, you should then only see the frontline employees who report to that person. Other examples include cities nested under states or provinces, or specific branch locations nested under districts and regions. Most often drill down fields are used as filters, to drill into the results related to a particular person, or geographic region.


Finally, generic groups are used when you would like to display fields together that are not on the same numeric scale and are not nested together.
To add a field group, click Add Field Group at the bottom of the data mapper, then give the group a name and select a type.


To add fields to the group, click Add field to group. Each field indented under the group name is added to the group. All 3 fields pictured below belong to the Rep Metrics group.


You can also hover over another field in the data mapper and drag and drop it into the Field Group by clicking on the icon on the left edge of the field. When doing this, ensure that the field is indented under the group.


Modifying Recode Values 
The final use case for adding new fields is to visualize fields that you have already included in multiple ways. Return to the example of a satisfaction question with choices between Extremely Dissatisfied and Extremely Satisfied. You might want to display a numeric average score, and also want to show how many customers are satisfied and dissatisfied by grouping the top 2 and bottom 2 choices together. One field will not allow you to display this information in both ways, so you will need to create a new field.
In order to display the average score, make sure to use a Number Set as the field type and not a Text Set. No further changes should be necessary.
But in order to group the satisfied and dissatisfied choices together, you will need to modify recode values. Recode values determine how each value in a field is interpreted in the dashboard. If you give two values in the field the same recode value, the dashboard will treat them as the same value.
In order to modify recode values to group choices together:
1. On the field of interest, click the Recode Editor menu.


2. Click More Options > Manage Labels to customize the possible values.
3. Remove two of the five values, since we will only have three unique values.
4. Modify the text of the labels as desired and click Ok.


5. Select the correct value for each choice and click Apply.


You can also recode numeric fields. If you have written a satisfaction question with the more satisfied choices appearing first, the recode value for Extremely Satisfied will be 1 if using a number set. This might not be intuitive for your dashboard viewers, so you can use recode values to reverse the order of your scale. In order to modify numeric recode values:
1. Click the Recode Editor button for the field of interest.
2. View the original source values on the left, and update the Recode Values that you would like to use on the right.


3. Click Apply when finished.
For Date fields, use the Recode editor to select the date formats which can be included in the field.


Adding Multiple Data Sources
Now that you’ve learned about field types, field names, and recode values, you have all the tools you need in order to customize a data source in your mapping. As mentioned earlier, you can bring multiple sources together in one dashboard.
There are many reasons to add multiple sources:
* If you have collected survey data year over year on separate surveys, you can bring the historical data to see how your metrics have trended over time.
* If you’ve collected data at different customer touchpoints on different surveys, you can bring the surveys together to provide an overall summary of your customer experience.
* You’d like to display distribution data alongside survey data.
In this article: 
* Adding a New Data Source
* Configuring Data for a New Data Source
* Saving the Data Mapper
Adding a New Data Source
In order to add an additional data source, click Add Source in the upper right corner. You’ll see all of the same options for the additional source that were available for the first source: Surveys, Distributions, External Datasources for Reputation Management or to import a CSV file.


Once the source is selected, it will be added to the data mapper as a new column. The original source will be preserved in the first column. In the below image the Contact Center survey was my original source, and the Website Feedback survey is the second source.


Configuring Data for a New Data Source
After adding a new source, you need to make an important decision on how the data from the source will interact with the original source. You have two options:
* You can keep the data separate. Using this tactic, you’ll be able to build widgets on the same dashboard page that come from each source, but won’t be able to combine the data on one widget.
* You can overlap the data. This will allow you to combine the data from both sources into one field. If you have asked an identical question on each survey source, it could make sense to overlap the question so that you can build widgets that display the cumulative data.
When adding a second source, you’ll notice that the field source in the second source reads as Not Mapped for each field, which means that the field does not contain data from the new source.
In order to overlap data, you’ll click the field source dropdown and select the item in the new source that should overlap into that field. In the image below, notice that the CSAT field now has a field source from both sources. The CSAT field will now include both Contact Center and Website Feedback data. The other visible fields still only contain data from the first source.


In order to keep data separate, click Add Field at the bottom of the mapper and configure a new field to only contain data from the new source. In the example below, the Website Visit Purpose field has a value for the second source, but not the first. There isn’t a question in the Contact Center survey that asks about a website visit, so it makes sense to keep data separate here.


When adding additional sources, Qualtrics will attempt to overlap fields with a similar field name or question text. It’s important to scroll through the field list to make sure there aren’t any fields overlapped incorrectly. In order to remove a field source from a field, click the X next to the source.


Saving the Data Mapper
When you have finished working on your data mapping, click Save in the bottom right-hand corner. It’s advisable to click this button regularly as you set up a mapping for the first time to avoid losing any work.
When you do save the mapper, you kick off an important process called reindexing. This process involves Qualtrics recalculating your data in order to match the settings you’ve indicated. This process can take some time, especially when you’ve collected thousands of responses to your survey. All dashboard widgets will not display while your data is reindexing and you’ll see a warning at the top of the dashboard indicating that data is updating.


Because of this, you’ll need to be strategic about when you update your data mapping after the dashboard has been launched. It’s recommended that you make these changes at non-peak viewing hours to avoid disrupting your viewers. It may be wise to create a set schedule for when changes to the data mapping are released so that viewers know when to expect downtime for the dashboard.
Visualizing Data to Tell a Story
Starting a New Dashboard
Once you’ve finished your data mapping, it’s time to start building dashboard widgets! You will begin looking at dashboard building in this article.
In this article: 
* Navigating a Dashboard
* Dashboard Themes
* Edit Mode
* Default Widgets
Navigating a Dashboard
In order to navigate from the Data Mapping page to the dashboard, you can click the dashboard’s name.


When editing the dashboard, click Settings to return to the data mapping page and access other general dashboard settings.


You can navigate between these pages at will, but remember the word of warning around updating your data mapping on a dashboard that you’ve launched.
When on the Dashboards tab of your project, you can click the dashboard name to go straight into the dashboard editing page, or click the 3 dots next to your project name, then Dashboard Settings to access the data mapper.


Dashboard Themes
Before setting up your widgets, it’s a good idea to access the Theme menu in your dashboard settings in order to make some visual changes to the dashboard. Changes available include:


* The Header Color that appears at the top of the dashboard. Use one of your organization’s colors to add some personalization.
* The Background Color that appears behind widgets. We would recommend leaving this white, or another neutral color.
* The Page Position, which determines where you can click to toggle between pages.
* The font of Widget Titles and Widget Content.
* A Widget Border to give your widgets thin grey borders.
* A Color Palette, when enabled, allows you to use a series of your organization’s colors to ensure that new widgets you build automatically reflect your organization’s branding. Colors can be edited on each widget, but the setting you enact here is used as a default.
* Show in Mobile App allows you to control what will be seen in the Qualtrics XM App for on-the-go dashboard viewers.
Edit Mode
In order to make changes to your dashboard widgets, you’ll need to be in edit mode by clicking Edit Page.


When you aren’t making changes, click Done Editing. When not in editing mode, you can preview the functionality of the dashboard to see if it behaves in the way you’d expect. When not in edit mode, the dashboard’s functionality will be the same for you as it is for dashboard viewers.
Default Widgets
When accessing a dashboard for the first time, you’ll see that Qualtrics has provided approximately 3 widgets for you, such as count which shows you the total number of responses collected. You can keep these widgets if you’d like, or you can remove them to start from scratch. The widgets can also be customized using the same features described in the next article.


Creating Pages and Widgets
Dashboards can be built in many ways. You have lots of tools at your disposal for building the report in exactly the way that your stakeholders expect.
In this article: 
* Dashboard Pages
* Adding Widgets
* Widget Types
Dashboard Pages
Dashboards are divided into pages. Pages should be structured around a common audience. If you will have executives, managers, and frontline staff reviewing the dashboard, it might make sense to build one page for each audience. This will allow you to devote the right level of detail to each audience. When sharing a dashboard, you will find that it is easy to control which portion of your audience has access to each page.
If you find yourself adding a lot of widgets to one page, it is a good idea to split them into multiple pages. We generally advise against requiring viewers to scroll down to see each widget, so you may want to provide more than one page to each audience. Remember to keep widgets that are based on the same fields together on one page, to prevent viewers from needing to click back and forth between pages.
In order to add a page, click (+) Add Page button next to your existing list of pages. Most of the time, you will add a Regular Page, but you could add a Private Page, which will only be visible in your own account and not to dashboard viewers.


After creating a page, click Page Options to make the following changes:


* Rename the page to give it a simple but recognizable name.
* Duplicate the page if you would like to build another page that is similar to this one.
* Make Private Copy to make a copy of the page that becomes a Private Page.
* Remove the page to delete it from the dashboard.
Adding Widgets
In order to add a new widget to a page, click Add Widget at the bottom of the page. Remember that you must be in edit mode in order to add and modify widgets. The first thing you are asked to do is to select the Widget Type.


Here is an overview of some common widget types.
Charts 
Chart Widgets are what you usually consider as visual graphs. Some of the most familiar widget types fall into this category.
Simple charts can be bar or line charts. You can use them to compare groups or time periods. The following simple chart shows average scores across different characteristics of a contact center representative.


Number charts display metrics like the number of survey responses, or a calculation like Net Promoter® Score, average, or sum of a number. Number charts can show trends over time with a date field.


A breakdown bar is a part-to-whole visualization. It displays each answer choice as a proportion. You can display it horizontally or vertically. You can also use a pie chart for this purpose.


Gauge charts are used to measure averages, sums, counts, correlations, and Net Promoter Score (NPS®). The open circle adjusts as responses are gathered, and the colors can be changed accordingly. Many organizations use gauge charts to display their key metric at the top of a dashboard page since it displays the overall score and the color ranges can be used to display organizational goals.


Tables 
Table type widgets display your data in a less visual way and instead show the raw numbers.
Simple tables use one Number Set metric to display an average, sum, or count. You can add a text set for rows or columns to break down the metric further. These are best used when you have a viewing audience that wants to see a precise value.


A table widget breaks out multiple data fields into rows and columns with the ability to include calculations as additional rows or columns.


	Tip
	Due to the easy setup, this widget type is recommended as an alternative to Simple Tables and Pivot Tables.
	

A record grid displays raw values of numeric or textual fields and there is no option for calculations or displaying different metrics. The field names are column headers and each row is a survey response. It functions similarly to the data table in Data & Analysis.
Enable the Show full response when clicked feature on this widget to allow the dashboard user to view a detailed record of the response and its associated tickets. From this view, the user can also update those tickets and send emails to relevant parties. This integration enables your dashboard users to seamlessly navigate between their tickets and the dashboard.
For more information on this feature please see this support page.


Other Widget Types 
There is a final set of widgets that do not fit neatly into the Chart or Table groups. But, they have very useful characteristics and are worth considering.
The response ticker tracks comments and feedback from respondents. You can add text values to give context to comments or leave comments directly on the responses it displays. You can also display a metric, like NPS®. It is scrollable, so it can be any size in a dashboard.
Enable the Show full response when clicked feature on this widget to allow the dashboard user to view a detailed record of the response and its associated tickets. From this view, the user can also update those tickets and send emails to relevant parties. This integration enables your dashboard users to seamlessly navigate between their tickets and the dashboard.


You are able to customize how the response record appears when your users view it in order to tailor the widget further to your organization. Open any response record and then click Edit in the upper-right corner. Further customization options include customizing the labels that are applied to the content that is in the response ticker. For more information on these features and widget type, please see this support page.
The key drivers widget enables you to compare multiple metrics at once and showcase the potential relationship between them. You can select an outcome metric and compare it with fields that may be drivers of that metric. This will help you determine which drivers are having an impact on your most important metric as well as which ones are not. Additionally, it will show you whether that key driver has a positive or negative impact so that you know which areas to improve to increase your overall metric. You can choose between two different analysis methods, Relative importance analysis or Pearson correlation. For more information on these two analyses and how to decide between them, please see this support page.


	Note
	Relative importance analysis is the default calculation for the key drivers widget.
	In the following example, “Desire to Serve” and "Communication" are highly correlated with NPS® and are performing well while "CSAT", "Responsiveness" and "Knowledge" are not correlated with NPS® despite performing well. This widget shows what drivers can predict a higher Net Promoter Score® and how a CX organization can act accordingly.


The focus areas widget is similar to key driver analysis. You can select an outcome metric and a set of potential drivers. The widget will then show you how well your organization is performing in each of the drivers, and how much of an impact that driver has on the outcome metric.
In the below example, we have set customer satisfaction as the overall metric. Then, we selected four potential drivers. Responsiveness has the highest overall impact on customer satisfaction as we see by the Impact bar icon. This widget can also be used to compare an individual’s performance to the company as a whole. Our screenshot shows that the frontline agent viewing this dashboard has gotten a positive score on responsiveness from 60% of customers, while the company’s average is 53%. The viewer can see that their performance is above average in this important area.


The rich text editor functions as a notepad for a dashboard. It allows for basic text formatting to add directions or insights to help guide viewers. It can also be used as a headline for the dashboard, or even as an announcement space for upcoming changes to the dashboard.


Editing Widgets
Now that you know the basics of widgets and widget types, you can learn some best practices for building widgets. There are countless widget customization options, so you will learn about a strategy to efficiently build a widget in this article.
In this article: 
* Selecting a Metric
* Customizing Display Options
* Adding a Title and Description
* Resizing Widgets
* Widget Options
* Using Mobile Preview Mode
First, watch this video on building dashboard widgets to see the topics discussed below in action:
<!-- iframe instead of embed for d:videodata --> 
In this article, we will create two widgets to illustrate the options available:
1. A Simple Chart that displays response counts for each choice within a multiple-choice question.
2. A Breakdown Bar that displays the percentage of respondents that selected each choice for a specified question.
After creating a widget, you will be able to access the widget customization sidebar on the right side of the page. This is where you will adjust the following settings.
* Metric
* Display options
* Widget title and description 
Selecting a Metric
Begin by selecting the data that will be presented in the widget. The steps required to select this information will vary somewhat depending on your widget type.
For a Simple Chart:
1. Select the Metric. The Metric includes options like response count, average, maximum, or minimum. Choose Count for this widget. See this support page for more information on metric types and what they mean.


2. If desired, use the Options menu on the Metric to make further customizations such as how to format your metric or what you wish the value to be displayed as.


3. When Count is selected, our widget simply displays the overall response count for our survey. To split the total count by each choice of the survey question, select the appropriate field under X-Axis.


4. If desired add a Data Series to break the chart out by a second field. For example, use the recorded date field to see a breakout of responses over time.
The process is different for the Breakdown Bar. Use the Dimensions option to select the fields used to display data in this widget


Customizing Display Options
The next step to building a widget is to adjust its display. Each widget type has a different array of styling options available. Common options include:
* Sorting the order in which items appear. Choose between a set option like descending alphabetical order, or use Custom Sorting to choose your own order.
* The Colors of each item in a Widget.
* The Axis or gridlines that appear on a Widget.
* The use of tooltips which present further information when a viewer hovers over a specific item.
On our Simple Chart, you may choose to sort your bars so that they are ordered from Extremely Difficult to Extremely Easy. Then, you can choose to enable tooltips and display both the X and Y axes. These tooltips can be used to clearly indicate to the viewer what type of information is being presented on each axis


For our Breakdown Bar, we may choose to customize the coloring of each segment and modify the information presented in the labels.


Adding a Title and Description
After the look and display of the widget is set, add a Title that summarizes what the widget contains in a couple of words. If your widget is more complex, a description is used to describe how the widget should be interpreted. The Description is seen by hovering over the information icon next to the title.


On many widget types, you are given the option to Show the number of responses contained in this widget. This is recommended so that viewers understand how much data they are viewing when finding insights.
When finished editing, click outside of the widget, Done at the bottom of the editing pane, or click Close to hide the widget editing pane. To return to a widget’s editing pane, click Edit on the widget.


Resizing Widgets
The final step is to adjust your new widget to the dashboard page. If you use the grey arrow in the bottom right corner of the widget, you can modify the size. Then, click on the gray bar at the top of the widget in order to drag and drop it onto another part of the page.
Widget Options
At any time, you can click the three dots in the upper right corner of a widget to use the Widget Options dropdown menu. It has three options:


* Duplicate makes an exact copy of the Widget.
* Remove deletes the selected Widget.
* Move to Page moves the Widget to another dashboard page.
Using Mobile Preview Mode
Once you have configured your dashboard pages and widgets it is important to preview how they would appear for users viewing the dashboard via the mobile app. Luckily, with Qualtrics Mobile Preview Mode, you can do this at the touch of a button. Previewing helps you confirm the dashboard look and feel, widget layout, and data presentation. It is an important step to do before sharing your dashboard with users, to ensure that it is optimized for mobile design, and is consistent with the desktop experience.
To preview your dashboard for the mobile app:
1. Select Mobile Preview.


2. Scroll through the page.


3. Click the X in the top right corner to exit preview mode.
If there are any inconsistencies with how your data is being displayed via mobile, return to Edit mode, and make any necessary changes.
Adding Benchmark Comparisons
To enhance the relevance of your data, you can add Benchmarks to your widgets in order to see how your key metrics compare to your goals or to the performance of similar organizations.
In this article: 
* Defining Benchmarks
* Setting Up a Benchmark
* Adding a Benchmark to a Widget
Defining Benchmarks
When viewing the widgets you’ve built, your stakeholders are likely to ask themselves “What does this mean?” or “Does this value mean we are doing well?”. You can add reference lines to a bar graph or construct the color ranges of a gauge chart to show how your organization performs relative to your goals. There are numerous ways to add context to each widget you build.
Benchmarks are the recommended approach to compare your results to an organizational goal or to your competitors. There are four methods of including benchmarks in dashboards:
* The Use your own data option allows you to define a goal for each metric you display on your dashboard. This could be a goal set by your organization or a historical score that is typical for your industry.
* The Qualtrics data option, also known as XM Institute Customer Ratings, compares your organization to others. The Qualtrics XM Institute publishes an annual study that contains the average NPS® score by industry. The XM Institute also publishes digital experience benchmarks that are appropriate for your website or app feedback study. Finally, the XM Institute publishes overall benchmarks that allow you to compare common metrics like Satisfaction and Customer Effort. If you’d like to understand how your key metrics compare to your competitors, the XM Institute Benchmarks can be added to your widgets. To learn more about the methodology and how to get access, see XMI Customer Ratings.
* The Patient Experience benchmarks are comprehensive Net Promoter® Score (NPS®) benchmarks based on data gathered with the ANCC Magnet Recognition Program. Qualtrics worked collaboratively with the ANCC Magnet Recognition Program to support the 2019 Magnet Application Manual guidelines and created a crosswalk of patient satisfaction survey questions that meet the nine categories for patient satisfaction with nursing. The crosswalk was approved by the ANCC Magnet Program in July 2019. Respondents were asked questions corresponding to the facility at which they received care. Questions included aspects of nurse, doctor, and team performance, along with overall satisfaction and experience.
* If you need to upload benchmarks to your dashboard in bulk, you can use the Import from file option to create and update benchmarks.
Setting Up a Benchmark
To create a benchmark value:
1. Navigate to the Dashboard Settings menu.


2. Click on the Benchmark Editor tab.
3. Click Add Benchmark and choose whether you would like to create a new benchmark or bulk upload benchmarks from a file. For this example, we will choose to Create a new benchmark.


4. Select whether you want to use Qualtrics data, Patient experience, or your own data.


5. If using Qualtrics data from the XM Institute:
   1. You’ll be asked to select which type of benchmark you are using:


	Tip
	You are able to download the reports associated with each XMI benchmark by clicking View report
	   2.       1. Consumer Net Promoter Score (NPS) is used specifically for comparing NPS® scores.
      2. The Digital metrics allow you to compare Ease of Use, Likelihood to Return, Satisfaction, and Overall Experience. Overall Experience is calculated as the average of Ease of Use, Likelihood to Return, and Satisfaction.
      3. Overall metrics allow you to compare Customer Effort, Emotion, Overall Satisfaction, and percentage of Success.
   3. Then, you'll be asked to specify the following options:


      4. The dashboard field you would like to benchmark against. Please note that the only fields you can select are Number Sets and Numeric Values.
      5. The Data year you want to use for comparison.
      6. The Benchmark name, which will appear when selecting which benchmark to include on a widget.
      7. Your Industry so that you can directly compare your organization to competitors.
      8. If you selected the digital or overall metrics, select the Benchmark type (Satisfaction, Ease, etc.)
      9. Whether the benchmark will reference the Industry leader or the Industry average score. The leader option will set the benchmark as the highest score that the XM Institute collected for the chosen metric in your industry.
6. If using Patient Experience:


   4. The dashboard field you would like to benchmark against. Please note that the only fields you can select are Number Sets and Numeric Values.
   5. The Benchmark Name, which will appear when selecting which benchmark to include on a widget.
   6. Choose from the following healthcare roles: Doctor, Nurse, Care team, or select Overall for overall benchmarks not specific to a role.
   7. Choose the type of facility you want to benchmark against. Try to match as closely as possible to the facility you collected data on.
   8. Choose your benchmark from the several available options.
   9. Choose Average or Top Box as the metric type to compare yourself against.
7. If using your own data:
   1. The dashboard field you would like to benchmark against. Please note that the only fields you can select are Number Sets and Numeric Values.
   2. The Benchmark name, which will appear when selecting which benchmark to include on a widget.
   3. The Metric to benchmark against, or the type of calculation performed on a field. Choose from Average, Top Box / Bottom Box, or NPS®.
   4. The Metric Value, or the value to which your data will be compared. If your organization has a goal of an average CSAT value of 4.0, you’d enter 4 here.


8. Click Save.
If you are creating and updating CX Benchmarks in bulk, please check out our support page for further instruction.
Adding a Benchmark to a Widget
Once you’ve defined benchmarks, you can add them to widgets to present a comparison between your organization and the benchmark value.
1. Make sure your dashboard is in editing mode by clicking Edit Page.
2. Edit your desired widget and select Add Metric to add a metric, or click an existing metric to edit it.
3. This metric needs to be changed to a benchmark. You can select which one by clicking the Metric dropdown and then selecting a Benchmark.




	Note
	The way you select your benchmark will change depending on the widget type.
	4. Select the field that the benchmark should be compared against.


5. Select your display type:
   1. Display difference: Display the difference between the benchmark and the field being compared against it. The value will be negative if the benchmark is higher, and positive if your data’s value is higher.
   2. Display benchmark: Display the exact value of the benchmark.
Once the benchmark metric is configured, you can continue to edit your widget. 
The below image contains two simple examples of widgets that include benchmarked data. The bar graph on the left shows a comparison of an organization’s NPS® score to a benchmarked value. The table on the right displays this same comparison, as well as a 3rd column showing the difference between the two.


When using gauge charts and number charts, you can add XM Institute Benchmarks as Comparisons. This means that the widget’s metric should not be the benchmark itself.


Then, you can see how your scores fall within key percentiles of the benchmark by hovering over the widget. You will see the minimum and maximum of the benchmark, the 25th percentile, the 50th percentile, and the 75th percentile as shown in the screenshot below.


Adding Filters
The final component of a good dashboard page is a set of filters. Filters allow viewers to view just a portion of your data. You can add filters based on many of your dashboard fields to a page and viewers can use a combination of fields to see exactly the data they are looking for. It is important that you understand the types of questions that viewers will be looking to answer when viewing a dashboard so that you can provide them with the right set of filters.
In this article: 
* Types of Filters
* Adding Page-Level Filters
* Saving Filters
* Adding Other Filters
* Common Filters to Think About Adding
* Field Types and Filter Behavior
Types of Filters
There are three different levels of filter that you can apply to a dashboard:
1. Page-level filters affect every widget on that page.
2. Widget-level filters only affect the widget the filter applies to.
3. Interactive widget filters are applied to individual widgets. When a segment (such as a specific bar on a bar chart) of the widget is clicked on, the entire page is filtered by that segment. These filters are only compatible with simple charts, simple tables, pie charts, and word clouds.
Adding Page-Level Filters
In order to add a page-level filter, click Add Filter at the top left of your dashboard and select the field the filter will be based on. You can add as many or as few filters as you want.


The Filter Title will default to the field name, but you can customize this if you would like. You can also set default values for the filter. If you use default values, the filter will be set to these values when someone opens the dashboard. To set default values:
1. Enable editing on your dashboard.
2. Click the page or widget level filter for which you want to set a default filtered view.
3. Set the filter criteria that you want dashboard viewers to see by default.


In this example, the default view will only show responses from the west region. While dashboard viewers will initially see the dashboard with the default filter applied, they will still be able to modify the filter at any time.
As the dashboard builder, be very careful when applying values to a filter! Any time you apply a value to a filter while you are in Editing mode, you are creating a default filter that will be applied to all other dashboard viewers. If you are simply looking to view filter combinations without setting default values, be sure that you have exited Editing mode.
Optionally, you can enable L ock filter so dashboard viewers cannot change the filter. You can use locked filters with standard default values as well as those based on user attributes.


After adding a filter, click the + button in the filter bar to add more filters. When values are selected in more than one filter, both filters apply to restrict the data that is seen.
Saving Filters
Sometimes, the filters you build may be complex. If you intend to reuse them you can save them in your dashboard. This eliminates the need for you to rebuild them from scratch every time.
In order to utilize saved filters, first build out the filter with the desired criteria. Then, click Filters and select Save As.


Fill in the name for your filter and click Save.
Once you’ve created a filter, you can select it from your list of saved filters to reuse via the Filters dropdown. Use this same dropdown and re-click a filter to deselect it.
Filters can be saved by users who do not have editing permissions on the dashboard. Saved filters only appear to the user who created them, so the list of saved filters will never contain irrelevant content for a dashboard viewer.
Adding Other Filters
Adding a widget-level filter is similar. Instead of adding the filter at the top of the page, click Add on the widget customization sidebar.


To enable interactive widget filters, find the When I click a segment option on a widget. Click Add a page filter to enable interactivity on the widget.


Conflicting Filter Behavior
Page-level filters will apply to widgets that also have a widget-level filter applied. However, in circumstances where these filters conflict, the widget-level filter overrides the page-level filter.
For example, if a page filter only shows responses from West region respondents, and a widget filter only shows responses from East region respondents, the page-level filter is ignored and the widget will only show East region responses. However, if a page-level filter only shows responses from West region respondents and the widget-level filter is set to show only responses from those aged 18-24, then the widget will show responses for West region respondents from 18-24.
Common Filters to Think About Adding
You may have quite a few fields in your dashboard. So, which should you base filters on? As mentioned previously, you will want to understand what questions viewers are looking to answer when viewing the dashboard. If an executive wants to see how the different regions he oversees compare in your key metric, then you should certainly include "region" as a filter. Other common options include:
* Response Date to see how metrics are trending over time.
* Customer account in a B2B environment, so that you can easily see the scores from a specific customer.
* Customer tier to see if higher spend customers have different experiences than lower spend customers.
* Product Type to see how a customer’s satisfaction trends depending on which product they purchased in the past.
* Touchpoint if a dashboard contains more than one touchpoint. You will certainly want to know how customer experiences differ between a physical store and a website.
Field Types and Filter Behavior
Depending on the filter field’s field type, the filter will have different behavior. With text set fields, you will select from the list of values via the dropdown menu.


With number sets and numeric values, you will control a slider bar that determines which numbers can be seen.


With Open Text and Text Value fields, you will see a search bar. The filter will include any responses that contain the search term in that field.




Creating Action Plans
Action Plans help you set and track progress against your organization’s goals. For example, you can create a plan to improve your customer onboarding process or to refine your organization’s website experience.  With Action Plans, you can create initiatives with clear tasks and resolutions that can be assigned to and tracked by others. You can build pages and widgets that visualize these goals and prevent your Dashboard from becoming stagnant.
In this article: 
* Creating Action Plans
* Building Pages and Widgets Based on Action Plans
* Editing and Viewing Existing Action Plans
Creating Action Plans
To begin, you will need to make sure Action Planning is enabled in your account. To do that, select Action Plans from the Dashboard Settings Menu and toggle the switch to “on”.


Now that Action Planning has been enabled, you can begin to build out your first Action Plan.
1. Click on the Action Planning Icon


2. Select Action Plan


3. Give your Plan a name
4. Change the status and due date
5. Add more owners
6. Add additional fields or comments. For example, you can add a field for region or add a comment to provide more details about the plan.


Once you have created your Action Plan, you can add tasks to it called Actions. Actions can be useful if you want to divide up your Action Plan into multiple tasks. For example, if you have an Action Plan to improve customer onboarding, one action can be to review the current process and another to send out a survey to customers to gather feedback on their experience. To create Actions:
1. Click on New Action 
2. Name your Action
3. Add a description
If you need to delete an action within your plan, you can do so by clicking on the three dots in the top right corner and selecting “delete”


Once you have completed an action, click the checkmark next to it. As you continue to check off actions, the progress of your action plan will automatically update.


Building Pages and Widgets Based on Action Plans
Once you have built your action plan, you can begin to create widgets to help you report on their progress. In order to build an action planning widget, you need to add an Action Planning page to your Dashboard.


After you build out your page, you can begin to add widgets. All of the widgets that are available to you in a regular Dashboards page are also available in an Action Planning Page. To review how to create widgets in a Regular Dashboards Page, visit this link.


The fields you create in your Action Plan Settings will be available for use in your widgets. For example, you can use these fields as your x-axis or as your Data Series when building a Simple Chart.


	Note
	Fields added to your action plan will automatically be assigned field types that are ideal for reporting. To learn more about the different field types, visit this support page.
	Editing and Viewing Existing Action Plans
Once you have finished creating your action plan, you can click on the Action Plan icon to go back and look at your existing action plans.


There, you can create additional action plans or see any action plans that have been shared with you. Additionally, you can use this page to filter your action plans by things such as “last modified” or “due date” as well as see the progress on each one.




	Note
	To learn about all of the different filters available to use, visit this support page.
	Monitoring Ticket Activity
Not only do you want to see the X-data you are collecting in your dashboard, but you also want to see what your employees are doing about it. Use Ticket Reporting to assess and track your organization’s ability to address the tickets created.
In this article: 
* Creating Ticket Reporting Datasets
* Common Ticket Reporting Fields
* Ticket Data Restrictions
* Building Dashboard Widgets Based on Ticket Data
Creating Ticket Reporting Datasets


	Note
	Only Brand Administrators, CX Administrators, or users with the Qualtrics Ticket Admin permission enabled can create and edit ticket reporting datasets.
	Ticket reporting datasets are the ticket fields you can report on in your dashboards. In order to set this up:
1. From the global navigation menu, click Tickets.


2. Click on Tools in the upper right-hand corner.
3. Select Ticket reporting datasets.


4. Click Add a dataset or edit the default dataset.
5. Add the fields of interest. By default, all available metadata fields and ticket data will be added. 


6. Click Save.
Common Ticket Reporting Fields
When adding ticket reporting data, you will automatically be given many fields that you can choose to report on. These are fields that you will be familiar with if you have completed the Closing the Loop with Customers module. Here are some of the most commonly used fields:
* Key: Unique identifier automatically assigned to the ticket (e.g., T-52)
* Priority: Indicates the urgency (Low, Medium, or High)
* Status: Indicates the current state of the ticket
* Owner Name: The name of the user who owns the ticket
* Date Fields: Separate date fields for the time the ticket was created, most recently updated, first updated, and closed
* Resolution Time: Time between when the ticket was created and when its status was changed to “Closed” (in minutes)
* Ticket Data: Ticket data fields you have created can also be mapped into the Ticket Reporting Fieldset
* Follow-Up Details: Responses to questions embedded in the ticket
* Link: URL to access a ticket
Ticket Data Restrictions
By default, all users and roles have access to all ticket reporting data. However, you can create ticket data restrictions to limit access to this data. In order to set this up:
1. Select Ticket Data Restrictions.


2. Click Add user or role.


3. Type the name of the role or user, and select them.
4. Click All Data.


5. Click Add Restrictions.


6. Select a role or field to restrict access by. This can be a default ticket field, like status or priority, or custom ticket data.
7. Choose between is or matches user attribute. Should you select is, enter a static value the ticket field has to match. Should you select matches user attribute, determine a user attribute that the ticket field has to match. This is best for values that vary by user.


8. Select the value that must be matched.
9. Select whether to Allow rollup data. See this support page for more details to decide whether you want to enable.
10. Click Done > Done > Save.
Building Dashboard Widgets Based on Ticket Data 
In order to build widgets based on the ticketing fields you have brought into your dashboard, you need to create a Ticket Reporting page. Before this, the user will need to go to the Ticket Data tab of the dashboard settings to select which dataset they want to use. See this support page for more information.


You have access to all the different widget types, display options, and other settings available on a dashboard page. The only difference on this page is that whenever you add a widget, it will present the different Ticket Data fields instead of survey data fields to populate the visualization.


Some common visualizations you can build include:
* The average resolution time, which can be trended over time to see how quickly your team is solving customer issues
* Fields based on your follow-up details questions, which may be able to show you a breakdown of the root issues that are leading to customer pain, or a breakdown of the actions that were taken to solve customer issues
* The number of tickets resolved over time, which can be split out by priority or fields that you have added as ticket data, such as region, customer tier, or customer account
Overview of Dashboard Administration
Introduction to User Administration
After mapping data and building widgets, the final step of the process of launching a dashboard is to share it with stakeholders at your organization. Because each viewer of a dashboard should see only the data that is relevant to them and their job function, sharing it is not a simple process. You will need to share your Dashboard so that, by default, each Dashboard viewer will only see the data that is relevant to them or their role. Fortunately, Qualtrics provides you with the tools that you need in order to accomplish this task.
The final step of the process of launching a dashboard is to share it with stakeholders at your healthcare organization. Because each viewer of a dashboard should see only the data that is relevant to them and their job function, sharing it is not a simple process. You will need to share your Dashboard so that, by default, each Dashboard viewer will only see the data that is relevant to them, their service line or their role. Fortunately, Qualtrics provides you with the tools that you need in order to accomplish this task.


	Note
	Only Qualtrics users who are designated as Brand Administrators or CX Administrators will have access to User Administration tools. For this reason, there will be no Challenges in the following articles. If you are a Brand Administrator of your own Qualtrics account, you can follow along as you read.
	In this article: 
* Defining Key Terms in User Administration
* Introduction to the User Admin Section
Defining Key Terms in User Administration
To start learning about user access, you need to know the definition of a few key terms.
* User Accounts: Each user who accesses a dashboard must have an account created for them on your Qualtrics license. Dashboard viewer accounts are usually only given permissions to access dashboards and manage tickets. Brand Administrators must create these accounts.
* Roles: A role is a group of user accounts. When used successfully, roles will simplify the sharing of dashboards, because you can share a dashboard with an entire role, instead of one user at a time. Roles should be groups of users that will receive a similar level of access to a dashboard. For a customer care center, one role could be frontline agents, while another role would be the managers of the frontline agents, and a third role would be the executive team overseeing the contact center operations.
* Roles: A role is a group of user accounts. When used successfully, roles will simplify the sharing of dashboards, because you can share a dashboard with an entire role, instead of one user at a time. Roles should be groups of users that will receive a similar level of access to a dashboard. In a hospital, one role could be nurses, while another role would be the service line leader, and a third role would be the executive team overseeing the hospital operations.
* Attributes: Attributes are additional fields of data that you can add to each dashboard viewer’s account profile. Think of these like operational data fields. Common examples could include a viewer's employee number, their job role, or the region or location where they work. Each attribute will have a field name, with associated values. So, you could have an attribute named Region, with values West, Central, and East. Each user would have one of these values. 
Attributes can be used to allow for the automatic creation of roles, where you add everyone who has a specific attribute value to one role. Attributes will also be used to personalize the data each viewer sees upon logging in to the dashboard to ensure each person sees the right thing.
* Single Sign-On (SSO): Many organizations automate their dashboard user administration through the use of a Single Sign-On system. SSO systems allow users to sign in to multiple platforms with just one set of login credentials. If your organization has a system that employees use to sign in to a company network, that system could also be used to sign in to Qualtrics. In addition to making it easier for your viewers to sign in, an integration of an SSO with Qualtrics can allow changes made to your internal employee directory to be automatically updated in Qualtrics. As employees leave your organization or change job functions, an integration can update Qualtrics automatically so that the employee’s dashboard access is modified or terminated.
Introduction to the User Admin Section
In order to access the user administration section, return to the main page of a Dashboards project, then access the User Admin tab. Remember that this tab will only be available to brand admin accounts. Your Basecamp training account will not have access to this tab.


The User Admin section is made up of three sections, Users , Org Hierarchy, and Roles.


The Users tab is where you will see a list of all user accounts in your organization. You can search for viewers, view and edit their personal information including their attributes, and you can import new users.
The Org Hierarchy tab provides a way for you to upload your organization’s employee structure into Qualtrics.


	Note
	Hierarchies are brand-wide and not project-specific.
	The Roles tab is where you create and manage your roles. You can add users to roles here or enable tools that automatically add users to roles. You will learn more about roles in the following article. 


	

	Roles will be preconfigured for your brand as part of the implementation process.
	Managing Users and Roles
Now that you know about the basic definitions important to managing dashboard users, you can learn about creating their accounts and managing their information.
While user accounts will have been created for your license by the implementation team, it is important to learn about editing them and managing their information.
In this article: 
* Creating User Accounts
* Editing User Accounts
* Managing Roles
* Automatic Role Assignment
Creating User Accounts
To create new dashboard viewer accounts, click Add Users.


There are two ways to add users: select Import from file to add a large number of users, or select Manually add users to add users individually.
To add many users:
1. Select Import from file.
2. You will first need to modify your user information to be in the format that Qualtrics expects. To view this format, download one of the available templates.


3. Use the Template to add users. The uniqueidentifier, FirstName, LastName, and Email columns must be included. You can also add a Username column. If this column is omitted, the username will simply be the user’s email address.


4. Add any additional pieces of information you would like to store for each user in the subsequent columns. Each additional field of information will be saved as an Attribute.
5. If desired, add a Password column. If you do not include this column a password will be randomly generated for each user account.
6. When the file is ready, return to Qualtrics, browse for the file, and upload.
7. You will be asked to check for errors. Once Qualtrics has confirmed the format is correct, click Finalize import to add the users.
To add users manually:
1. Select Manually add users, then input information for the first new user into the table.
2. Click the Add metadata button to add attributes to the users.
3. Click Add participant once you have finished filling in the table. This will reset the fields giving you the opportunity to input additional users if needed.


4. Click Save once complete.
After new users have been added, you will need to make sure they have received their login credentials to the dashboard. To do so, select the new users using the checkbox, click the Bulk Actions menu and select Email login credentials to selected users.


This option will send an email containing a username and password to all users you have selected.
Editing User Accounts
After creating user accounts, they will all be visible in the Users tab. Use the search bar to search for users on basic information like name and email.
All user accounts will be visible in the Users tab. Use the search bar to search for users on basic information like name and email.
Click Advanced Search to create advanced searches that use multiple lines of logic or create searches based on the metadata attached to each user.


After finding a user, click their entry in the user table to open their User Profile. Here, you can view and update the information associated with that account. This includes the user’s name, unique identifier, email address, and any metadata. In the below example, John Doe has a couple of attributes, including gender and start date. He has a corresponding value for each metadata field.


In addition to editing the existing metadata, you can add more information to a user account by clicking +Add Metadata under Field name and entering a corresponding value.
To view multiple User Profiles at once, you can export users to a CSV file that can be opened in Excel. To export all users, click Bulk Actions > Export users.


To export a subset of users, select the intended users along the left-hand side, click Bulk Actions > Export selected users.


To customize what information is shown in the user table, click on the small arrow in the top right corner of the table to select which fields are displayed from the dropdown menu.


Managing Roles
Next, navigate to the Roles tab to view and modify your roles.


The Roles tab is laid out into three columns. On the left, you can find and create roles. The middle section allows you to manage users who are part of the selected role. The right-hand side enables you to manage dashboard permissions for the members of that role.
To create a new role, click Add new role at the top of the list of roles, enter a name, and click Create.


Select Add /Export to either add users individually or as a group. To add users on an individual basis, select the Add users option and simply search for the user’s name(s).
To add users by a group, select Add users using filters and create a condition based on metadata to assign a group of people to the role. In the example below, any existing user with the Metadata value of "Job Role" is "Frontline Rep" will be added to the newly created Frontline Role.


When you are finished, click Add.
Automatic Role Assignment
It is strongly recommended to use Automatic role assignment. This feature allows you to automatically assign a user to a role if they have a specific attribute value each time new users are added. If set up correctly, you can leverage this feature to automatically provide new users with access to a dashboard as soon as their account is created. This will be a necessary time saver once your program is up and running!
To set this up, select Add/Export > Automatic role assignment.


In the following example, any user will be added to the Executive role if the user’s value for the “Job Role” metadata field is “Executive.” Now, any time this organization hires a new executive, as long as they give them the proper attribute upon creating their account, the user will be included in the Executive role.


Click Assign. With the automation activated, new users who meet the condition will be automatically assigned to the role when they log in and access a dashboard. Upon assigning the automation, it will also do a one-time assignment which will add all existing users that match the criteria to the role immediately.
Granting Dashboard Access to Share Insights
Sharing Dashboards with Users and Roles
After user accounts are created and roles are established, you are ready to share your dashboard!
In this article: 
* Accessing Sharing Options
* Dashboard Permission Levels
* Restricting Data
* Page Permissions
Accessing Sharing Options
In a Dashboards project, there are two ways to share a dashboard.
1. A Brand Administrator can assign a dashboard to a role in the Roles section of the User Admin tab.


2. Any user with editing privileges on a dashboard can share a dashboard by clicking the Share button within a dashboard.


In this course, we will focus on the Share menu within the dashboard, but the options that are presented can be applied to sharing dashboards within the User Admin tab.
The first step is to use the search bar to search for the user or role with which you are sharing the dashboard. Type in a user’s name or username, or search for the role name.


Then, you will modify a series of controls to determine exactly the level of access that this user or role will have.
Dashboard Permission Levels
The first selection to make is the permissions of dashboard viewers. There are four options.


* View access allows a user to view your dashboard and modify filter conditions. But, they are not able to modify the structure of the dashboard in any way, and any modifications they make to filter conditions are not seen by other viewers. This is the option you will use for most dashboard viewers who are not involved with building the dashboard in any way.
* Export (JPG, PDF) access has the same permissions as View access but allows a viewer to export images of an entire dashboard page or an individual widget. This access level makes sense if you expect viewers to use insights they find in the dashboard in their own presentations.
* Export access has the same permissions as Export (JPG, PDF), but also allows the viewer to export the raw data that populates the dashboard as a .csv file. Only enable this option for viewers that should have permission to view your full dataset, which could contain sensitive or private information.
* Edit access gives a user full access to the dashboard. They can now edit the structure of the dashboard, including building new widgets and pages. Giving someone edit access makes them a co-author of the dashboard. Only provide this level of access to your teammates or anyone who is directly building the dashboard with you.
The next control is related to Action Plans. Similar to permissions of Dashboard viewers, you can give a user edit or view access to any Action Plans you have created.


Permission settings and Action Plan settings interact to help you customize the access you want to grant each user. For example, if you only have permission to view the Dashboard but have permission to edit the Action Plans, you will be able to edit the Action Plan settings, but will not be able to edit the dashboard widgets, pages, permissions etc.
Restricting Data
The most complex portion of sharing a dashboard is restricting data access. A data restriction is like a filter that a dashboard viewer can not modify. It prevents the viewer from seeing a portion of your dataset.
Perhaps one specific manager should only view one region’s set of data. Or, when a frontline agent logs in, they should only see responses related to their own customer interactions, and not all customer interactions across all agents. You certainly would not want to build a separate page for each manager or employee, so you will need to restrict data in such a way that each viewer has a customized set of data.


	Note
	You can only apply data restrictions to users who have View or Export permission.
	In our first example, the role of managers from the west region will only be able to see data associated with that region. In our survey, we have captured an Embedded Data field that indicates which region a customer is from. To apply a data restriction based on this dashboard field:
1. Click All Data next to the user or role’s name.
2. Click Add Restrictions.
3. Select the dashboard field the restriction will be based on, in this case, Region.


4. Select is as the operator. Then, select the field value this role should see, which in this example is West. Multiple values can be selected.
5. If Allow rollup data is selected, the viewer will be able to modify the Region filter to see all responses. In this example, a viewer will be able to see only responses from the west or all responses, but would not be able to view only responses from another region. Enable this option if you want viewers to be able to compare their data to the full organization.


6. Click Done to enable the restriction. You will see the restriction present on the Share Dashboard menu.


The next example is more complex. For frontline agents, each viewer will need to see responses that relate to only their own customer interactions. In order to restrict data in this way, you will need to use attributes!
In our survey data, we have saved the employee ID of the front line agent who worked with the respondent as an Embedded Data field. We have also stored each employee’s ID as an attribute associated with their Qualtrics account. The data restriction will be set up so that if a dashboard viewer’s employee ID that is saved as an attribute matches the employee ID found on a survey response, they will be able to see that response. They will not be able to see any responses where the employee ID from the survey does not match their ID saved as an attribute.
1. As before, click Add Restrictions, then choose the dashboard field, which in this case is named Employee.
2. Instead of selecting is as the operator, select matches user attribute.
3. Select the attribute field where employee IDs are stored, which is named EmployeeID in our organization.


4. As before, determine whether you would like to allow rollup data, then click Done.
In order to enact this method of sharing, you will need to ensure that employee IDs are captured correctly in the survey, and stored as attributes for every employee. When configured correctly, this is a very powerful tool for enabling a dashboard across your organization.
Page Permission
The final control in the sharing menu is more simple. You can determine which pages a viewer or role should access. If you are sharing a dashboard with front line agents and managers and have built a separate page for each audience, this is how you will ensure that each audience sees only what you have built for them. You will simply select the pages the audience should view and leave others unselected.


Once you have finished configuring your permissions, you click Save to share the dashboard. If Email Updated Users is selected, each user who had permissions updated will receive an email letting them know they have access to the dashboard.




Dashboard Adoption
You have now learned everything you need to know in order to build and launch a dashboard! We will finish this section by providing some tips to increase the engagement that your viewers have with a dashboard. In addition to needing to be easy to use, viewers must understand the value the dashboard provides and know what problems it can solve.
In this article: 
* Catering to Your Audience
* Providing the Right Level of Detail
* Being Consistent
* Using Kiosk Mode
* Determine Where Your Company Should Focus its Efforts
* Exporting Dashboards
* Using Dashboard Notifications
* Managing Notification Subscriptions
Catering to Your Audience
It is important to make sure that your dashboard is designed with your audience in mind at all times. Before you build the dashboard, we recommend interviewing your key stakeholders to understand what questions the dashboard can answer for them, and what they are most interested in looking at. Then, you can ensure that you are building widgets that make it easy to find what they are looking for every time they log in. If an executive wants to see how NPS® compares over time and across regions, you should build widgets for both of these ideas and display them prominently on the executive’s page.
When building a dashboard for a larger team, it is important to engage with the leadership of that team while building the dashboard. With a contact center, you will ideally have a manager from that team work with you during the design portion to ensure that the final product will track the metrics that matter most to frontline agents and their managers.
Providing the Right Level of Detail
In general, you will find that executives and other leaders will not make a lot of time to look at the dashboard. So, you need to make sure that pages built for this audience are straight to the point. Executive summaries are often just a few widgets and do not contain any extra information the executive will not be interested in.
Frontline employees who are expected to learn from their dashboard in order to improve the experience they provide will spend more time analyzing the dashboard. It is more reasonable to dive into the details when you are building for viewers farther down the org structure.
Be Consistent
When building multiple dashboards, it is important to practice consistency in how you communicate your data. There are multiple widget types available to you when building a dashboard, but you do not want to overwhelm viewers with variety and complexity. If you have always presented an important metric like overall satisfaction with a bar chart, it is wise to continue using a bar chart so that viewers do not have to learn a new way to understand the data. Being consistent in your designs is an easy way to make analysis simple for your viewers, and simple analysis fosters more usage.
Using Kiosk Mode
When Kiosk Mode is enabled, the dashboard appears on your monitor’s full screen. If your dashboard has multiple pages, kiosk mode will cycle through each page every 30 seconds.


Enable Kiosk Mode on monitors and screens in places where dashboard viewers work, such as the area of the office where frontline representatives sit, or in the executive suite. Your viewers will always have access to the insights your dashboard provides and can see how the team is performing at a glance.
Determine Where Your Company Should Focus its Efforts


Determining where to put your company's efforts can be daunting. Use Spotlight Insights to help you discover new insights from your customers' feedback. With Spotlight Insights you can determine which key metrics you should be focusing on to improve your customers' experience gap.


	Note
	To use Spotlight Insights, you must be a Brand Administrator or CX Administrator. You must also have edit access to the dashboard.
	Exporting Dashboards
When sharing your dashboard with users and roles, you need to determine whether viewers will be able to export dashboard content. Exporting widgets and pages allows your viewers to take the insights they have learned and present them to others.
When the option to export as a PDF or JPG is enabled, a viewer will be able to click the export icon on a widget.


Viewers can also export the entire dashboard page by clicking on the Export icon at the top of the page, then clicking Download Dashboard.


If the option to export to .csv files is enabled, you can select CSV as the file type on this menu. When this option is selected, a .csv file that contains the raw data used to populate the dashboard will be exported. This option should only be made available to viewers who will be doing their own separate analysis of your data.
Dashboard viewers with editing permission will be able to use all types of exports.
Using Dashboard Notifications
Ideally, your key stakeholders will regularly check the dashboard you have built for them, but sometimes this is not realistic. You can create notifications to automatically alert leaders at your organization when a key metric falls below a threshold or when your response rate decreases. Dashboard notifications are email messages that are sent to key stakeholders. You can choose to send these notifications when a key metric or response count is performing above or below a specified threshold.
To create a Dashboard notification:
1. Navigate to the Notifications tab from within the Dashboard Settings menu.


2. Click Add notification.
3. Select the Date field on which your notification will be based.
4. Select the Notification type. Choose from three options:
   1. Threshold notifications will be sent when the selected field’s value is above or below a set threshold.
   2. Relative notifications will be sent when the selected field’s value has a significant change from a previous time period, either positive or negative.
   3. Trending detection notification will be sent when a change in a popular trend is identified in Text iQ. This type of notification is meant to keep appropriate teams updated on emerging topic trends in open-ended feedback.
5. If you selected Threshold or Relative notification, select the Metric that determines which calculation will be applied to the field when evaluating the condition. Choose from NPS®, Count, Average, or Top-Bottom Box.


6. Select the field on which your notification will be based. 
   1. If you selected a metric other than Count for a Threshold or Relative notification, you will need to specify the field by choosing from any of the Numeric Value fields that are mapped in the dashboard data.
   2. For Trending detection notifications, you can add any Number Set, Multi-Answer Text Set, or Text Set field that is mapped in the dashboard data. We recommend you add topics or sentiments you have mapped in the dashboard.
7. Enter the conditions needed for the notification to fire. Some of the options you can select include:
   1. How often you would like to be notified.
   2. The Measurement and/or Threshold value(s) that determines if the notification is sent.
   3. A Minimum Sample Size to ensure the notification is only sent when you have a meaningful quantity of data.
   4. Checking for statistical significance so that recipients not only find out if the threshold was met, but whether that result is significant or not.


In the above image, a notification will send if the average CSAT score from the last week falls below a 4.
8. Specify the recipient(s) of the notification. You can select individual users or entire roles by searching for the associated name. The notification email will be sent to the email address associated with that account.


	Tip
	Only users with access to the dashboard can receive these notifications. Selecting roles allows you to apply data restrictions to the notifications
	9. Optionally, configure Filters and utilize User attributes to customize the data being sent through the notification to each viewer.
10. Choose whether you want to leverage Notification groups. This sends separate notifications for each value in the group. For this step, the field you want to break out notifications by should be mapped to your dashboard.


	Note
	For example, you have a “Region” field with possible values APJ, US, and EMEA. When you receive a CSAT notification, you’d like to see how each of these regions performs on average CSAT rather than just an overall average CSAT for the company. Thus instead of one average CSAT, you will see a value for APJ, a value for the US, and a value for EMEA.
	The Notifications page will list all notifications that have been built for this dashboard. You can click to edit or remove a notification at any time.


When the specified condition is met, the indicated recipient will receive the notification by email. If your notification is daily, you will see an email similar to the one pictured below.


The email contains a few elements:
* The score received for the field on which the notification condition is based
* An explanation of the condition that triggers the notification
* A link to the dashboard so the stakeholder can take a closer look
Emails for a monthly or weekly notification will contain more information in the message itself. These notifications will contain graphs and charts that depict a breakdown of the selected field and a comparison of that field's performance to the previous time period.
Managing Notification Subscriptions
Within the Notifications Feed users can manage which Notification Types they are subscribed to. Notification Types include:
* Workflows: based on Notification Feed Tasks
* CX Metrics Changes: based on CX Dashboard Notifications
* Survey Sharing: based on surveys collaborated with your account
* Digests: based on responses to Active Surveys
For more information on Notifications Types please see this Support Page.
To subscribe to all notification types:
1. Click on the Notification icon in the top right of the account


2. Select the Settings cogwheel
3. Use the toggle next to Notifications to subscribe to all notification types (when enabled it shows a blue color) 


	Note
	After enabling the option to subscribe to all notification types, the toggles below can be used to customize which particular notification types a user wishes to unsubscribe from
	To unsubscribe from all notification types simply use the toggle next to Notifications (when the toggle is grey all notification types are disabled).


Once you have subscribed to the appropriate notifications, they can be viewed in the Notifications Feed. Notifications have 3 possible statuses:


1. Unseen: Appear in blue and have a blue dot to the left of the notification. This happens when new notifications have been added since the last time you clicked on the notifications icon
2. Seen: Appear in blue. This happens when you previously clicked notification icon, did not interact with the notifications when they initially appeared at that time, but have now revisited this section
3. Read: Appear greyed out. This means you have previously interacted with these notifications
Lesson 6 -  Analyzing Text Responses
Maximizing Text Analytics
Text Analytics Process 
Text analysis is hard. It is less precise and more time consuming than other forms of analysis. So why bother? Text analysis not only allows you to capture how respondents rate you on things you know about, but it also allows you to capture patterns you did not even know existed. Including open text questions allow respondents to define what is important to them rather than asking predefined questions of what the company thinks is important. Allowing that flexibility for the respondent and using text analysis surfaces unexpected insights that help you understand your customers and their journey.


The Text Analytics Process is a 5-step process that enables you to glean more value from your text data and be able to drive change in your CX organization. In this article, you will learn the 5 step process for effective text analysis
Plan
The first step of this process is to start with your end goal in mind. Have a clear definition of what you want from your text data. In an ideal world, you would be able to plan what you want to get out of your text data and structure your data collection process around that as it makes for the most accurate and valuable data. To give yourself a head start, you can derive these ideas from company goals, historical pain points, key metrics, stakeholders, or even loyal customers. 
For example, consider a director of a call center that receives frequent customer complaints regarding the experience of working with call center agents. The director may want to use text data to explore the specific pain points of this interaction. The plan, then, is to ask targeted, open-ended questions that identify improvement opportunities that managers can leverage in coaching conversations with agents on their teams in order to improve the overall customer experience.
Build
Next, configure your survey in a way that allows you to capture feedback around the goal you have defined. Ensure you are asking questions that will capture text data that addresses that goal. The more targeted the question, the better. Writing a good open-ended question is a balancing act. You need to prompt respondents to provide useful information, while still giving them the freedom to respond as they would like.


Continuing the example from the Plan phase, the director wants to ask questions that will solicit feedback on their call center agents. The screenshot above is prompting customers to comment on what they liked but still allowing them to be flexible. While at first glance it may seem like it has achieved the proper balance, there are still improvements to be made. It can be beneficial to identify your program’s strengths, but in this case, the director wants to identify improvement opportunities. The way this question is worded will not help uncover what managers can improve through coaching their agents.


If you were looking to understand what to improve upon, the above question would be a great way to do so. This gives the customers the opportunity to tell the call center what they see as a gap, but still keeps them focused so they should not receive comments pertaining to factors outside the interaction. It also prompts the respondent to keep the answer concise, which is a great way to keep customers focused on only the most important items.


	Tip
	Do not ask questions only of detractors, rather ask everyone about their experience using neutral language. People are already more likely to send feedback to a company after a very bad experience rather than a very good one. Do not further skew your text data by only allowing detractors to give you feedback on their experience.
	Clean
The next phase of the text analytics process is to clean your data. Ensuring data accuracy makes the analysis stage easier. Take the time to make your data as clean as possible. Cleaning your data is an integral part of Text iQ and often is a step that is missed.
Part of cleaning your data is creating stop words. The most common way to create stop words is at an organizational level, however, be cognizant that you are blocking these words for the entire company. Stop words are most commonly used to filter out profanity.
Text iQ speeds up the process of analyzing data, but it does not replace human analysis, so the next step is to take the time to review your data. It is critical to keep comments in context and not rely too heavily on Text iQ to take the burden of reading verbatims. Read through your comments to understand if there is something else that you need to account for when cleaning your data.
For example, if there is a restaurant chain that makes a reuben sandwich but also has a manager named Reuben some of the feedback may not make sense at first glance. If you are trying to focus on feedback about customer service it will be important to remove the comments that speak about the sandwich in order to avoid confusion. If you keep things in context and read through your data, you will be able to clearly see the whole picture and identify any other scenarios you may not have accounted for in the build phase.
The last step in the clean phase is to check the sentiment and Topics Text iQ has assigned to each comment. Topics are categorized text data, whereas sentiment gives an overview of emotional opinions behind certain Topics. You will probably find that most of the time Text iQ gets it right, but there are instances where complicated language, like sarcasm, is misunderstood by our AI. If Text iQ did not assign the right sentiment or topic, you can make updates as you see fit.
The more data you collect, the more you will be able to train Text iQ to tag these correctly. We regularly run batch analysis on all client manual edits to improve the accuracy of the model, assess improvements, and correct mistakes that Text iQ is making in sentiment identification.
Analyze
The fourth phase of the text analytics process, analyzing, is where you will spend the bulk of your time.
How Text iQ Works
	Questions Text iQ Answers
	Looks at the comment
	What did the respondent say?
	Processes the comment in the form of topics
	What did they mean?
	Assigns a sentiment score based on the emotional tone of the comment
	How did they feel when you said it?
	We will take a deeper look at this phase later on.
Take Action
The final, and arguably most important, phase of the text analytics process is taking action on your data. Getting the right textual data is the first step in determining the failure or success of any downstream analysis. Start by making well-informed recommendations based on your raw data that will position others in the organization to make effective decisions. You should present the findings in your text data in an easily digestible format, such as a dashboard, to those who will be making the decisions.
Next, if you are the one responsible for your CX program, turn these recommendations into new policies or initiatives that will drive positive business outcomes from your relevant data. Finally, revisit your end goal. Did you accomplish what your plan phase identified? Did you find new insights that you can iterate on?
Understanding Text iQ
Analyzing Text with Text iQ
Text iQ allows you to search and categorize your textual responses into topics. Categorizing topics enables you to extract value from your text data in an efficient and productive way. 
In this article: 
* Navigating Text iQ
* Creating and Adjusting Topics Manually
* Adding New Responses
* Importing & Exporting Topics
* Parent Topics
Navigating Text iQ
You can access Text iQ in three ways - via the Data & Analysis tab of your project, the project actions menu, or directly from a dashboard project. From within your survey project: navigate to the Data & Analysis tab and click Text. Then use the Field dropdown to select the relevant text entry question. The responses from this chosen question will be used in your analysis.




From the project actions menu: Click on the three dots to the right of your project name and select Data & Analysis then navigate to the Text tab.




From a dashboard:  Click into a dashboard project and select the Analyze in Text iQ option.




After you create Topics, use the menu on the left to navigate to different Topics so you can view the responses tagged with that Topic or edit the criteria of the Topic. You can also view untagged responses and search the names of existing Topics.
Text iQ has 2 modes:
* Use Editing Mode when adding and modifying topics. 
* Use Analysis Mode to view visualizations that depict trends in your text iQ data. 




Switch between modes by clicking the icon in the upper-right. Click the checkmark when in Editing Mode to move to Analysis Mode and click the pen when in Analysis Mode to return to Editing Mode.
Creating and Adjusting Topics Manually
You can create your own topics by searching for common terms. Any responses containing that term will be tagged with the topic.
To create a new topic:
1. Enter a keyword or query into the search bar above your list of responses. Learn more about the options you have when building queries here. 


	Note
	Text iQ uses spell check automatically so that you can easily assign topic tags to search results.
	2. Review the responses included.
3. Click Create Topic. 




4. Name your topic, and then click Add Topic.
All displayed responses from that search are tagged with the topic name. Topics are listed on the left of the Text iQ page.




Click on a topic to view only the responses tagged with that topic, or click All Topics to view every response.
You can also edit or change the name of a topic by hovering your mouse beside the current topic name and clicking on the 3 dots that appear.




On an individual response, you can manually enter new tags or adjust existing tags instead of searching for them. To do this, click the plus button below the response. Then, manually type in a new topic or the name of a topic you have already created.




If needed, you have the option to delete topics individually or several at once so you can perform easy cleanup and maintenance of your topics. To delete several topics at once, click on the 3 dots next to All Topics and select which topics you want to delete.




Adding New Responses 
When new responses come in, you will need to add them to Text iQ so that they can be included in your Topics. Click the green button that indicates the number of new responses in the upper-left to add your new responses.


Importing & Exporting Topics
You can export topics for use in other surveys’ text analyses. To do this, click on the 3 dots next to All Topics on the left side and select Export Topics > Download. 


Then, you can import topics that you created in other surveys, or you can import topics from a library created by Qualtrics XM Scientists.
To import topics from other surveys:
1. Go to the survey where you want to add these topics.
2. Go to Text in the Data & Analysis tab, and enter edit mode.
3. Click the three dots in the top right-hand corner of the topics panel and select Import Topics. 


4. Select Upload file. 


5. Click Browse and select the JSON file you exported from a previous survey.
6. Confirm the preview of the topics you are about to import looks correct, and click Import. 


To import topics from libraries:


	Tip
	Libraries are a great way to give yourself a headstart in identifying topics. These topics have been developed by Qualtrics subject-matter experts.
	1. Click the three dots in the top right-hand corner of the topics panel and select Import Topics.
2. Select Starter Packs. 


	

	Please note that the Healthcare Stater Pack serves as a baseline, providing common examples of text topics we expect to see when analyzing Patient Experience data. These topics should be further built on and customized according to the patient data you receive. 
	3. 4. Select the type of topics you’d like to import. 




5. Click the dropdown arrow next to the heading to expand the list of topics that will be added to your responses. 




6. Click Import.


	Note
	You can edit topics as needed once they are imported. For example, delete topics, rename topics, or edit the queries that define them.
	Parent Topics
Parent Topics are Topics that include other Topics, allowing you to create a hierarchy of text Topics. All responses from the Topics nested within a Parent Topic will appear when you click on it. For example, you run a survey asking for feedback on your restaurant. You have Topics called “burgers,” “drinks,” and “desserts.” You want to group these concepts together, so you add a Parent Topic called “Menu,” since this is all feedback about the menu.
Parent Topics are Topics that include other Topics, allowing you to create a hierarchy of text Topics. All responses from the Topics nested within a Parent Topic will appear when you click on it. For example, you run a survey asking for feedback on your clinic. You have Topics called “acupuncture,” “physiotherapy,” and “laser.” You want to group these concepts together, so you add a Parent Topic called “Treatment,” since this is all feedback about the different treatments you offer.
To create a Parent Topic:
1. Hover over the Topic and click the three dots. 
2. Select Move to...
3. Select Create New Parent Topic. 


4. Name the Parent Topic.
5. Click Save.
To move another Topic to this same Parent Topic, just highlight the Topic, click the dots, and select Move To... the existing Topic.
Searching Text Responses
Text analysis furthers your insights with textual response data that may have been overlooked before. However, it can be difficult to search for certain terms. Use these guidelines to develop effective search terms.
In this article: 
* Lemmatization and Spell Check
* Building Complex Searches
* Combining Fields
* Query Builder
* Adding from Recommended Topics
* Applying Changes
Lemmatization and Spell Check
Text search uses lemmatization and spell check to make your analysis much more useful and powerful than a basic keyword search. With lemmatization, the text search finds the root word of your query and locates all responses that use some form of that root. For example, if you search for “mistake,” it returns all iterations of “mistake” (mistakes, mistaken, and so on).
With spell check, the text search ensures your responses are tagged correctly—even misspelled words. For example, if you are looking for responses that mention cleanliness and a respondent had misspelled “clean” as “cleen,” spell check finds “cleen” and tags it under your topic.
Building Complex Searches
After building a new topic, you can click on the topic to view all responses that have been tagged. You can also enhance the search criteria used to build that topic using commands such as:
* And—Conjoins two words and narrows results. Rather than searching for just “service,” you could search for “service and customer.” 
* And—Conjoins two words and narrows results. Rather than searching for just “service,” you could search for “service and patient.”
* Or—Searches for two words independently. Rather than searching for “cost,” you could search “cost or price,” as these words are used interchangeably. This is the most common operator. Most queries are just a series of “or” conjunctions.
* Not—Searches for one word without the other therefore restricting results. Rather than searching for just “service,” you say “service not customer” to see comments about service that do not mention customers.
* Not—Searches for one word without the other therefore restricting results. Rather than searching for just “service,” you say “service not patient” to see comments about service that do not mention patients.
* Parentheses—Group logic statements and ensure your query is specific enough. Using a string like “(add and account) or login or chip” will find any responses that contain the words chip or login, or both add and account. Use parentheses to chain words together and clarify your searches.
* Tilde—Searches for words that often appear together that are not always an exact phrase. Specify how close words are together using ~#. For example, search “internet slow”~2 to find responses where “internet” and “slow” are a maximum of 2 words apart.
You can find more examples of operators to apply to complex searches in the Text tab by clicking the information icon next to the search bar.
Query Builder 
Related terms help you build better topics. The Query Builder suggests related terms based on the English Language Model and frequency of co-occurrence between these terms in your data. After you begin typing a term, Qualtrics will also offer you Related Terms as you search to help you build better topics.
To use the Query Builder:
1. Go to the text search bar in the Text tab.
2. Type the words or phrases of interest.
3. Click related terms as they appear below the search bar to add them to your search. They will be added at the end of the query with an “or” operator.
Combining Fields
You have the option to create a new field that combines two similar questions into one field for analysis. You are able to combine almost any 2 or more fields that you want. You have the option to coalesce variables, meaning choose the order in which certain answers override others, or to concatenate variables, which allows you to take two or more variables and link their values together into a list. If you want to learn more about these options, please see our support page.
Adding from Recommended Topics
Text iQ automatically recommends topics to you based on terms that frequently appear in responses you have collected. Qualtrics’ goal for topic recommendations is to find groups of words in your responses that indicate a coherent insight. Text iQ uses deep learning on your responses to detect topics. Some of the key concepts employed include word embeddings (numerical representations of words), attention (neural nets focusing on the most influential words in responses), and various word frequency statistics compared to global English usage. Based on these, and careful use of coverage/topic coherence/reconstruction measures, Qualtrics can find topics that accurately represent major themes in your responses.
In the Text tab:
1. View the Topic Recommendations in the upper-right hand corner. 




2. Click on a topic to view the terms contained. The topic will include a list of similar terms.
3. Modify the search query to remove or add any words. 
4. Click Create Topic, then give the topic a new name. 


5. Click Add Topic.


	Tip
	You can also import topics and their parents that you created in other surveys, or you can import topics from a library created by Qualtrics XM Scientists. For more information, check out our support page.
	Applying Changes
After you make any edits, a yellow banner appears at the top of your screening saying “You have staged changes that have not been applied.” Click on the green checkmark button in the upper-right to view a summary of your changes. 


Review the changes and select one of the following options:
* Apply Changes: Save your changes.
* Discard Changes: Cancel your changes and return your setup to the previous version.
* Close: Return to editing your Topics.
Shortly after you apply changes, you are taken to the Text iQ dashboard where you can analyze your topics. To return to editing mode where further changes can be made to your topics, click the blue pen icon in the upper-right hand corner. 
Identifying Key Insights with Sentiment
After creating text topics, you can analyze your open-ended responses within Text iQ.
In this article: 
* Sentiment Analysis
* Using the Text iQ Summary Page
* Displaying Text iQ Fields
Sentiment Analysis
Sentiment analysis gives an overview of the emotional opinions behind certain topics. Each piece of text is automatically given a sentiment category and sentiment score. The sentiment categories are:
* Very Negative
* Negative
* Very Postive
* Positive
* Neutral
* Mixed response
Text Sentiment is mixed if it contains both positive and negative sentiments. Text is neutral if it is neither positive nor negative.
Sentiment scores are calculated on a scale from -2 to +2. The more negative the response is, the more negative the score will be. The more positive a response is, the more positive the score will be. A response with a score of 0 is neutral.
The sentiment category is displayed by the color:


* Solid Red: Very Negative
* Half Red: Negative
* Purple with a line in the middle: Mixed
* Half Blue: Positive
* Solid Blue: Very Positive
* White with Gray Outline: Neutral
If you feel that the assigned sentiment score or category for a response should be different, you can update the category and score by clicking the Edit comment icon while in the Editing Mode of Text iQ.


From this window, you can choose the Comment Overall Score and specific Topic Sentiment Scores. Simply select the sentiment score you think is most appropriate for each.


Qualtrics' sentiment analysis models draw on both the context (question text) and the response text to classify the sentiment. For example, the answer "nothing" will have different sentiment assigned to it if the context is "What is one thing this product does really well?" versus "What are your suggestions for improving our service?" due to the bias built into the question text.
The more data you collect, the more you will be able to train Qualtrics to tag these sentiments correctly. Our analysis tool periodically runs batch analysis on all manual corrections made by users to improve the accuracy of the model, assess improvements, and correct mistakes that Text iQ is making in sentiment identification.
Using the Text iQ Summary Page
After applying changes you have made to text topics and sentiment, you are taken to the summary view within Text iQ. This view displays all of the responses to the question you are analyzing along with their associated topics and sentiment values. It also displays visualizations that allow you to analyze the topics and sentiment you have set up.


Consider each visualization on this page:
The Bubble widget displays how many responses in each topic are in each sentiment category.


Additionally, this widget displays the average sentiment score for that topic. The bubbles in the widget are arranged so that topics with a higher average score are higher on the widget.


	Note
	The bubbles floating are dependent on the number of topics and space available.
	The size of the bubble also plays a part. The bigger the bubble, the more frequently that topic is talked about. If you would like to see more details you can hover over the topic you want to know more about.
The Response Ticker displays each comment, along with the sentiment score and its associated topic(s). This is similar to the display you see in Editing Mode of Text iQ.


The Top Topic Change widget shows how the number of responses fitting into your topics changes over time. It displays topics that are shrinking and growing over the specified time period. In this screenshot, you can see that "friendliness" has had a significant decrease in the frequency it is talked about, while "clothing" and "denim jeans" have seen a small increase.


The Top Sentiment Change widget displays how the average sentiment score has changed over time for each topic. If you notice within the topic trends that something is being talked about more frequently, you should come to the top sentiment changes widget to understand whether it is positive or negative. Following the first screenshot, we noticed a small increase in the frequency "denim jeans" were mentioned. If we refer to the top sentiment change widget we can now see that it has had a positive change.


The Word Cloud widget displays the words that appear most often across all responses. You can use this widget to get a sense of common terms when building text topics.


Displaying Text iQ Fields
In addition to analyzing text topics and sentiment within the Text iQ interface, you can view Text iQ information in other places. Topics and sentiment scores are saved as fields and can be used in the data table. These fields can also be exported as part of your data set and are available for analysis in Stats iQ.


Finally, these fields are available for use when building a dashboard or report. You can build your own widgets based on topics and sentiment, and have them appear alongside the rest of the data you have collected. It is a good idea to include topics in dashboards and to let others engage with text topics to determine what they can take action on. For more information on using Text iQ in dashboards, please visit our support page.







Qualtrics Delivery Overview 
Overview
This lesson provides an overview of how you will engage with Qualtrics teams during a standard implementation. A variety of topics will be covered including an overview of Qualtrics delivery methodology, roles within Qualtrics and other supporting roles, and how to get support from the Qualtrics Partner Network (QPN).
Delivery Methodology for Qualtrics (XM Framework)




The XM Framework is a set of methodologies, recommended best practices, and practical guides to enable organizations of any size to build world class XM programs and transform their customer, employee, brand, and product experiences. Qualtrics applies the XM Framework to its entire customer lifecycle to guide customers through building their XM practices. The XM Framework is divided into five phases: Evaluate,  Architect, Deliver, Realize, and Amplify. Each phase includes several stages that are composed of activities, artifacts, and training materials that implementers can leverage in their customer engagements.
Evaluate 
In the Evaluate phase, we introduce Experience Management and work with an organization to understand how Qualtrics can help an organization measure and improve its key performance indicators through an XM program. This phase includes the discovery phase of the sales cycle.
Architect 
The focus of the Architect phase is to create consensus between key stakeholders and teams on the objectives, key results, current situation and overall approach to the XM program. We’ll design the program and ensure the right set of resources are engaged and prepared prior to delivery kickoff. Solution scoping and program design are included in the Architect phase.
Deliver 
In the Deliver phase, we’ll build out the XM program to match the design and thoroughly test the program ahead of change management and adoption activities leading to launching the program.
Realize 
During the Realize phase, we’ll work to help the customer build value from their XM program. Leveraging the insights gained through the XM platform, we’ll focus on helping the customer achieve the business outcomes established during the Architect phase as part of envisioning their XM program while striving to maintain a great long-term user experience which underpins ongoing adoption, usage and ROI.
Amplify 
The Amplify phase, often occurs concurrently with the Realize phase, focuses on building on initial successes and encouraging program expansion to other pillars of XM platform over time.
This course will be focused on the Deliver phase and is designed to bridge the gap between product training and delivering a program for your customers. We’ll cover best practices for configuring, deploying, and launching Qualtrics programs. The content is designed for team members who will be responsible for project management and configuration in a Qualtrics program deployment.
Qualtrics Implementation Roles
Qualtrics structures its services delivery engagements around the roles detailed in the following sections. While roles at your partner organization may not map exactly to the roles listed, we will use this terminology to identify learning paths and map your team to the appropriate support resources at Qualtrics. There are a key set of responsibilities associated with each role that must be accomplished by the partner individual identified for that role.
Engagement Manager 
Engagement Managers, previously called Program Architects, are the primary point of contact during a large-scale implementation, responsible for coordinating Qualtrics resources and ensuring the overall success of the delivery. They are typically engaged in large-scale, enterprise implementations, and manage multiple workstreams. 
Engagement Managers should be experts in both project management and Qualtrics technical configuration. 
Engagement Managers guide customers through program design in partnership with XM Scientists, including system architecture design and creation of the overall project plan. Traditionally, Engagement Managers have 8 - 10 years of experience managing software implementations. 
Technology Consultant 
Technology Consultants configure the Qualtrics XM platform solution, including assisting with survey programming, hierarchy generation, and dashboard configuration. They should be experts at Qualtrics technical configuration and troubleshooting and may provide training for the customer on using the XM Platform. They are usually customer-facing. Skills in JavaScript, CSS, and HTML can be valuable but are not necessary for the core role. Technology Consultants are not responsible for custom-coded solutions.
Technology Consultants are the single point of contact on smaller implementations. As such, they are responsible for project management and the overall success of the engagement. On large-scale enterprise implementations, several Technology Consultants may be assigned and their participation may not span the entire duration of the engagement. In this case, each Technology Consultant is responsible for a different workstream and may complete their work with the program delivery when the workstream has been successfully implemented. It's worth noting that oftentimes the delivery managers will assign multiple technology consultants to one project and elevate one of them to perform as the engagement manager on the project
Solution Architect 
Solution Architects are responsible for helping customers scope Experience Management solutions. Solution Architects put together statements of work for delivery services, including advisory, implementation, and custom engineering development (referred to as engineering services). The Qualtrics Solution Architect team is a pool of team members who step in to help scope services as needed. They are not assigned resources throughout the entire sales process or delivery.  At the start of the project, there is a handoff call between the solution architect and the project delivery lead (whether they be a technology consultant or engagement manager) to ensure all important information about the scope of the project is communicated.
XM Scientist 
XM Scientists are subject matter experts within the domain and advise on research methodology and program design. They have backgrounds in program design or consulting and usually have an advanced degree in research methodology or industrial/organizational psychology. Their advisory services are critical to the overall success of an implementation by providing best practices and industry standards to ensure the business needs are successfully met.
Technical Architect 
Technical Architects are responsible for the overall technical delivery of an engagement, including any technical architecture design and testing. 
Build Services 
Build Services team members are responsible for the configuration of the XM Platform. They differ from Technology Consultants in that they are not customer-facing team members. Most implementations do not require Build Services, as the work can be completed by the Technology Consultant. Build Services is only recommended for large-scale enterprise implementations for which there are well-documented requirements and the configuration is complex or where custom coding is required.
Software Development Engineer 
Software Development Engineers build customized software solutions, including customized dashboard widgets and software integrations. They also assist with complex data migrations developing services to import & customize data prior to getting it into the Qualtrics system. 
Qualtrics Partner Support Roles
In addition to standard delivery roles, Qualtrics has several roles to help support Partners during the implementation process.
Partner Delivery Assurance Manager (PDM) 
Some partners will be assigned a Partner Delivery Manager (PDM) from the Partner Delivery Assurance team. The team's primary goal is to help build and maintain partner delivery capability across implementations to deliver successful programs to customers. They are there to help the partner team with non-technical escalations or roadblocks they may face on their projects and to regularly discuss the status of current and upcoming projects to ensure they are all running smoothly.
Partner Ecosystem Manager (PEM) 
The Partner Ecosystem Manager is the overall owner of the relationship between the partner organization and Qualtrics. They are the main point of contact for all business development activities, including the development of a business plan. They are also responsible for revenue/services performance of the partner.
Partner Enablement Support Team 
The Partner Enablement support team develops all enablement content for partners. They provide support for onboarding partners as well as provide access to relevant enablement systems such as the Partner Academy.
Additional Qualtrics Roles
Beyond the Qualtrics Implementation and Qualtrics Partner Support roles, here are some additional roles at Qualtrics that you will want to be aware of:


Account Executives 
Account Executives are the sales team members responsible for selling Qualtrics software licenses. They are also the long-term point of contact for any license related questions.
Customer Success Managers 
Customer Success Managers are responsible for the long-term success of Qualtrics customers. They provide a strategic point of contact to help customers realize the value of the software they have purchased post-implementation and encourage license expansion.
Technical Account Managers 
Technical Account Managers are a technical long-term point of contact for selected enterprise customers. They provide proactive support to customers, answer technical questions and assist with any configuration changes to the program. TAMs are not involved in implementation. They are introduced as each workstream implementation is completed and take over as the technical resource from the Technology Consultant. It is highly recommended that customers with custom Engineering Services work purchase the assistance of a TAM.
Support Team 
The Qualtrics Support team is available 24 hours a day via phone, email, and chat to answer customer and partner configuration questions about the Qualtrics XM platform.
The QPN Assistant
The Partner Delivery Assurance (PDA) team also offers the QPN Assistant, a one-stop shop for all requests. It can be used to submit a question or issue to the Qualtrics Technical Support team, escalate an issue with an ongoing implementation, request services from the Qualtrics team, or provide feedback. It is also the appropriate tool to use to ask programmatic questions, request a feature be enabled in a customer or Sandbox instance, and request access to features in Qualtrics Preview, the program for beta testing new features.
Partner Delivery Insights Program
What is the Partner Delivery Insights Program?
The Partner Delivery Insights Program is intended to gather mid-flight actionable feedback that you can use to improve the customer experience throughout the implementation journey. Using the CSAT surveys that have already been configured for you to use, you can easily gather feedback at the moments that matter to ensure you consistently exceed your customer’s expectations.


Feedback Touchpoints




Focusing on the key moments of the customer journey, the program’s prebuilt CSAT surveys have been customized to give you actionable insights at every stage.


	Objective
	Recipients
	Timing
	Send Criteria
	Post Kickoff
	To measure the customer’s sentiment after the initial interaction with the implementation team
	Customer core team (customer project manager & customer business owner / decision-maker)
	Within 3 days or after follow-ups are completed (whichever is sooner)
	Recommended for all projects
	Pulse
	To measure the customer's sentiment at regular intervals throughout the course of the implementation. To identify where the customer feels unsupported so that we can take action to improve the experience.
	Customer core team
	Every ~8 active* weeks through the implementation
* Until less than 8 weeks remain to closeout
* Must be deconflicted with Post Launch survey(s)
	Recommended for projects longer than 4 weeks
Required for projects that don’t end (managed XM or managed services programs)
	Post Launch
	To measure the customer's sentiment after each major implementation milestone.
	Customer core team & launch stakeholders
	Within 3 days of launch event (need to allow some time for data collection)
	Recommended for all projects 
	Post Implementation
	To measure the customer's sentiment after the final interaction with the implementation team.
	Customer core team
	Within 24 hours after the Closeout / Solution Handoff meeting with the customer
	Required for all projects
	* “active” = a project that has held its kickoff, is not on hold, and has not yet completed its last launch or completion milestone
When your customer responds to the CSAT survey, you and your Qualtrics Partner Delivery Manager (PDM) will receive an email alert. For CSAT scores less than 4, you will work with your PDM to identify the gaps and generate an action plan.


Sending the CSAT Survey
In order to send the CSAT survey to your customer, you must complete the CSAT Trigger survey. The CSAT Trigger survey collects information from you and then sends a prebuilt CSAT survey to your customer. You will be asked to input information about the project, yourself, the customer, the overlay, which CSAT survey you would like to send, and when you would like to send it. There are 3 ways you can access the CSAT Trigger survey:
1. Partner Portal: Navigate to your Service Project Dashboard on the Partner Portal & select SEND under the Trigger CSAT column.
2. Mavenlink: Navigate to the Project Details view & click the customer Feedback Trigger URL. From there, select “Partner delivered”.
3. QPN Assistant: Navigate to the QPN Assistant, click on Delivery Assistance & Implementation Resources and then select Trigger CSAT Survey.
Additional details about triggering the surveys, timing, and survey content can be found here in the Partner Portal.


Want to learn more about the Partner Delivery Insights Program? We have an entire course on it! Open to everyone, this optional course provides you with information about the Partner Delivery Insights Program, including the value of using it, tips for talking to your customers about it, best practices for following up with customers and driving action, through it, and more! You can access the course here on the Partner Academy. 
Overview of Escalations
While rare, with every Qualtrics implementation there is a risk of an escalation, either driven by an issue with the Qualtrics software or customer expectations, resourcing, or engagement. An escalation is defined as an element of a project that requires additional resourcing to resolve.
The process for resolving the issue is specific to the source of the escalation. The Qualtrics Technical Support team and the Qualtrics Partner Ecosystem teams can be leveraged to resolve the issue for the customer and ensure your delivery gets back on track.
Additionally, the Qualtrics Customer Success Manager (CSM) should be looped in any time there is an escalation. If there is no CSM, then you can loop in the Qualtrics Account Executive (AE) instead. If you have a Partner Delivery Manager (PDM) assigned to you, you should loop them in as well. All of these Qualtrics members can assist in securing Qualtrics resources as needed. Their top priority is ensuring customer sentiment is positive and the customer is seeing value from their Qualtrics XM program.
Product Escalations
Some escalations are related to a Qualtrics product feature not functioning as expected. In this case, the Qualtrics Support team is the right place to start. 
The Qualtrics Technical Support team provides 24/7 global customer and partner support over phone and email. Chat is also available during US business hours for the Survey Platform (CoreXM). Support is primarily provided in English, but phone and email support is also available in French, German, Spanish, Portuguese, Italian, Japanese, Chinese, and Dutch. While the team provides support related to all product lines and to all customers, they do not support troubleshooting custom coding, program-specific elements of custom implementations, or enabling license-wide permissions. You can navigate to the Qualtrics Support Portal to file a support ticket.


If you encounter a technical issue in a Qualtrics program you are delivering, we recommend that you thoroughly document all testing and troubleshooting that you conducted. When raising the issue with the Qualtrics Technical Support team, share as much information as possible about the issue itself and troubleshooting already conducted. Being as specific as possible will assist the Qualtrics Technical Support team member in more quickly resolving or escalating the issue. When possible, include video or screenshot evidence of the issue and provide all Qualtrics IDs associated with the project and/or survey. The Qualtrics team member will also likely request to be granted access to your account so they can investigate the issue.
In your original communication with the Qualtrics Technical Support team, it is also a best practice to include context on how this issue is impacting your customer. Evidence of customer impact, particularly in the case where the issue is damaging customer sentiment or blocking a program launch will assist the Qualtrics Support team member in pushing for a shorter SLA and high priority escalation. The Qualtrics Partner Delivery Assurance and Customer Success teams are kept informed throughout the escalation process for all tickets by the Qualtrics Technical Support team.
When you call to discuss a question or issue, be sure to identify yourself as a partner and provide your username on the customer’s brand. Be sure to provide your username rather than your customer’s username so that you are tracked to the partner support resources and the Qualtrics Support team member can log the issue against the correct account.
Occasionally customers will encounter a product feature element they believe is a product issue or broken feature when in fact the product is working as designed. In these cases, the customer or the Technology Consultant will be directed to file a product feature request. This process is outlined later in this lesson.
Escalating a Support Ticket
The Qualtrics Technical Support team should always be the first point of contact to escalate support tickets. In certain scenarios, you may need to reach out to your project overlay (available until you are accredited) or the Partner Delivery Manager assigned to you (available once you are accredited) to further escalate a support ticket. 
The following are examples of when you should reach out to further escalate a ticket that has already been submitted with the Qualtrics Technical Support team:
1. The Product Escalation Process has been followed but the issue needs to be resolved before the timing given by the support team. 
2. The Qualtrics Support team has not followed up on a direct email request for at least 3 business days, especially if the escalation has been open for a long period of time.
3. The ticket requires more troubleshooting than was done by the Qualtrics Support team. For example, if the Support team marked the ticket as resolved, however, you believe the issue is still occurring.
4. The interaction was handled unprofessionally by a Qualtrics Support team member.


If your situation falls into one of the examples above and you need to escalate the support ticket, be sure to provide the following information to your overlay/PDA team member:
1. Describe the problem and steps you've taken to troubleshoot. Describe the problem in detail. You should come to the overlay/PDA team with the steps or background on what has been done to test the issue prior to reaching out.
2. List any and all support interactions with relevant ticket numbers. Provide any and all ticket IDs, including the original support ticket that generated the escalation and any Jira IDs if the issue was escalated to the Qualtrics Engineering team.
3. Provide a reason that the typical process and/or response time is not sufficient.
   1. Programmatic Impact - clearly explain how this issue impacts their program (ability to deliver on a specific project deadline, etc.).
   2. Business Context / Timeline - describe what events in the business are creating a more urgent resolution and when the issue needs to be resolved by.
   3. Customer Sentiment - explain the current temperature and what is driving the sentiment.
4. Include any and all workarounds provided and attempted.
   1. Is there a different way to accomplish what the customer is trying to do in Qualtrics? Is there an alternative method that could be used until the issue can be addressed by engineering?
   2. If there has been any further troubleshooting other than anything listed in the ticket(s), or anything above, attach it so that efforts aren't duplicated.
5. Attach any and all artifacts related to the escalation.
   1. These might be things like screenshots, videos, or documents that provide guidance or further illustration.
Feature Request Process
As previously mentioned, you may encounter a product feature element that you believe is a product issue or broken feature when in fact the product is working as designed. In these cases, you will be directed to file a product feature request. 
The following process should be followed to file a product feature request:
1. Technology Consultant verifies the issue is not intended product functionality via testing and/or the Qualtrics Technical Support team
2. Technology Consultant navigates to Qualtrics Community and signs into their community account
3. Qualtrics Community uses Qualtrics SSO, so you can log in with any of your Qualtrics accounts
4. Use the search bar at the top to see if your idea has already been posted. If the feature has been posted, you can upvote or comment on the idea with additional information.
5. If your idea has not been posted, select the Product Ideas section on the left-hand side of the screen and choose the subcategory that best suits your idea. 
6. Select the New Idea button and click the Save button after filling in your idea
7. Log back into your Qualtrics Community account at any point to see the status of your idea
Note: The Qualtrics Support, PDM, and Partner Ecosystem Manager teams cannot escalate feature requests any further. Our product teams review all requests and may consider them for future updates, based on the number of customers and partners who have requested it. If it is urgent that this product is developed, your team will need to create a Qualtrics Engineering Services request and add it to the project's SOW.
Customer Escalation Overview
While some customer escalations are derived from product-related issues, some are the result of a customer issue. Common customer management-related escalations include misaligned expectations on implementation scope, failure to secure appropriate resources, disengagement or delay on project deadlines, and key milestones missed due to customer delays.
Identifying, escalating, and mitigating customer-related issues as soon as possible is key to ensuring a successful implementation. Qualtrics offers several tools and processes to help you mitigate and manage customer management-related escalations.
As previously mentioned, Mavenlink is the project planning tool the Qualtrics implementation team and Qualtrics partners use to track customer project delivery progress and report on customer health. Partner or Qualtrics implementation teams are asked to update the customer health report on a weekly basis. In the case that there is a risk or issue, health status should be updated. Amber status indicates a risk and Red status indicates a major issue. 
When escalating a customer issue through the QPN Assistant, be sure to provide the following information (after updating the project health on Mavenlink):
1. Indicate the type of escalation
   1. Statement of Work Issue
   2. License Issue
   3. Product Misalignment
2. Describe the problem and provide email threads with more detail (if applicable)
3. Provide information on the following:
   1. Programmatic Impact - clearly explain how this issue impacts their program (ability to deliver on a specific project deadline, etc.)
   2. Business Context / Timeline - describe what events in the business are creating a more urgent resolution and when the issue needs to be resolved by
   3. Customer Sentiment - explain the current temperature and what is driving the sentiment
When project health status is changed to Amber or Red or an issue is submitted through the QPN Assistant, the Qualtrics Partner Ecosystem Manager (PEM) will reach out to help investigate and resolve the issue. The PEM and Qualtrics Customer Success Manager can be leveraged in conjunction to help reset customer expectations or secure additional Qualtrics resources.
You can also watch an exciting story about post-launch escalations from our "XM on the Ground: Real Life Implementation Stories" podcast, episode seven, "Why you MUST Prioritize the End User!"
Reviewing the Statement of Work
The Statement of Work commonly referred to as the SOW, is a critical document that details the deliverables, timeline, assumptions, responsibilities, and other specifics of a Qualtrics Implementation services delivery. It is important to note that Qualtrics does not have a dedicated sales team to sell services. A single Qualtrics Account Executive will sell both software and services to a customer. Qualtrics requires implementation services to be sold along with each new software license.
While software licenses are always signed directly with Qualtrics or SAP, the implementation services SOW should be agreed upon by the partner and customer if the implementation is partner delivered. In limited cases, partner-delivered services SOWs may be contracted on Qualtrics paper. The SOW will be scoped and negotiated alongside the software license, often in partnership between the Qualtrics Account Executive and the services partner who will be delivering the implementation.
A typical SOW may include, but not be limited to, the following components:
* A list of deliverables – e.g. survey build, integrations, APIs, etc. 
* Legal terms of the agreement
* Timelines with milestones and dependencies
* Points of Contact (POCs) and an escalation matrix
* Definition of service deliverables
The delivery team must invest time in reviewing the SOW and outline any questions, queries, and flags prior to any meetings with the Qualtrics or customer teams. A thorough understanding of the SOW helps immensely in delivering against the agreed outcomes on time.
It is recommended that the delivery team verify deliverables with the Qualtrics Account Executive and Customer Success Manager (Qualtrics Account Team) before initiating the project. It is important that the implementation team is aligned with the Qualtrics Account Team and that any deliverables or requests outside of the agreed scope anytime during the project lifecycle are highlighted to the Qualtrics Account Executive (AE) and Customer Success Manager (CSM) once the project is kicked off.
In a Qualtrics led delivery, many deliverables require the customer to do a portion of the work. If the implementation is delivered by a partner, the partner can choose to define deliverables as they see fit, including full or managed service delivery options. To view a sample SOW, navigate to the Resources tab (as shown in this short video) and view the Sample Statement of Work file. 
Please Note: If your SOW includes SSO Implementation or your customer has questions about SSO Implementations please review the "SSO Implementation Playbook" located on the Partner Portal for the most up to date guidance. 
You can also watch a story about shortened timelines from our "XM on the Ground: Real-Life Implementation Stories" podcast, episode four, "Handling Short Timelines with Big Clients!"


Syncing With the Qualtrics Account Team
Follow the procedure outlined below for an effective sync:
1. Review the Statement of Work to ensure alignment on its scope with the Qualtrics Account Executive
2. Gather basic information on the customer:
   1. Organization name
   2. Line of business/vertical
   3. Customer points of contact and delivery team details
   4. Customer’s timezone to set up your first meeting
   5. License details and included features
   6. Any specific launch date or timelines for surveys, dashboards
   7. Customer use case
   8. Business outcomes/objectives that the customer is aiming to achieve with their CX program
3. Gain an understanding of the customer’s expectations for the implementation: 
   1. Deliverables to be included
   2. Expected delivery dates, including survey and dashboard launches
   3. Reporting formats or expectations for sharing data
4. Learn about the customer’s XM maturity and previous programs:
   1. Customer’s previous vendor(s)
   2. Details on a previous XM program setup
Next, you’ll prepare a kickoff deck for your first customer-facing meeting. Be sure to invite the Qualtrics AE and CSM to the project kickoff.
Note that the Qualtrics CSM may lead a formal XM Maturity model assessment either before the kickoff or early in the project with the customer. If this is the case, be sure to partner with the CSM to ensure their findings are incorporated into the program design. The best practice is to hold this workshop before the kickoff.
Key Components of the Customer Kickoff Deck
Qualtrics provides an example slide deck that may be customized and used in the first meeting with the customer, however, if your organization has its own set of content you may leverage that noting some of the best practices listed below. Qualtrics recommends holding a kickoff for the entire program, which may include several surveys and multiple workstreams. It is also recommended that a smaller kickoff be held for each survey workstream to ensure the teams responsible for each set of deliverables are aligned on delivery responsibilities, timelines, and business objectives.
View the below list to see the components of a kickoff deck. 
Throughout the implementation kickoff, it is good practice to refer to the customer’s business objectives to ensure that the customer team has a good understanding of how the program will deliver value to their organization. It is important to help customers communicate the impact of the program on their organization’s bottom line so they can ensure the program continues to receive sponsorship and funding.
It is essential that the deliverables from the SOW are outlined in the kickoff deck. For instance, highlight that one survey build and one dashboard build are included in the SOW and any associated assumptions (e.g. X number of dashboard pages containing no more than X widgets per page). It is also recommended that you highlight key details such as the project timeline, resources required for program success, and the risks of the project.
Remember to detail the roles and responsibilities of all stakeholders for the project. For example, calling out specific ownership of tasks or milestones and highlighting project dependencies helps in identifying the right owners early in the project. 
View the below list to see what a high-level responsibilities matrix should be split into. 


A kickoff deck for a project should include:
   1. Introductory Slide 
An introductory slide introducing the team members working on the project. This helps in building comfort and confidence within the customer team and provides an introduction of all stakeholders briefly explaining their role and responsibilities.
   2. Overview Slide 
An overview slide of the client use case and business objectives. This helps get everyone aligned and can also bring clarity to the deliverables.
A high-level responsibilities matrix should be split into:
1. Qualtrics or Partner Implementation Team 
Include what deliverables the partner is responsible for and any resources that will be shared.
2. Customer Team 
Make sure to include any information that the customer team is expected to provide including: use case inputs, samples, data formats, etc. that would help to carry out the implementation at its best.
List down all milestones and goals along with the projected timeline. This should be verified during the kickoff meeting and adjusted as needed. A high-level project timeline should be created and shared with the customer implementation team and executive stakeholders during the kickoff call. A full project plan should be created after the kickoff call based on key decisions made or validated during the kickoff call. 
During the kickoff, explain immediate action items for each party. This would include all follow-up emails, scheduling, and setting up recurring meetings with the customer. Also, include action items for the customer that will help to kick start the implementation project smoothly. For instance, tasks for the customer, like watching webinars and creating an implementation user account. It is advised that the implementation lead sends a follow-up email to share the kickoff deck with the action items for both teams. It is also recommended that the customer and implementation team align on the project communication cadence for the delivery so that all meetings can be scheduled as a follow-up. 
The communication plan can include project meetings, reports, and email communications. It is also good practice to keep the last 10 – 15 minutes available for any queries or ad hoc discussions that the customers may have.




















Example of a kickoff deck:
















Overview of Product Testing Strategy
Robust testing of program components is essential for ensuring that project launches are executed as smoothly as possible. A typical SOW will require the client to perform User Acceptance Testing (UAT), but as the Technology Consultant, it is your responsibility to help your customer design their testing plan.
Qualtrics offers testing plan templates (please see the Resources section of this course), but you are not required to use this format. Most Qualtrics testing plans are built in a spreadsheet that is customized based on the customer’s unique Qualtrics configuration.
You and your team should test the entire program end to end prior to launching the survey, as changes to the dashboard may necessitate changes to the survey. This is also the best way to ensure that data will flow as expected from the Directory to the survey dataset and then into the dashboard. It is very important to test all aspects of your program design and the connections that link them together. For example, if you have implemented a closed-loop you want to test the survey, the logic that would create the ticket, and all aspects of the tickets themselves.
When creating your testing plan, assign each element of testing to an individual. Whereas your team can complete quite a bit of testing for the program, there are many elements for which your client will need to designate a team member to review, as only the client will have full context on whether the solution is correct.
It is a best practice to discuss your testing strategy with your client early in the implementation. Agree on when testing will take place, what the timeline will look like, and at a high level what the client will be responsible for testing. This will help set expectations, as testing is very time-intensive and it is not an area where time can be cut from the project plan if other elements fall behind. A great place for this initial conversation is during the first call reviewing the project plan. Clients should be encouraged to take a lot of ownership during testing. You can have your clients sign off on the test plan prior to testing and after all of the testing is completed to make sure they are involved and taking ownership in this process.
What is in a Typical Testing Plan?
Every testing plan is unique, especially for larger clients. Testing plans typically include: 
* A go-live checklist
* Test cases
* A defect log
* A change log
Depending on the customer’s budget and resources, the test cases can either be performed manually or in an automated fashion using scripts. We recommend assigning test cases to individuals, rather than teams so that ownership is clear.
Test cases should be very detailed so it is clear to the tester exactly what they should test. For example, rather than writing a test case that says “Test each path in the Relational survey,” the test case should indicate that the tester should complete the survey as a detractor, indicating what answers the tester should give to each survey item. There should be a test case for each logical path through the survey, and another set of test cases to verify the translation for each language for every survey item.
It is highly recommended that surveys and dashboards be tested on multiple browsers and device types. For the dashboard, the most important test is to confirm that it can be accessed via the standard desktop browser used by employees at your client’s organization. Survey taker browsers are more difficult to predict, and testing should be broader with a focus on mobile optimization.
Testing the data visible to members of dashboard roles is another set of important tests that should be executed prior to the survey launch. It is recommended that you build test cases to verify that 1-2 users, at a minimum, in each role are seeing data as expected. To complete this process, you’ll need to generate test data. Traditionally, we will export a spreadsheet of data, filter it based on the data cut the dashboard viewer should have, and perform calculations on the raw data. The results of these calculations can be compared to the data the dashboard viewer is seeing to confirm widgets and filters are configured as expected.
Detailed test cases should also be created for verifying Embedded Data is passed into Directory and then into the survey (and ticket data, if relevant) as expected. This is a common error in client programs, so end-to-end testing of the flow should be carried out. Testing each program component in a silo makes it challenging to ensure the program’s data flow is correct and consistent.
To view a testing plan template, navigate to the Resources tab and view one of the testing plan templates. Keep in mind that this plan is high level and that test cases should be customized to your client’s specific program. Other areas of this playbook contain recommended areas of the product to test. You can use these as a baseline while building your test cases.
For additional best practices, navigate to the Resources tab and view the Project Testing Strategy Best Practices file. 
Building a Testing Plan
Follow the steps listed to build your testing plan.
1. Using your project plan, list all major program components, including each survey, hierarchy, dashboard, role, ticketing workflow, creative, intercept, XM Directory integration, and triggers, for example, in a pre-launch checklist
2. Leveraging the pre-launch checklist, create a spreadsheet to start defining test cases for each program component
3. Define test cases for each program component for every possible combination of conditions
4. Assign an owner and deadline to each test case
5. Perform each test and record results
6. Delete data, tickets, and users created for testing
7. Launch your program
Test Case Components:
Survey 
Test each possible logical path through the survey, as well as each translation. Confirm data populates in Data & Analysis as expected, focusing on Embedded Data. Test all survey distribution methods.
Dashboard 
Confirm data displays as expected on each page, and verify at minimum 1-2 users per role see cuts of data as expected. If data restriction is set up for different roles, you can create test users in each role to verify they are seeing the right information.
Workflows 
Confirm each workflow triggers as expected, all desired ticketing data is saved from the survey, and the data populates in the dashboard ticketing page. Be sure to test that logic conditions do not overlap and that the right messages, tickets, and workflows are being fired. 
Website/App Feedback 
Test each intercept on multiple devices, ensure that creatives are displaying properly. Generally, clients might have an increased concern about the accessibility of the creatives on their website, this can be tested using a screen reader.
XM Directory 
Confirm Embedded Data and contacts are added as desired and that any directory-wide or survey-specific contact frequency rules are working properly.
Verifying Testing Strategy
With advanced configuration, complexities come advanced testing requirements. When populating a test plan, it is important to keep in mind all of the aspects of an enterprise program and the interdependencies that might lie across programs. In addition to end-to-end solution testing of the surveys, distributions, actions, dashboards, etc., you should also test all elements of the program. These can include automation testing, custom builds by the Qualtrics Engineering Services Team, and any additional processes, such as updating user access lists. Enterprise organizations are large and can be slow-moving, so plan with your customers upfront for extensive testing. With these programs, there are usually specific tests that only the customer and their IT team can run, such as updates to SSO attributes to properly change a user's access.
With the complexities of an enterprise program, it is also important to note that testing does not need to be done all in one round. Taking the phased approach is perfectly applicable in these situations, so as build and configuration are finalized, testing on that element can commence. It is important to consider that the phased testing window approach easily captures test cases based on a single element (such as a survey or dashboard separately), but you must be sure not to miss testing the inner workings of a program. For example, if you implement scoring on your survey and test it robustly in the survey, you would also want to test it later on in the dashboard to ensure it is displaying properly.
Once testing is complete, you may also need to train your customer on how to retest elements if they change, depending on your launch strategy. For example, if your customer is taking the approach of the full test, sign off, test launch, soft launch, then full launch, there may be additional areas where spot testing is needed. For example, after the soft launch, a problem is identified with the survey flow that affects the assignment of a variable used for response weighting in the dashboard. You are able to quickly identify which responses need to be updated and the change needed in the Survey Flow. However, before you fully launch, these changes should be retested.
Launch Checklist
When launching multiple programs for a single customer, it is important that you have a comprehensive and detailed launch checklist with various elements that change to adapt to each program's differences. Enterprise engagements generally have more complex elements, cross-program components, automation, and custom work that all need to be tested, verified, and signed off on for launch. With more complexities generally comes the need for more time. For this reason, it is important to plan and design your launch checklist early in the launch plan so customers are up-to-date and informed about their programs.
In any checklist you are covering, it is key to receive sign-off on any major artifacts, such as design documents, access lists, RACIs, defect trackers, and platform and system configurations. You also want to have outlined the number and type of launches you will have. For example, a customer may want a test launch, soft launch, and then fully lunch to ensure that things are as they should be at every stage.
For any launch, you should have a go/no-go call that you use to walk the customer through the checklist and get final sign-off and approval before launch. This ensures that the customer signs off, giving you protection if a requirement or configuration turns out to be incorrect.
Goals for Closing a Project and Handover to Customer
Once the SOW for the project has been completed and all project workstreams have been delivered, it is time to close out the project implementation. The primary purpose of this stage is to ensure the smooth handover of the project from the implementation team to the long-term program owners and to reiterate the successful delivery of program deliverables. The Qualtrics team recommends that you hold a handover call to officially close out the implementation.
Qualtrics defines an implementation as the initial period during which a Qualtrics solution is configured, tested, and deployed. For most enterprise organizations, this includes several surveys, dashboards, and other elements, such as a closed loop ticketing program. Even in cases in which the customer has a managed service or long-term service agreement with your team, it is still recommended that your team conduct a call to clearly define the completion of an implementation workstream and the deliverables within the Statement of Work.
The following are the goals of the closing call:
The Closing Call 
* Review and assess all completed deliverables
* Ensure all client project stakeholders are up to date on program status, successes, and risks moving forward
* Ensure customer expectations have been met and sentiment is positive
* Clearly delineate project phases
* Transition the project to its long-term owners
* Make sure the customer is familiar with support resources 
It is recommended that your team schedule this call well in advance of the project closing so that it is well attended and customers are aware of the approaching conclusion to the implementation delivery.
A key goal of this call should be ensuring that the customer knows how to contact the Qualtrics support team for assistance with any technical questions moving forward rather than reaching out to the Technology Consultant. The exception to this rule is cases of long term managed services that have been purchased from either Qualtrics or a Partner. Find additional details on this in the future section on Additional Steps for Managed Service.
Attendees of the project closing and handover call should include:
* The full Qualtrics or partner implementation team
* The Qualtrics Account Executive
* The Qualtrics Customer Success Manager
* The client's implementation team
* The client's program sponsor
* The Qualtrics Technical Account Manager (TAM) if applicable
* The Partner long-term point of contact for the customer
As a best practice, we encourage you to emphasize that customers aren't on their own after this call. Qualtrics is still there to help, but the terms of engagement are different. Ensure the customer is aware of all of their other resources, including the Qualtrics Customer Success Manager and Qualtrics Support team.
Once the call has been scheduled, it is recommended that the Qualtrics or Partner implementation delivery team prepare documentation outlining the solution delivered and meet internally to align on the plan for working with the client moving forward.
Required Documents for Handover
The project closing or handover call is the final interaction that the implementation team will have with the customer. Prior to this call, the implementation team should ensure that they have completed all project deliverables and documented the program they delivered to the customer. Solution documentation is essential to clearly communicate program deliverables, support customers with turnover in their organization, and protect against program changes made by the customer following the completion of the SOW.
If your customer has a Technical Account Manager (TAM), you should sit down with them for each program that launched and walk them through the complexities of the programs. You can share with them any documentation and even pull up their program in the Qualtrics platform to walk them through complex areas of configuration. You should also put them in touch with any Engineering Teams at Qualtrics who worked on their program for engineering maintenance needs. It is important that they are aware of any ongoing management or tasks that the customer must complete so they can monitor and help long-term.
Partner and Qualtrics implementation team members are required to complete the following documentation as part of closing a project:
1. Solution Handover Document
2. Support Troubleshooting Guide
Templates for both of these documents can be found in the resources tab (and on the Partner Portal). Both documents should be submitted to the Qualtrics team through the QPN Assistant. Once submitted, the Qualtrics Partner Success team will upload them to the internal Qualtrics system so that the Qualtrics Support team and Qualtrics Customer Success Manager can access the documents when customer questions arise.
With enterprise customers, you may find that the Qualtrics Team is more involved over the course of the project than in single-stream implementations. In either case, we still recommend having a handover session with key stakeholders. Enterprise engagements usually also have a greater quantity and level of detail in the documentation associated with them. These documents can include handover documents, troubleshooting guides, test plans, user access list templates, data dictionaries, experience design documents, and more. Additional documents that may come up are the program design document or a document that aggregates program-wide specific details and configurations (such as SSO) so that standards are maintained across the program. Any and all of these documents should be dispersed to both the Qualtrics Team and the customer’s implementation team to ensure everyone has the tools and knowledge to support the program long-term.


Preparing for Project Closing and Handover Meeting
1. Complete the Solution Handover Document and Support Troubleshooting Guide
2. Schedule project closing and handover call
3. Share these documents with the Qualtrics team by uploading them to the QPN Assistant
4. Meet with the Qualtrics Account Executive and Customer Success Manager
   * Review customer roles and responsibilities
   * Review deliverables completed 
   * Discuss customer sentiment, project challenges, and program goals
   * Discuss long-term plan for interacting with the customer
   * Plan the agenda for the program closing and handoff call
5. Create a presentation deck to summarize project status and deliverables
Additional Steps for Managed Services
The long-term support available to your customer may be different if the customer has contracted with your organization or Qualtrics to provide managed services. In most Qualtrics implementations, the implementation Statement of Work is limited to the initial program configuration. Customers may kickoff a new implementation for additional surveys or program components or configure new surveys themselves moving forward.
Alternatively, the customer can purchase a managed services offering for the long-term maintenance of their program. Qualtrics offers the option for customers to purchase access to a Technical Account Manager (TAM) who will serve as a technical long term point of contact to assist with configuration changes. Partners can offer similar services to provide long-term configuration and technical support to customers.
In the case of a TAM or Partner long-term support option, this individual should be briefed on the program prior to the project handover call. The project closing and handover call should be used to wrap up the initial program, introduce the TAM, and handover the solution maintenance to the TAM. For the smoothest handover and best client experience, the TAM should be fully up to speed on the program and ready to take over configuration changes and manage the relationship with the customer team directly following the call.
Triggering the Final CSAT
In order to send the final close-out CSAT survey to your customer, you must complete the CSAT Trigger survey. The CSAT Trigger survey collects information from you and then sends a prebuilt CSAT survey to your customer. You will be asked to input information about the project, yourself, the customer, the overlay, which CSAT survey you would like to send, and when you would like to send it. There are 3 ways you can access the CSAT Trigger survey:
1. Partner Portal: Navigate to your Service Project Dashboard on the Partner Portal & select SEND under the Trigger CSAT column.
2. Mavenlink: Navigate to the Project Details view & click the customer Feedback Trigger URL. From there, select “Partner delivered”.
3. QPN Assistant: Navigate to the QPN Assistant, click on Delivery Assistance & Implementation Resources and then select Trigger CSAT Survey.
Additional details about triggering the surveys, timing, and survey content can be found here on the Partner Portal.
Best Practices for a Project Handover
The customer should be clear on the scope and timeline of the implementation from the project kickoff call. We recommend scheduling the project closing call several weeks in advance and clearly communicating its purpose. It should not be a surprise to the customer that their support resources will change at this stage. It is also important to be communicating to the customer what their post-implementation responsibilities will be following the conclusion of the implementation so they are engaged in all training and enablement throughout the delivery.
In the case that there was custom Engineering Services work completed for the customer, it is recommended that you notify the Engineering team that the customer is wrapping their implementation. In addition to documenting program configuration elements, Engineering Services elements such as monitoring and alerting should also be included in the Support Troubleshooting Guide and Solution Handover Document.
During the handover call, it can be a good idea to start the call with an overview of lessons learned from the project. This should highlight both the problem and the solution, with an emphasis on how the client team can structure the program moving forward to avoid the same issues. Additionally, allow the customer time to discuss their feedback from the project, both positive and negative, so the Qualtrics and Partner teams can understand how to improve in the future. We suggest setting the scene with a prompt such as “What went well, and what could we improve for future?” to encourage reflection on positive program attributes.
Following the project closing call, it is recommended that you share the Solution Handover Document and the Qualtrics Support team contact information with the customer.
The primary risk in failing to hold a project closing call is that the customer will continue to expect program support at no cost following the conclusion of the delivery. This often occurs several months following the delivery of the final project element, particularly if the customer did not complete enablement training. Clearly documenting the program delivered, training the customer or TAM, and setting clear post-implementation expectations during the handover call is the best way to mitigate against this risk.
If you are using the Qualtrics Delivery Platform, or Mavenlink, ensure you mark all project tasks as ‘Complete’ and set the overall project to ‘Complete’ so that it will record correctly as complete.
Finally, be sure to send the Post Implementation CSAT survey to your customer through the Partner Delivery Journey Feedback Program as outlined previously. Check out this video for a walkthrough of how to do this!


Survey Review Overview
A survey review is a quality check procedure that is conducted once the survey has been built and finalized to test and review it for errors. During most implementations, we ask customers to configure their own survey, with the implementation team providing support. Even in cases in which you have configured the survey for the customer, it is important to review the survey to ensure it meets their expectations.
If the customer will be drafting the survey questions themselves or has a previous set of questions they’d like to use, we recommend providing the survey configuration best practices to the customer before the survey is scripted and then conducting the survey review once the client has configured the survey in the platform. When customers don’t have a set of questions pre-defined, generally an XM Scientist will be scoped to help them with this effort.
The survey review is typically done very early in the implementation timeline to ensure that feedback is provided and incorporated early. This review is done with the customer team members who will be involved in the platform configuration upfront as well as those who will be managing the ongoing program.
It is critical that a survey review be conducted before survey distribution, as modifications after distributions could have an undesired impact on the survey and its data. As a result, the survey review needs to be done thoroughly.
A survey review includes reviewing the following:
* Survey grammar and spelling
* Translations (if any) 
* The Survey Theme and styling
* The Survey Flow 
* Skip and Display Logic
* Question validation
* Embedded Data fields 
* Survey Options
* Quotas
Survey Review Components 
A typical survey review should include the following main components:
1.  Generating Test Responses 
A survey review should include generating test responses to validate the data output of the survey and check that the data is being generated as expected.
As a reminder, test data created using the Generate Test Responses option in Tools won't generate any Embedded Data. When generating text verbatims, responses will be in Latin. If the customer wants clean data to showcase to internal teams what is possible, they will need to mock up the data in a spreadsheet and import responses.
See the Qualtrics support page on importing responses for further instructions.
If you already have workflows created in your survey, generating test responses will trigger workflows for test responses that meet each workflow’s conditions. This can be helpful in testing workflows, but it may trigger emails or tickets so you and your customer should discuss whether this is the desired behavior. You can also set a logic line based on response type to screen out test, preview, or imported responses from triggering workflows. Workflows are not triggered by importing data, only by test responses generated using the Tools menu.
2.  Survey Formatting 
Errors in grammar and spelling could have a negative impact on the survey-taking experience for respondents so it is critical to double-check all text in the survey and messages, including invite, validation, and End of Survey messages.
Similarly, verify the overall Look & Feel of the survey. This includes confirming the correct Survey Theme is applied and checking question formatting, spacing, and page breaks. Additionally, verify theme compatibility both on mobile devices and different browsers.
It is best practice to add a progress bar to the survey to help participants understand how much of the survey is left to complete. However, it is important to note that survey progress is calculated based on the total number of questions in the survey. It will not dynamically adjust based on the number of questions presented to a respondent, which can change based on Branch or Display Logic. Be sure your customer understands this behavior, and factor this in when considering whether to use a progress bar in the survey or not.
3.  Embedded Data 
It is important to ensure that all Embedded Data variables are being populated correctly. Be sure to check that we are capturing any Contact Fields available from the Contact List into the responses through Embedded Data variables. Keeping your Embedded Data field naming convention consistent throughout your program is critical for ensuring data is passed successfully. Create a data dictionary and verify it against the Embedded Data fields in the Survey Flow. Embedded Data should be consistent in spacing and spelling.
Qualtrics also offers a set of default Embedded Data fields, such as Q_Language, RecipientID, and Q_TotalDuration. Add these to your Survey Flow to capture additional respondent information. You can find the full list on the Embedded Data Qualtrics support page.
Additionally, review the following survey components for correct configuration: recode values, the sequential numbering of questions, forced responses on mandatory questions, and data validation of any text type entry boxes. Data validation can include numeric values, US Postal Code, Date, or email address format.
4.  Survey Logic & Flow 
Another critical aspect to be verified is the flow of the survey. Conduct a testing procedure that follows each logical path within the survey to confirm all respondents will have the experience you expect. Ensure each block and question appear as intended for each category of respondents. Verify any screened-out responses are also handled correctly via the Survey Flow or Survey Options.
If quotas are used, ensure they are logical and that respondents are terminated based on the quota as expected. Review the logic related to the quotas, typically configured in the survey flow, to ensure it is set up correctly.
If translations have been applied to a survey, ensure that translations have been input correctly and that they are appearing as required. Each translation needs to be checked and proofread for each language that is being used. Be sure to check both the survey translation and message translations.
Finally, review Survey Options where settings for the survey-specific requirements can be found. Settings for survey termination messages, inactive surveys, partial completion, and expiration date, for example, need to match the specific use case.
How to Review a Customer Survey 
Perform the following quality checks during your survey review:
1. Check the Survey Editor
   * Conduct Spell Check and verify survey grammar
   * Click through the survey to look for appropriate page breaks and question formatting issues
   * Verify all Skip and Display Logic 
      * Verify that all logical paths within the survey have been followed at least once to ensure correctness and accessibility
2. Check the Tools menu
   * Generate test responses for the survey Using Generate Test Responses
      * Look at the test response data in the Data and Analysis module. Is the data in the appropriate format? If not, make sure the questions are the right type. 
   * Review Translations (important: finalized translation content needed for testing)
      * Preview the survey, then change the language using the drop-down menu
      * Check that the translations appear correctly for every question
      * Make sure that the survey buttons are translated correctly
      * Conduct testing for all languages
      * Best practice: share the survey preview link with native speakers for each survey language and ask them to verify the translation is correct
3. Check the Look & Feel
   * Confirm the correct Survey Theme is applied
      * View the survey using the Preview Survey Link
      * Test a diverse range of answers. Does the survey look as intended?
4. Check Workflows
   * Verify if all configured workflows are working as intended
      * Check if emails are being received and are in the correct format
      * Confirm integrations are passing data as expected
5. Check all messages
   * Check all End of Survey Custom messages for correctness
   * Confirm validation and error messages appear as intended
   * Check if respondents are being screened as required in the use case
   * Verify all message translations are in place and correct
6. Confirm Survey Options
   * Check the settings for the following: 
      * Survey Experience
      * Survey Protection
      * Survey Termination
      * Inactive Surveys
   * Confirm the Partial Completion settings. Choose how long partial responses will remain in Responses in Progress before being closed and moved over to Recorded Responses or deleted.
7. Verify the Survey Flow
   * Confirm the respondent flow through branches, Embedded Data, and Authenticators
   * If Quotas are used, confirm respondents are terminated in the survey based on the quota logic
Common Survey Configuration Errors
The following best practices, sourced from partner and Qualtrics implementation teams, will help you get started with successfully reviewing surveys.
1. Survey Questions 
During the survey review, use different question types depending on the respondent type and use case. Keep in mind question types that are most mobile compatible and encourage customers to consider using these. Additionally, keep in mind some questions are not compliant with accessibility standards.
Limiting the number of open-ended Text Entry questions will help keep the survey concise and encourage completion. Additionally, capture any relevant Embedded Data fields from contact lists that may be useful to visualize data later. This will also help you avoid asking demographic questions and instead leverage data you may already have. Leverage Piped Text with Embedded Data that you may already have to provide a more personalized experience for the survey taker.


2.  Force Response 
Force Response can be enabled for key questions, especially those that determine logical flows in the survey. However, it is not a best practice to require responses on all questions as it will increase survey abandonment. If you are forcing responses, it is recommended that you include a “not applicable” option so that respondents are encouraged to answer as accurately as possible. Alternatively, only ask questions to participants that apply to them. Leverage Display Logic on the questions based on respondent data to customize which questions respondents receive.
3. Survey Formatting 
When determining how to employ page breaks and progress bars, keep in mind that the survey should be easy for respondents to complete. Avoid pages that require respondents to scroll for more than a few questions. Include progress bars and question numbers so respondents can track their progress.
When text is being pasted into Qualtrics from another application, paste with formatting stripped (PC: Control + Shift + V, Mac: Command + Shift + V). Pasting in residual formatting will require you to manually check each question and make adjustments. Local changes to questions override global styling settings applied from the Look & Feel.
4.  Survey Logic 
When confirming survey logic, check for double negatives and incorrect logical operators. Incorrect configurations of the ‘AND’ and ‘OR’ statements in Branch and Display logic is a common mistake that is made so ensure to check for that. Use logic sets where possible to help nest logical flow while avoiding conflicting or redundant logic. While you want your logic to be as concise as possible, also keep in mind the potential risks that may arise when attempting to reduce logic lines, including double negatives, incorrect logical operators, or missing logical statements. Be sure to consider how the logic works when the respondent does not answer the question at all.
5.  Survey Options 
If the survey is anonymous and you don’t want the respondent to complete the survey more than once, then please select the Prevent Multiple Submissions option in Survey Options. Note this setting functions based on browser cookies.
6.  Survey Flow 
Check that elements like Embedded Data and Authenticators are placed correctly in the Survey Flow. Elements must be nested underneath one another to force respondents to flow through them, otherwise, they will be skipped regardless of which respondents qualify for them. For example, when using an Authenticator, move all survey blocks so they are indented underneath the Authenticator. If you fail to do this, even when respondents fail to log in through the authenticator, they will still get access to take the survey.
Additionally, Embedded Data blocks collecting data from a contact list should be placed at the start of the Survey Flow. Embedded Data can only be used in the survey after it has been collected or created, so if the Embedded Data block is at the end of the survey, the data won’t be usable and may not even be collected if the respondent abandons the survey or the End of Survey element is set up before the Embedded Data block.
Test and verify your Survey Flow configuration by completing the survey as a respondent with each possible logic configuration so you can test all paths. Survey programmers often make logic configuration errors and respondents won’t see the correct End of Survey element or will be skipped past a branch of the survey you intended for them to receive - so it is important to test each scenario thoroughly.
Custom Email Domain
Email Delivery Options
By default, emails sent through Qualtrics come from the noreply@qemailserver.com email address. Because this email address is not consistent with your customer’s branding, there is a chance that this may lead to emails being marked as spam or low response rates. 
To increase your customer’s email deliverability and open rates, there are three ways you can customize the sender email address:
1. Customize one of the Qualtrics “From” addresses
2. Configure a custom “From” domain via DKIM signature 
3. Set up an SMTP (Simple Mail Transfer Protocol) relay
The first method requires the least amount of setup and simply allows your customer to customize the text before the default Qualtrics email domain. For example, your customer could change the email address to mycompany@qemailserver.com. 
Because the first method doesn’t allow your customer to completely customize the “From” address to be their own recognizable domain, they should explore one of the other two options to ensure that survey invitations are consistent with their brand, encouraging recipients to open the email and respond to the survey. 
Setting up a custom “From” domain using the DKIM signature or SMTP relay method will require IT resources from the customer’s side. The specifics of these two methods will be reviewed in the following pages, but it is important to discuss survey distribution methods and related IT requirements with your customer very early on in an implementation. We recommend allocating at least three weeks in the project plan to configure a custom “From” domain and to begin the setup as early as possible.
Configuring a Custom “From” Domain via DKIM 

With this method, the customer essentially authorizes Qualtrics to send emails using their email domain; thus, emails originating from Qualtrics will appear to come from the customer’s designated domain (e.g. @mycompany.com) instead of a Qualtrics address (e.g. @qemailserver.com). 
Your customer should keep in mind that adding a custom “From” domain is a brand-wide setting and will allow any Qualtrics user within their license to distribute emails using that domain. Qualtrics does not recommend adding a main domain and instead suggests registering a subdomain. For example:
* mycompany.com (main domain)
* surveys.mycompany.com (subdomain)
Note: Multiple DKIM records can be set up for a license so that several custom email domains are available for email distribution.

This type of email setup requires the customer’s domain administrator (usually part of their IT team) to create or update the appropriate DNS records (MX and/or TXT) on the website of their domain provider. Even if the domain MX record has been configured previously, your customer’s IT team will need to configure the DNS record with the DKIM key that Qualtrics generates to complete the setup. We recommend allocating at least three weeks in a project plan for this setup and beginning the setup as early as possible.
To configure the custom email domain using this method, a brand administration account on the customer's brand must be used. By following the steps on this support page, the Qualtrics platform will generate the MX and DKIM records for the domain. The values displayed should be copied and sent to the customer’s domain administrator.
From there, the customer’s domain administrator needs to set up public TXT records with the DKIM information on the website of the domain provider and create an MX record in the DNS. They should be familiar with this process.
Once that is set up, the last step to complete the process is to establish the record by clicking Activate within the Qualtrics platform. If your customer wants the domain to be their default “From” address, they will need to contact Qualtrics Support to request that. The default “From” address will be pre-populated in all mailings for all users on the customer’s license. 
Note: It may take up to 24 hours after the records are created until they are visible for Qualtrics due to a delay in the DNS propagation. There is a possibility that the customer may get errors sending emails during the setup period. It is recommended that you share the Email Distribution Error Messages support page with the customer for easy troubleshooting.
Setting Up an SMTP Relay
Simple Mail Transfer Protocol (SMTP) is a protocol that allows a customer to transfer all Qualtrics emails to their own email server rather than distributing the email directly from Qualtrics email servers. Once the emails have been batched and transferred to the customer mail server, they are automatically sent from the customer's server using their own email domains.
One benefit of using an SMTP relay is that the customer has control over the mail logs from the distribution, so they can control whether any emails are on a blacklist and independently investigate email bounces. However, keep in mind that any issues that may arise will need to be troubleshot on the customer’s side since the distribution is happening on the customer’s server. You should also keep in mind that distribution statistics will not be captured by Qualtrics when the customer is using SMTP and therefore Respondent Funnel data will not be captured. 
Similar to using the DKIM method, setting up an SMTP relay will require IT resources from the customer. When considering this method, the customer should confirm that their servers can handle the necessary email volume with adequate response times (a <150ms response time is desirable).
Following the steps on this support page, your customer will need to contact Qualtrics Support using a brand administrator account and provide the following information (given by their IT team):
* IP Address or Domain (Required)
* Server Port (Required)
* Username (Usually required*)
* Password (Usually required*)
* What default “From” email address should be used on outgoing emails (Generally, we recommend using noreply@yourcompany.com, but your customer can use other variations, like survey-research@yourcompany.com)
*Depends on the customer’s server configuration. For security purposes, Qualtrics recommends having a separate username and password specifically for Qualtrics access.
Additional Email Delivery Considerations
While not required, Qualtrics strongly recommends that the customer allowlist Qualtrics’ IP ranges to mitigate any additional deliverability issues, which can be done through the customer’s IT team. Customers can also allowlist all emails from the domain(s) they will be using to distribute emails to help with email delivery.
In addition to modifying email delivery settings, ensuring the email has quality content will help keep it out of spam folders. Every email provider has a different algorithm for sending messages to spam, but the following tips can help your email avoid being marked as spam:
* Avoid sending attachments in your email.
* Brand your emails so recipients know who it’s from. Including a company logo can be an important step to ensuring the authenticity of your message.
* If not branding your email, avoid the use of excess HTML. This includes random or unnecessary pictures, embedded videos, bright and unappealing fonts, and so on.
* Be specific in what the message is for. For example, “survey” can be vague – try using terms like assessment, study, or feedback instead.
* Write engaging subject lines. Instead of “We want your opinion on our customer service,” try, “How was your support call with Qualtrics?” Try to use your company’s name where applicable.
* Avoid excessive use of caps and punctuation. (e.g., “PLEASE FILL OUT THIS SURVEY!!!”)
You should also avoid using words and phrases commonly used by spammers in either the body text or subject line. Some such words include “free,” “discount,” “opportunity,” “money back,” “incredible,” “targeted,” and “offer”. Additional words to avoid include:
* Marketing
* Bonus
* Click here
* Sell
* Buy
For the full list of words to avoid and other tips on how to keep your message out of the spam folder, please reference the Avoid Being Marked as Spam support page here. 


XM Directory Settings
Differences Between Contacts and XM Directory 
Based on the license that your customer has purchased, they will either have access to basic Contacts or XM Directory for contact management.
Contacts enable users to create simple mailing lists and upload contacts for survey distribution. With Contacts, these lists and their contacts can be shared with others through user groups, but by default, they are private to a single user's account. 
Tip: Mailing lists are typically called contact lists within Qualtrics, but you may also see them referred to as panels or, simply, lists. 
On the other hand, XM Directory enables users to build and manage directories of respondents across their entire organization, preventing information on contacts from becoming siloed and out-of-date as different teams collect data. This allows organizations to build rich profiles of every respondent to help discover insights and deliver a personalized experience. 
Additionally, XM Directory allows for running programs at scale with automations and transaction data support with features such as (these will be covered in more detail later):
* Consolidate contacts: A process that can be used to automatically merge existing and new contacts. This prevents you from uploading the same person as separate contacts.
* Automatic list enrollment: This allows you to automatically sort new contacts into certain lists based on various information about them.
* Contact import automation: Streamline your contact management by integrating your contact records with Qualtrics.
* Distribution automation: Set up an automation that will regularly send out survey invitations to a list of contacts.
* Contact frequency: A setting that controls how often you can reach out to contacts, and how much you can contact them in that timeframe.
* Segments: Easily divide the contacts in your XM Directory into different groups, based on demographics, needs, priorities, common interests, and other behavioral criteria.

The remainder of this lesson will focus on standards and best practices for XM Directory. For additional information on using basic Contacts, you can visit the support page here.
Scoping XM Directory Requirements
Before configuring anything in XM Directory, your implementation team should hold a call with the customer’s implementation team to align on the XM Directory requirements. This call should include identifying the users who will manage the directory, reviewing any historical contacts, discussing directory settings, and outlining the embedded data fields that are needed.
By default, only brand administrator users have access to the directory. However, it can be enabled for other users by enabling the “Manage Directory” permission for the user’s account. If there are a large number of users in a license, access to the directory should be limited to one or two users.
As part of this call, investigate how many historical contacts the customer hopes to load into XM Directory. In most standard implementations, the customer is responsible for migrating their contacts into XM Directory. The configuration of the XM Directory is a quick process, but bringing in historical data can delay an implementation’s progress due to the time it takes to prepare the data. Before uploading any contacts, you should align with the customer on the various directory settings. These are brand-wide settings that affect all contacts and users within a brand. These settings are: Contact Frequency, Consolidate your contacts, Directory Messages, Respondent Funnel, and Manage Directory. We will cover best practices for each of these later on. 
When determining the embedded data fields, you will want to think about all of the fields that will need to be used across all surveys, contact lists, tickets, and dashboards. It is a best practice to document all fields in a data dictionary so it is clear to all users what nomenclature should be applied throughout the program. 


Determining Consolidation Settings
Automatic consolidation, a key setting available in Directory Settings, allows you to set up consolidation rules to catch duplicate contacts as they are being added to the directory. If the contact already exists, the existing directory contact will be updated with any new information you have added, such as new or updated embedded data values.

When setting up automatic consolidation, you must choose one or more of the following contact attributes you must choose one or more of the following fields: email, phone, and external data reference. If desired, you can additionally consolidate by first and last name. Consolidation settings are connected with AND statements. If multiple options are selected, consolidation will only occur if ALL of the fields match another contact’s fields.
It is recommended to use email, but if your customer is working with the same email address for more than one contact we, recommend combining email with external data reference. Common external data reference consolidation fields include customer ID, member ID, contact ID, or account number.

Since these settings are not retroactive, you should enable automatic consolidation before importing contacts into XM Directory. If you need to deduplicate contacts that are already in your directory, see the support page on consolidating existing contacts. You can also consolidate contacts using consolidate duplicates in directory options.
Determining Contact Frequency Settings
Contact Frequency, another option in Directory Settings, allows users to limit the number of messages a contact can receive in a certain period of time. These rules can be applied on the directory level or to a specific mailing list or survey. This helps prevent response fatigue and improve the survey-taking experience. 
The typical contact frequency setting is 30 days between survey invites, but this varies significantly depending upon your workflow. These settings apply to everyone in the directory, so it’s important to take this into consideration when determining these rules. When multiple conditions are in place, the most restrictive setting will be applied. If a distribution is being sent to a batch of contacts (via automation or manual distributions), contacts who have not met contact frequency rules will be skipped in the distribution.
Directory rules are settings that affect all contacts in the directory. You can set rules for the maximum messages per a specified period of time and/or the number of days between messages. While you can enable both options, it is important to note how they will work together. 
For example, say you set a rule that is “2 messages per week” and “2 days must pass before a contact can receive a message”. If a contact receives a message on Monday, they will be unable to receive another message until Wednesday. If they receive an invite on Wednesday, they will still not be able to receive an invite on Friday even though 2 days have passed because they would have hit the 2 messages per week limit. 
Custom rules are settings that will override the directory rules for specific mailing lists or surveys. The three options available are: 
* Always allow contacts to receive the messages sent to this list regardless of directory contact frequency rules. 
* Limit how many messages contacts can receive when they're sent to this list. 
* Specify how much time needs to pass after the last message a contact received before being able to receive a message sent to this list.
For example, say you have a directory rule set to only allow contacts to receive one message a month, but you want to survey people every time they make a purchase at a store. You can create a custom rule that states a specific mailing list can always be sent messages, allowing you to override the directory rule for that contact.
If a custom rule includes the first option, all contacts will receive the distribution, regardless of other custom rules or the directory rules. This setting always overrides all other rule settings. Otherwise, if different rules apply to the same distribution, the custom rule or directory rule with the most restrictive setting will apply.
Migrating Contacts to XM Directory
It’s possible that a customer may have used a different customer experience vendor before making the switch to Qualtrics. For example, an airline company might have a list of all of their rewards program customers that they were using to send out survey distributions. Now they would like all of their contacts and corresponding embedded data fields to be migrated over to XM Directory for survey distribution.
As previously stated, the customer is usually responsible for migrating their contacts into XM Directory. It is important to clearly set expectations in the project kickoff to ensure that resources have been allocated to complete this deliverable. Since having contacts and all their corresponding data in XM Directory is a prerequisite for successfully distributing a survey, setbacks in contact migration can put the project at risk for delays. Because of this, contact migration should take place early in an implementation. The number of contacts, cleanliness of the files, and the amount of organizational data to be imported will affect the timeline.
Even though you may not be required to migrate contacts yourself, you will want to be aware of the steps that your customer needs to take in order to ensure that the process goes smoothly: 
1. Configure the automatic consolidation settings to determine which contacts will be considered unique and which should be consolidated. 
2. Export the contacts from the previous vendor into a CSV or TSV file. 
3. Reformat the file to match the sample template provided by Qualtrics.
   1. Depending on the consolidation settings, make sure to include the required fields (FirstName, LastName, Email, and/or ExternalDataReference) 
   2. Check the formatting for each embedded data field name to ensure that each field is consistently and intuitively named.
4. Import the correctly formatted CSV or TSV file into the directory
   1. If any errors occur, use this support page to help troubleshoot and resolve the issue.


XM Directory Automations
Using a contact import automation paired with a distribution automation allows customers to streamline their contact imports and survey distributions. Within Automations, you can set up a process that will import contacts on a regular basis from your database and link that process so that contact imports automatically trigger a survey. 
While you can use contact import automations and distribution automations separately, this is not recommended. Failure to link the automations may cause issues, such as sending duplicate distributions to contacts and failure to capture transactional data.
Note: You can link multiple distribution automations to one contact import automation for cases where you want to send different surveys to groups of contacts in the same file. 
When configuring automations for a customer, it is recommended to set up all automations in one central account. Or, if you are running automations for separate programs, set up an automations account for each program. 



Transactional Data
Transactional data is like embedded data in that it is information about a specific contact in your directory. However, unlike embedded data, transactional data is stored as “interactions” and each time a new interaction comes in, the transactional data is stored. You can see each interaction and what the transactional data was at any point, instead of it being overwritten like embedded data. 
These transactional data points help track experience data for a contact over time. For example, a say a retail company is setting up an in-store purchase experience survey to improve its customer experience and increase revenue. Transactional data would allow them to store the purchase price for each transaction to help determine whether those who have had a positive experience in the store are more likely to spend money there. 
To configure transactional data, you need to use a contact import automation linked to a distribution automation and include the field names in the survey flow as part of an embedded data element. You can also save survey response data as a transaction for your contacts using an XM Directory task. However, transactional data is most commonly saved through the automations mentioned above. Setting up these automations will be covered in the next 2 pages. 
Configuring a Contact Import Automation
With a contact import automation, customers can integrate their contact records with Qualtrics by Secure File Transfer Protocol (SFTP) server, or to an HTTPS file hosting service so that Qualtrics can regularly import these records to their Qualtrics accounts. 
With your customer, you will need to align on and configure the following:
Step 1
Decide when the automation should run (e.g., daily, weekly, monthly, on-demand) and at what time. 
Note: All automations are scheduled based on UTC and do not observe daylight savings time. 
Step 2 
Decide when the automation will start and end. 
Note: Because you can run manual tests before the automation starts, it is recommended that you set this up later. customers should run the automation at least an hour after a file will be placed on the server. It is also best practice to stagger automation start times if there are multiple contact import automations to reduce the load on the SFTP server. 
When setting the end time, if the mailing list will have contacts continuously added to it, you can choose “Never”. If the mailing list will have a limited number of distributions, set a date or number of occurrences. Otherwise, the automation will run every day and create a report that says no contact has been uploaded.
Step 3 
Determine which import source to use (Qualtrics Files Service, SFTP server, Google Drive, or DropBox). customers can purchase services to use Qualtrics’ SFTP server if they don’t have one.
Note: The SFTP server source is recommended, but the customer can use any of the other options. The customer will have the option to encrypt the files before uploading.
Step 4 
Create or have the customer give you the file (often the data dictionary) that will be used as the file for data mapping for the automation. 
Note: The file should note which fields are required for the import to be successful, what kind of data it will be (e.g., contact information, embedded data, or transactional data), and any field transformations that may be needed (e.g., Date of Birth in the file will be captured as Birth Date in the platform). Phone numbers must match the format described here and Language must use the correct Qualtrics Language code listed here. 
Step 5 
Determine the mailing list that the contacts will be imported to.
Note: It is recommended that a specific mailing list be created for this automation. The automation will ask if this should be tied to a survey distribution automation. If you are planning on sending a survey to contacts based on this contact import automation, then this is highly recommended. Using a different automation that is not attached to the contact automation may cause unforeseen consequences. 
After configuring all of the information in the steps above, the automation will prompt you to add an email to send a summary report to after the automation runs. It is recommended to add the partner technology consultant and for the customer to create and add a specific automation email address to capture all of these reports. 
Once the automation is created, you can see it in the Automations tab. The three vertical dots menu on the automation will give you the following options:
* Edit Automation
* View Run History
* Start Manual Run 
   * Note: If a distribution automation is linked to a contact import automation and you click this option, the distribution automation will also trigger even if it is inactive.
* Resume Automation
* Rename Automation
* Delete Automation
Clicking the automation will show all past runs as well as queued runs. You can edit the automation from this view, or you can do a manual run that will run the automation immediately. Doing a few manual runs is recommended before enabling the automation for a launch.
Next, you will learn how to set up the connected survey distribution automation.
After configuring all of the information in the steps above, the automation will prompt you to add an email to send a summary report to after the automation runs. It is recommended to add the partner technology consultant and for the customer to create and add a specific automation email address to capture all of these reports. 
Once the automation is created, you can see it in the Automations tab. The three vertical dots menu on the automation will give you the following options:
* Edit Automation
* View Run History
* Start Manual Run 
   * Note: If a distribution automation is linked to a contact import automation and you click this option, the distribution automation will also trigger even if it is inactive.
* Resume Automation
* Rename Automation
* Delete Automation
Clicking the automation will show all past runs as well as queued runs. You can edit the automation from this view, or you can do a manual run that will run the automation immediately. Doing a few manual runs is recommended before enabling the automation for a launch.
Next, you will learn how to set up the connected survey distribution automation.
Step 1 
Determine if you want to further filter who received an invite based on contact information, embedded data, and/or transactional data.
Note: For example, you may want to send a survey to contacts in the import that have the embedded data field “New Customer” equal to “Yes.” Those who are not new customers will not receive a survey invitation, even though they are in the contact list that is used to send this distribution.
Step 2 
Determine the survey that will be sent and when the survey invitation link will expire.
Note: The default expiration is 60 days.
Step 3 
Determine when the survey distribution will be sent after the contact import automation is run.
Note: The default is to send the distribution immediately after the contact import automation is run, but your customer may want to change this. For example, you may have a contact import automation add contacts to a mailing list at night. However, if you want to send survey invitations the next morning so contacts receive an email early in their day, then this setting would need to be modified.
Step 4 
Determine how you would like to distribute the survey (e.g., email invitation, SMS invitation, or two-way automation).
Note: The distribution channel that is used in the invite must also be used in the reminder email. For example, you cannot send a survey invitation as an email and remind contacts with an SMS text message.
When distributing via SMS, one SMS message is 160 characters or less. Anything over 160 characters will be 2+ messages, even if it appears to recipients as one message, and will consume additional SMS credits.
Step 5 
Determine the from and reply-to information on the invitation, subject, and message.
Note: It is recommended that you create the subject and message template in the Library tab before setting up the distribution and loading the appropriate messages into the automation (especially if using translations). If desired, you can also add reminders.
gain, ​​the automation will prompt you to add an email to send a summary report to after the automation runs. It is recommended to add the partner technology consultant and customer email address.
Like the contact import automation, there are options to edit the automation after enabling or finishing it. The past and queued distributions will appear in the automation, and there will be an option to do a manual run. It is recommended to do a couple of manual runs before enabling the automation.
Setting Up Respondent Funnel
Customers using XM Directory can visualize distribution data in their dashboards with the use of the Respondent Funnel for added transparency with all of their key stakeholders. This distribution data includes statistics like open rate, response rate, contact metrics, transactional data, embedded data, automation run status, as well as contact information so those statistics can be filtered by different attributes. 
In the Respondent Funnel, there are default fields that will be brought into the dashboard automatically. Those default fields include contact information and statistics on the distribution itself. You can see the full list of default fields here. To report on fields that are not included in the default fields, such as embedded data and transactional data, you must set them up as Respondent Funnel fields.
To do this, you have to go into the Directory Settings and click into Respondent Funnel. From there, you will be able to change or add fields to be included as Respondent Funnel Fields. Please note that adding these fields is not retroactive. You must add these fields before you send a distribution if you want those fields to be captured in the Respondent Funnel dashboard, and it is best practice to map those fields in the dashboard first as well. There is a limit of 50 fields that can be tracked, so it is recommended to decide what fields will be used and what their naming conventions will be before a distribution is sent.
To read more about using the Respondent Funnel, please refer to the support page here.
Using Multiple Directories
XM Directory allows you to have multiple directories at a time. This is helpful for situations where you need to create separate groups of contacts with different directory-wide settings, or you need to set up a separate directory for testing purposes. 
It is fairly common for large organizations to have different customer segments. For example, healthcare customers may have business units that are interested in sending out transactional surveys to the individual who visited the hospital, but another may be interested in reaching out to the policy owner or head of household for relational surveys. In order to configure a solution in XM Directory that meets the customer’s requirements, you may consider using two directories that have different consolidation criteria.
In this example, the first directory for the transactional surveys would be configured to consolidate based on the email address, which means that each person who visits the hospital could be a contact in that directory. In the second directory for the relational surveys, you could consolidate based on an external data reference, such as customer or policy ID. That way, all of the data from each individual’s data under the policy can be stored as one contact with the policy owner’s email as the point of contact.
Due to strict data privacy restrictions around customer data, some organizations feel uncomfortable including test participant data in the same directory as their live customer data. Test participant data is for fake contacts that are created in XM Directory to test the survey invitations and survey-taking experience. They usually create a whole list of contacts with the email addresses of all of the testers and create embedded data fields that mirror customer data. Using this method, testers can go through the survey-taking experience as if they were a survey respondent and can also test the data flow from XM Directory throughout the entire platform.
When using multiple directories, you can determine which users have access to each directory in your license. You can even determine whether or not this directory access should be admin-level, allowing certain users to manage the directory’s settings. To learn more, see the XM Directory Roles support page.
For more information on creating and managing multiple directories, you can refer to the support page here. 
CRM Integration
Benefits of Integrating With a CRM
A customer’s Customer Relationship Management platform, or CRM, houses powerful operational data associated with their end clients. By integrating a customer’s CRM with Qualtrics, they’ll be able to leverage operational data, or O-data, in the XM Platform alongside the experience data they collect. Qualtrics offers several out-of-the-box extensions with CRMs, including Salesforce and Microsoft Dynamics. Custom extensions can be put in place with any CRM using the Qualtrics REST API and custom coding.
This lesson will leverage Salesforce as the CRM, but the principles of the extension, including the data flow, will apply to any extension. For more information on other CRM extension options visit the support page on Extensions (integrations). 
The extension between the Qualtrics and Salesforce platforms is a two-way flow:
* Experience data from Qualtrics into Salesforce
* Operational data from Salesforce into Qualtrics
Customers can choose to leverage one or both of these flows depending on their needs. When experience data from Qualtrics is pulled into Salesforce, the customer account management team has more information to better manage relationships. Similarly, when operational data from Salesforce is amalgamated with Qualtrics experience data (survey data), analysts can build dashboards combining operational and experience data, helping them understand how to drive business operations outcomes.
The ability to see X+O data in Qualtrics dashboards paves the way for establishing holistic data-driven strategies so experience data can drive organizational decisions to help customers achieve a healthier and growing customer base. 
Overview of Using the Salesforce Extension
The Salesforce extension is most commonly used for transactional automations. The following three actions are available as part of the out-of-the-box extension between Qualtrics and Salesforce:
* Trigger and Email Survey: Trigger a survey based on a workflow rule within Salesforce.
* Response Mapping: Map survey responses back to any Salesforce Object.
* Web to Lead: Insert information from a Qualtrics survey into the lead object.


Qualtrics also has a Salesforce App for using Qualtrics within Salesforce. Available actions within the app include:
* Sending a survey to many respondents at once from within Salesforce.
* Editing surveys in the Salesforce interface prior to sending them out (only for users with administrative permissions).
* Accessing pre-built quickstart surveys that come with questions and Response Mappings.
* Viewing and editing Qualtrics CX dashboards.
When connecting a Qualtrics account to Salesforce, you’ll be required to log into a Salesforce account. We recommend that the Salesforce account belongs to a Salesforce Administrator to avoid any issues with permissions. Identify your customer's Salesforce Administrator early in the implementation process, as they need to be involved in setting up the connection between Qualtrics and the CRM. The connection should also be set up in the account of the Qualtrics survey owner. Many customers set up a user specifically for the extension, create the project in that account so they are designated as the survey owner, and share the survey with the other users that will edit it.
Preparing for a Salesforce Extension
When preparing to set up Response Mapping, consider the following questions to assist with planning out response mapping and review them with the Salesforce team prior to set up:
* Do you want to make data from your Qualtrics survey responses immediately available in Salesforce?
   * Note: If you plan on using a separate reporting method such as a Qualtrics dashboard system, you may not need to make the data available in Salesforce. Determine the need of your organization to access the data and decide what level of access is needed. For example, if the entire Sales team will already have access to the dashboard, it’s possible that mapping data to Salesforce will be redundant.
   * Note: If you do decide to make Qualtrics survey responses available in Salesforce, it will likely require the creation of a custom Salesforce object with various custom fields corresponding to the survey questions and embedded data fields.
* What survey data needs to be available in Salesforce? 
   * Example response: Key fields such as NPS and satisfaction with support attributes X, Y and Z, as well as a hyperlink that will allow us to view the entire response.
* Will you need to send data to Salesforce from multiple distinct Qualtrics surveys?
   * Example response: We will be integrating a 2nd Qualtrics survey once the first is successfully deployed.
* How do you want to store your survey data in Salesforce?
   * Example response: We want to store all survey data on a single custom object with 2 record types (one for each survey).
* Do you want to create or modify any other records in Salesforce when a survey is completed?
   * Example response: We want to create a new Salesforce case when a customer is dissatisfied and indicates that they’d like a follow up.
* What information from the survey responses would you want to see in Salesforce? 
* For instance, the recent NPS score and verbatim.
* How do you want to see survey response information in Salesforce? 
   * Options: Insert (new survey response record created for each response submitted, contact record is unmodified) or Update (existing contact record is modified to include the latest information from the most recent survey response submitted). 
   * Other options: Upsert (can both insert and update), Delete (deletes a record), and Post to Chatter. Updating standard objects (such as case, contact, or account) is the most common scenario.
For scoping questions for the other features, please refer to the Build Standards & Best Practices: Salesforce Integration file in the Resources section of this course. 
Structuring Data for a Salesforce Extension
The following Salesforce terminology will be helpful to know as familiarize yourself with the Salesforce extension:
* The Salesforce Object: Database tables that allow you to store data specific to the organization in Salesforce (e.g. Contact, Account, or Leads).
* The Key: The Key will identify which existing record needs to be changed. In most situations, the Key will be an ID. Common examples include a Contact ID or a Case ID
* Lookup Field: Used to connect two objects in Salesforce in a parent-child relationship. When using Response Mapping, a Lookup Field can be used to insert a new record in one object and then connect that newly inserted record to another object, the parent object
Since a CRM extension is a two-way process, there are key considerations for structuring data so both Qualtrics and your customer’s CRM can interpret and absorb data. 
In the case of transactional surveys, a survey is usually triggered (via Salesforce) once a condition is fulfilled by your Salesforce contact. You must save the Key as Embedded Data in a contact list. The Key is required to match the user record within Salesforce to the user record within Qualtrics. Without it, there is no way to connect the data about a user across the platform. If you are emailing surveys via Qualtrics you can create an Embedded Data column with the relevant Key values followed by uploading the contact list. Including the Key in the contact list ensures a user data will be passed from Salesforce into Qualtrics.
When it comes to Embedded Data, you will want to add the Salesforce fields as Embedded Data in the Survey Flow. The naming convention is very important, so make sure to name them as you have in the contact list. Keep in mind that Embedded Data should be consistent across all surveys, dashboards, contact lists, and tickets.
When setting up Response Mapping, you’ll be able to select which Salesforce Objects and fields you’ll map data into. Be sure to discuss with your customer how this data mapping should be structured before you begin configuring the extension. It is a best practice to diagram the data flow with your customer and get this signed off before starting the extension.
Once you and your customer have determined what data to pass back into Salesforce and where it should be stored, review it with your customer's Salesforce Administrator so the Salesforce team can start preparing. This is particularly important if the data needs to be stored in new fields that the Salesforce team must create.
For additional tips on structuring data for the Salesforce extension, please refer to the Salesforce Best Practices support page. 
Setting Up a Salesforce Extension
Below you will find an overview of the steps required to set up common features within the Salesforce extension. 
   1. Connecting Qualtrics & Salesforce 
Before using any features of the Salesforce Extension, you need to connect your Qualtrics account to your Salesforce instance. Your Salesforce instance will be connected to your Qualtrics account in the Workflows tab. Full details on setting this up can be found here. 


   2. Triggering & Emailing a Survey in Salesforce or Updating Contacts in Qualtrics 
You can set up tasks to trigger workflows within Qualtrics based on Salesforce Workflow Rules. The criteria for the workflow rule in Salesforce might be an event such as a case being closed or an opportunity being won. Once this workflow rule is met in Salesforce, Qualtrics can take action, such as updating contact information and sending a survey. Full details on setting this up can be found here. 




   3. Adding Salesforce Field as Embedded Data in Survey Flow to Capture in Survey Data 
Information from Salesforce is saved in your contact list, but is not automatically recorded in survey responses. But it is quick and easy to add them if you follow the simple steps here. 
   4. Sending Survey Responses from Qualtrics into Salesforce via Response Mapping 
Response Mapping is used to take the answers provided in a Qualtrics survey and map them back to a Salesforce record. For example, when your client takes a support feedback survey, their satisfaction level could be mapped back to Salesforce for the account manager to see. Full details on setting this up can be found here. 
   5. Creating New Leads in Salesforce from a Qualtrics Survey 
The Salesforce Web to Lead feature allows you to insert information from your Qualtrics survey into the lead object of your Salesforce instance. Conditions can be set using advanced logic to identify specifically which respondents will be saved into Salesforce and which ones will not. Full details on setting this up can be found here. 
Salesforce Extension Best Practices
The Salesforce extension will require the Qualtrics user to set up the account connection to generate their Qualtrics API token. Double-check that your customer has access to take this action. As a best practice, we recommend setting up an API user account that can be used for any API actions and for the Salesforce extension. This user will remain in place regardless of whether employees leave the organization as their account will not be deleted and their API token will not change.
Additionally, your customer should set up a time for the implementation team to meet with the Salesforce Administrator who will be assigned to the project as soon as possible. We recommend bringing this up in the Project Kickoff Call so that the customer knows to secure these resources quickly. It often takes customers several weeks to book time with a Salesforce Administrator, so it is recommended to start as early as possible.
It is Qualtrics policy to not enter customers’ Salesforce instances, so you'll need the customer's Salesforce Administrator to carry out all Salesforce configuration and testing required for the extension.
Additionally, Salesforce has a sandbox environment so it is important to discuss with your customer how they intend to establish their connection between Qualtrics and Salesforce. Qualtrics does not offer both a sandbox and a production environment, just a production environment. Qualtrics can support connections to multiple Salesforce instances, but you should establish a change management plan with the customer for managing future enhancements. In some cases, these may include copying their survey to create a sandbox version of the survey. In other cases, customers will deactivate surveys during off-hours to make changes and then reactivate them once changes have been made.
You can find additional best practices on the Qualtrics Salesforce support page here and the Build Standards & Best Practices: Salesforce Integration file in the Resources tab of this course. 
Common Salesforce Extension Errors and Solutions
In the tables below you will find common Salesforce extension errors and how to resolve them. 
Troubleshooting - Qualtrics Side
Errors
	Solutions
	Survey not sent when workflow condition was met
	Qualtrics surveys are sent only upon activation. You can select a distribution method to activate.
	The survey was shared with you and looks like you’ve set it up correctly, yet the survey doesn’t go out
	Qualtrics will check the Salesforce credentials of the original survey owner. Make sure the original survey owner has linked his/her Qualtrics account to Salesforce.
	Survey contacts are added to the contact list, yet are not receiving emails
	Check the Distribution History to confirm the status of the email invites.
	Emails were not received
	You can leverage a custom From Address to boost email deliverability.
	You’re the survey owner and it looks like you’ve correctly set up the extension, yet the survey is not being sent
	Check if there are any notification emails from Salesforce. If there are notification emails it means that the workflow rule was met, however, due to some reason on the Salesforce side of things the email didn’t go out. You should reach out to your Salesforce team.
However, if you’ve not received notification emails and find the Workflow failed (Workflows Reporting) you should reach out to Qualtrics Support.
	Troubleshooting - Salesforce Side
Errors
	Solutions
	Survey not sent
	Check if the Email Field (from step 6 of phase 2) is correctly added.
	Workflow Rule
	Make sure the Workflow Rule is active.
	Workflow Action
	Create another Workflow Action and test what happens when the workflow rule is met. If the Workflow Action doesn’t fire the Outbound Message it means that the Workflow Rule conditions in Salesforce might need to be double-checked. Otherwise, try decoding further.
	API
What is API?
The Qualtrics REST API, or Application Programming Interface, allows you to query the Qualtrics XM platform programmatically using a simple URL syntax. The Qualtrics API can be used to create surveys, manage contacts and contact lists, send surveys, manage users, and download and upload data, among other actions.
The Qualtrics REST API is an extension of the capabilities of the software out of the box and will require custom coding to implement. Each call will execute a unique action, such as creating a contact, starting a download of data, or pulling a contact’s ID. In most cases, you’ll need to string together a series of calls to complete a full action.
Downloading data, for example, requires a string of three API calls: 
* POST Create Response Export
* GET Response Export Progress
* GET Response Export File
To successfully run the calls, you’ll need Qualtrics IDs, including the Qualtrics survey ID, your API token, and information on what subset of responses you want to export. All required fields, as well as instructions for using API, are found on the Qualtrics’ API website. 
All Qualtrics API calls use GET, POST, PUT, or DELETE methods and return JSON.
POST
	GET
	PUT
	DELETE
	Creates
	Reads
	Updates
	Deletes
	API responses will contain a JSON object with two fields: the result and meta field. The result field will contain a JSON object if the call returned a result. Not every call is expected to return a result. The meta field contains the status of the call and any relevant error information. 
All API collection requests are paginated. You can page through the elements of the collection by making a GET request to the nextPage URL provided in the paged response. If there are no more pages, nextPage will be set to null. Most paginated responses have a default of 100 items returned under the result field. Some API calls will allow the user to override the default page size for paginated responses.
To use the Qualtrics API, you’ll need to either write customized code to run the API calls programmatically or use a tool for executing API calls, such as Postman. In limited cases, the API calls can be executed directly within the documentation that Qualtrics provides to explain how to use each call.
API Service Offerings
Qualtrics offers a set of publicly accessible API Documentation, located at https://api.qualtrics.com. This website provides instructions and examples for executing the Qualtrics REST API. It is continually updated as new APIs are made available to customers and partners.
To use the APIs, customers must purchase access to be able to generate an API token within their account.
As a Technology Consultant, you are required to understand how each Qualtrics API call works and be able to recommend which calls a customer should use to accomplish their desired workflow. Consultants should also understand what outputs or results occur by running each call. For example, if a consultant runs an update response call, the consultant should know that recorded dates will be updated. However, you aren’t required to create custom code to execute the calls or to troubleshoot custom code written by the customer, though you can make some recommendations. If a customer cannot create their own custom code, it is recommended that they contract for the services of a software development engineer, either on the Qualtrics Engineering Services team or at a partner organization, to create the custom code for them.
Qualtrics offers two implementation add-on packages for helping customers get started with the Qualtrics API. Partners may choose to offer similar implementation packages to the Qualtrics customers they are implementing. These offerings provide a development team new to Qualtrics with the support that they need to successfully integrate corporate business processes and data with the Qualtrics platform via the Public API. The typical customer profile will be enterprise customers with in-house development teams.
The goal of the API add-on packages is to provide initial training to customers new to the Qualtrics API, accelerating the time to value for developers new to Qualtrics through a structured, hands-on curriculum. The two tiers of API support to support customers are as follows: 
Introductory Package 
This is for customers who need minimal assistance getting up to speed with the API and includes the following:
* Guidance on the use of Public API documentation
* General overview of API - API Token, IDs required to execute API calls
* Overview of the Qualtrics Platform, core capabilities, and a single API use case
* Where to go for help after implementation has been completed
* Up to 2 hours of general API support/consulting


Advanced Package 
This is for customers who would like more in-depth training covering the most common CX use cases including API-related consulting during implementation and includes the following:
* Guided learning covering best practices in API usage and additional common use cases
* API instruction tailored to a specific customer use case(s) during implementation
* API overview provided to business users (where does the API fit in, why would we need it?)
* Additional 5 hours of general API support/consulting


In either case, these implementation offerings do not include custom-developed API code, consulting on development efficiency, or guidance on software architecture.
Continuum of Care



While the implementation of API service offerings can help customers get started using the Qualtrics API, there are additional resources available to support customers.
If customers do not have in-house development resources, they can connect with the Qualtrics Engineering Services team or a partner engineering services team to build customized solutions. Common custom-developed solutions include custom integrations with other software platforms and custom reporting.
Qualtrics training offers webinars and online support pages customers can review at any point in their lifecycle to gain additional information about how to use the Qualtrics API. Customers can also contact the Qualtrics Support Team for ad-hoc API support. This team will not be able to troubleshoot custom code, but they can provide guidance regarding error messages and suggestions on how to efficiently use Qualtrics API calls.
Finally, customers can leverage the Qualtrics Community for ad-hoc, community-driven support. Here, other Qualtrics users can assist with troubleshooting custom code or providing creative suggestions to technical challenges that they have implemented within their own organization.
Qualtrics Data Model
The following terminology will be required as you’re getting started using the Qualtrics API.
* Survey: Defines the set of questions to be asked.
* Contact: Represents a person that can be invited to take a survey. A contact can have Embedded Data (key/value pairs) associated with it.
* Transaction: Represents business interactions that involve a given contact.
* Mailing List: Keeps track of a group of contacts.
* Distribution: Contains a list of invitations.
* Invitation: A message sent out to collect answers.
* Response: Created when a person takes the survey. A response can have Embedded Data (key/value pairs) associated with it.
* Dashboard: Used to display aggregated metrics.
* Sample: A set of contacts that meet a selection criteria.
* Workflow: Can be set up to generate a ticket when a response meets certain conditions.
* Ticket: Tracks an issue related to a response received.


Each data entity has a unique ID generated by Qualtrics composed of alphanumeric characters. The table below gives examples of each ID format.
Common API Calls 
When working with customers who have complex programs and specific needs for reporting or managing their programs, it can be useful to utilize the Qualtrics API to automate and make tasks easier. Generally, in enterprise programs where multiple work streams are running concurrently, there are a few common tasks that you will see API customers use collectively, which include the following: 
* Getting surveys
* Pulling survey responses
* Creating mailing lists
* Distributing to mailing lists
* Managing users and user groups
‘GET Survey’ is a common call you will see customers use to pull files for each survey created in their Qualtrics system. This allows them to quickly pull and store each survey for backup, audit, or other purposes. You will generally not see this used as a recurring task with customers but rather as more of a one-off need.
Exporting survey responses is one of the most common customer use cases for APIs. Generally, large customers will require data collected on the Qualtrics platform to be stored in their internal system. Instead of individually and continuously exporting each survey's data from Data & Analysis, customers can use this setup to create a specific download file that, when joined with other API calls, can be automatically uploaded into their systems. Some customers will call this a Return file or Backup. Certain industries require documentation of all responses, whether fully completed or not, so it's important to have a discussion with your customer upfront if they have this need to determine their specific requirements.
When customers utilize APIs, it is generally not in isolation for a single call or use case. In most cases, they will pair API calls with each other to complete a task or end-to-end workflow. Creating a mailing list combined with another call to distribute surveys is a common pairing use case. This automates the creation of a list and then automatically sends out invitations at a specified time or interval. You will see this used commonly with relational programs or programs where there is a specific cadence at which email invites should be sent. This can also be used for very large programs when they wish to batch their mailing lists and distribute them over a period of time.
There are also a series of API calls that can be used to manage both users and groups that access the Qualtrics platforms. These calls range from creating and deleting users and groups to generating and pulling a user’s API token. You can also create or delete groups and add or remove users from those groups. Many customers will use APIs for general user management because it is quick and easy. It's important to discuss with your customers early what their intended use cases for user management are so you can help them identify the proper combination of calls to use.
When designing API calls with your customer, it is important to recognize the order in which calls must be executed and plan accordingly. For example, if you are going to distribute a survey, you must first have the mailing list in place that you will distribute to. If the mailing list is created after the distribution is sent, no one will receive the survey. Time and prerequisites are major considerations in any of the API pairings, and they factor into the selection of which calls to use and their programming.






Stacking API Calls


In some instances, when API calls are paired together to complete an end-to-end workflow, there might be values needed from one call that must populate another call. We call this API stacking, or connecting a series of API calls through generated and populated IDs and statuses. In most API workflows you will find the need for stacking, as there is not one single call that can execute the entire workflow. It is important to investigate upfront if multiple linked calls will be needed by your customer to complete their desired task. This will help you identify the need and requirements to configure the stacked calls.
For example, if you wanted to pull a response export to load into your customer’s CRM, you would need three calls to execute this workflow:
* Create Response Export: This request starts the export process and is used to specify the file format and other preferences. This will return a Response Export ID.
* Get Response Export Progress: This request is used to check on the progress of the export using the Response Export ID provided in the first request. Once the percent complete gets to 100, you can use the last request to get the file.
* Get Response Export File: Once the file is ready, you can use this request to download it. It will export as a compressed file.
Once the customer has the export file, they can use their CRM tools or another API to upload the file into their system. When looking at the calls above, you can see that the first call returns a ‘Response Export ID’ field that is required for the second call. Likewise, the second call outputs a completion percentage that must hit 100% before the next call can be executed. This highlights the need for both fields and statuses to be clearly identified in order for calls to be stacked. It can also be helpful for identifying bugs or errors when a call does not execute as planned, as these are generally places where the API calls may be missing values that are needed to execute. For more information about specific stacking calls, be sure to review the Qualtrics API documentation thoroughly before recommending them to your customers.


Setting Up an API User
In any customer program, it is generally recommended to configure specific user accounts that will be used by the Implementation Team to access the customer’s surveys, dashboards, and program settings. The same rule applies even more so when using the API. If the customer will be working with API calls, you can set them up with a dedicated API user account that has Brand Administration access (since this is required to generate an API token) and whose sole purpose is to run API calls through. The same approach can be made if a third-party team or the Qualtrics Engineering Services Team will be completing custom work or other API tasks for the customer.
This user account should not be shared with users who do not understand the need for a safe environment to run API calls. Most importantly, anyone using this account must know to not generate a new API token when making calls. It’s key that the API token not be changed, as any current calls using the API token will break. If a customer has specific requirements about rotating API tokens for security purposes, it is important to know and plan for this early so that you can track all calls being made and manage changes to the API token being used in the future.
If your customer is working with a third-party team and doesn’t want to share their login information or API token, they can use OAuth 2.0. This generates what is called Client Credentials and a Bearer Token to access the Qualtrics API that is only valid for one hour. For more information about OAuth 2.0 and how to use it in API calls, check out the official Qualtrics API documentation on it here. 
Survey Flow Configuration
Automating API request construction is commonly done by an IT specialist at the customer's organization or the Qualtrics Engineering Services Team, as this process requires the implementation of custom code. In some cases though, customers can use a Qualtrics survey to set up an automation instead of custom code.
The steps below outline how customers can use the Survey Flow Web Service element to set up an automation:
1. In the Survey Flow, add a new Web Service element.
2. Insert the URL for the API request from the Definition section of the documentation.
3. Select the Method you wish to use (e.g., GET, PUT, POST, or DELETE).
   1. Note: Although PATCH is available in the Web Service element, it cannot be used with the Qualtrics API.
4. Click Add a custom header to send to the web service.
5. Enter X-API-TOKEN into the Header field to the web service and your token into the Value field.
6. Click the plus (+) sign to add all required header parameters for your API request.
7. If you have set the Method to POST or PUT, click Add a body parameter to send to the web service, and enter all required parameters and values.
8. Set the value for each parameter to its right.
   1. Note: You’ll want to use Piped Text for values with dynamic data, such as First Name, Last Name, and Email.
Note: This can also be accomplished through the Web Service task in the Workflows tab. See the Web Service Task support page for more information about this process.
If your customer pursues this method, it is important to thoroughly test this configuration and ensure that all data passing through populates correctly. If you need guidance on which calls this Web Service element can be used with, you can read more on our support pages and in the Qualtrics API documentation.
Running an API Call
The following are the high-level steps required to run a Qualtrics API call: 
1. Identify the API calls you would like to run,
2. Locate the Qualtrics IDs required to execute the command.
3. Execute the calls using Postman or a script you’ve created.
4. Troubleshoot errors, if any.
   1. You can find the list HTTP response codes and what they mean here. 


As an example, below are the steps for creating a new contact and sending a survey to that contact:
1. Find Qualtrics IDs required for all API calls
   1. Survey ID
   2. Survey Invite Message ID
   3. Mailing List ID
   4. Directory ID
   5. Library ID
2. Create a script or prepare a Postman environment to run the API calls
   1. POST Create Contact in Mailing List
      1. Required: First Name, Last Name, and email address of the contact as well as the Directory ID and Mailing List ID
      2. Recommended: The contact’s phone number, external data reference, and language code
      3. Include any other Embedded Data fields required for the survey and reporting
   2. POST Create Distribution 
      1. Required: Message (Library ID & Message ID, or message text), Mailing List ID, Header (email from address, from name, and subject line), and email send date
3. Respondent receives and takes the survey
4. Confirm survey response was submitted and contact data are saved into response
Limits and Additional Resources
As you’re getting started with the Qualtrics API, the best resource will be the Qualtrics REST API documentation at api.qualtrics.com. Additionally, visiting the Developer Corner of the Qualtrics Community for tips and sample code is a great resource.
As you’re preparing to use the Qualtrics REST API, keep in mind the tips included in this section as well. 
Request Limits 
To ensure service health and stability, Qualtrics enforces a limit on how rapidly APIs can be called.
Qualtrics enforces two rate limits:
1. Total number of calls per brand. Brands may make up to 3000 API requests per minute across all of their API calls. This request limit is enforced at the brand level.
2. Total number of calls to an endpoint per brand. In addition to the Per Brand Limit, certain endpoints have a lower per brand limit for the number of calls that they will support per minute. What this means is that while a brand may make 3000 requests per minute, some endpoints will engage rate-limiting at a lower number of calls per minute. Those limits are listed here.


API Call Duration 
To ensure responsive APIs, Qualtrics APIs have a 5-second call timeout. In very rare cases an API may have a longer timeout, this will be noted on the API reference page.
Survey Response Limits 
The maximum number of records per survey response data file is 1M. If the maximum number of rows of data is reached, additional data files will be included in the .zip file in the format: {surveyname}_{filenum}.{fileExtension}
Mailing List Limits 
Mailing list names are limited to 100 characters.
File Size Limits 
Maximum file upload size is 5MBs unless specified otherwise by the endpoint documentation.














Closing the Loop

What is Closed-Loop Feedback?
Closed-loop feedback, or closing the loop, is the practice of following up with customers who have provided you feedback. It is important in today’s competitive world to not only gather customers’ feedback and opinions but also to resolve their queries and address their concerns in real-time. Closed-loop feedback is one of the most critical technologies in improving an organization's customer experience.
Closing the loop allows organizations to take action in real-time. Concerns shared by respondents in the form of feedback can be addressed immediately. In the long term, this helps to retain the customer/respondent and has a positive impact on your brand perception. The most common path to close the loop when a customer complaint is received is to deploy a follow-up effort and close a case when a logical solution is reached. When a customer’s issue is recorded, a case can be generated and assigned to an employee to respond and identify the root cause of the respondent's frustration. In Qualtrics, this is done by building a closed-loop feedback system with ticketing.
Typically, in closed-loop ticketing, the employee responsible for following up (the ticket owner) should not be the same employee responsible for the initial interaction. This ensures that the respondent can be open about the feedback and not feel pressured to adjust based on the initial interaction. For example, if a car dealership receives negative feedback on a sales interaction, having the sales associate reach out to the customer will not have the same impact as having the sales manager reach out to the customer to understand and rectify the solution.
In terms of closed-loop feedback management, there are two types: inner loop and outer loop. The situation referenced above, in which a manager or agent follows up individually with a customer to address an issue raised in a survey response, is inner loop feedback management. It is focused on addressing individual situations and implementing coaching behaviors to prevent similar situations from arising in the future.
Outer loop feedback management is used to identify areas for structural and larger-scale improvements. Rather than following up with individual situations, a CX team will look at data from a group of respondents, and identify and prioritize the most prevalent root cause of customer pain. They will then build an updated process and communicate the improvements to the organization.
Outer loop can be applied to the aggregate data from an inner loop, such as by looking at the overall data for a call center to identify trends common to all call center agents. It can also be employed in cases where there is not an inner loop feedback loop in place, such as with the anonymous data collected with a feedback slider on a website.
When considering outer loop feedback management, keep in mind that decisions should be driven by external data in addition to ticketing and survey data in Qualtrics. Consider organizational factors and existing change management systems in place. Try to encourage your customers to take as holistic a view as possible of their organization’s data when making decisions.
How Closed-Loop Feedback Works
In a traditional closed-loop setup, tickets will be generated based on survey responses. Customers will need to identify the key data points from survey questions and variables to set up appropriate conditions to generate a ticket. It is also imperative to identify the employee or team responsible for managing the follow-up interaction with the survey respondents. Ensure that the individual or team identified will have the required bandwidth to follow up on these tickets in a timely manner.
Once the respondent submits their survey response the ticket will be generated. The ticket owner will follow up with the respondent and update the ticket status along with their feedback. The ticket owner may also be responsible to identify the root cause of the concern or interaction. Root Cause can be used to broadly categorize similar concerns as one topic.
It is the responsibility of the ticket owner to follow up with the respondent in a timely manner. Ticket data is accessible by supervisors for them to review the performance of frontline employees and the timeline they follow in taking action. Ticket data such as Status, Root Cause, etc., can also be presented in the dashboard for the executives to act and implement structural change.

Stages of Closed-Loop Management:
1. Evaluate: The survey response is submitted, and the response is evaluated based on ticket conditions. 
2. Assign: The ticket is assigned to an owner or the appropriate team for a follow-up.
3. Contact: The ticket owner communicates with the respondent to understand their concern and shares their feedback. 
4. Manage: Feedback is shared with Frontline Managers to resolve the issues, coach the team or escalate for management review.
5. Monitor: The management team monitors performance based on tickets generated, resolutions provided, and prioritizes initiatives.
This process helps in implementing a closed-loop feedback system smoothly and helps customers to take appropriate measures to improve their customer experience.
For additional resources on the closed-loop framework, please view the Closed-Loop Framework file in the Resources tab.
Customer Process Considerations
Any organization must ask five key questions before implementing a closed-loop feedback ticketing system:
1. Which customers should receive a follow-up? 
2. Who should conduct the follow-up? 
3. When should the follow-up happen? 
4. How should the follow-up be handled? 
5. What happens after the follow-up? 
This process will help ensure a closed-loop feedback system is implemented smoothly and ensure customers take appropriate measures to improve customer experience. 
Ticket/Workflow Designs 
Customers should evaluate the critical survey data points to trigger a ticket. While doing so they need to keep in mind the objective of triggering a ticket. Why is it important to trigger a ticket for a specific data point, such as ‘Detractors’? How will managing tickets and taking required actions help the customer to improve the experience of their end customers? Review ticket data to analyze what needs to improve and understand the importance of these changes.
Most enterprise customers will have several closed-loop workflows per survey and many more across the entire license. It is important to map out all anticipated workflows, including all fields of data you hope to capture so that the customer has an understanding of how all of the workflows will interact. It is important to design your ticket bucketing so that multiple tickets are not being created for one survey response. It will also help the customer understand all resources required to accomplish their desired configuration. This includes the number of employees required to respond to all tickets created and the timeline anticipated to configure the workflows and ticketing.
Ticket Field Names 
Determining ticket field names and maintaining a consistent naming convention is crucial when beginning a ticketing setup. It is recommended that ticket field names are consistent with survey Embedded Data fields where possible to avoid confusion and ensure data is transferred correctly from surveys to tickets. This will also provide the ticket owner with easy-to-understand ticket data fields and make their job of following up with the customer more seamless.
Ticket Data Sets 
It is important to note that ticketing data sets are entirely separate from survey data sets. This means that ticketing data and survey data are stored independently from each other. For surveys, there is a data set unique to each survey. Ticketing data is common across a license so ticket data from all surveys is stored together. Ticket data fields need to be consistently named so it is easy to report on aggregate data across surveys. Data from ticket fields that share the same name (spacing and capitalization count!) can be aggregated across surveys and reported on in dashboards. It is important to remember that any survey data field that you would like to include on a Ticket Reporting Dashboard page will need to be saved as a ticket data field.
Ticket Assignment 
As we mentioned above, the best practice is to have the manager of a frontline employee follow up on negative feedback. We’ll do this by assigning tickets to managers or another team designed specifically to follow up on feedback and take action.
How can ticket assignment work? Let’s take the previous example of a car dealership. If a sales associate receives negative feedback on a sales interaction, the sales manager should reach out to the customer to understand and rectify the solution. In the case of this car dealership, let’s say they have a team of managers that cover several shifts of car salespeople. We may want to dynamically assign the ticket and follow-up action so that the work is spread evenly across all managers. We can create logic in the flow of our survey to dictate which manager receives each ticket but still set a default ticket owner on the ticket itself.
For more information, check out the Dynamic Ticket Assignment Qualtrics support page.
External API 
Some Qualtrics customers execute their closed-loop configurations outside of the XM Platform. Qualtrics offers integrations, including integrations with Zendesk, Desk.com, Slack, and Freshdesk, to accomplish ticketing based on survey data using an external platform. Custom integrations can also be set up leveraging the Qualtrics REST API.
Many customers will configure ticketing programs both within Qualtrics and through leveraging another ticketing vendor. This is often dependent on the needs of different departments in the customer’s organization. Be sure to ask your customer to consider their organization’s full ticketing setup when designing a ticketing workflow within Qualtrics so it is easy to pass information between platforms and reporting can be as streamlined as possible. Note that, by default, you will only be able to report on ticketing data collected directly within Qualtrics in the Qualtrics dashboards.
Best Practices for Ticketing Features
There are many features available in the XM Platform to help you implement your ideal closed-loop feedback ticketing configuration. Some of these features can also be customized based on requirements. Product features are detailed in the CustomerXM Expert course and on the Qualtrics Support site.
The table below includes a review of important Qualtrics ticketing features that you can leverage when putting closed-loop into place with your customers:
Feature
	Best Practices
	Ticket / Workflow Condition
	Tickets can be triggered/generated based on survey responses.
For example, a customer can reach out to all Detractors that also selected the option ‘yes’ requesting a call-back. The condition can be set based on these two questions in the Workflows tab.
	Ticket Priority
	Priority is set for each task.
For example, ‘High’ priority can be set up for Detractors, ‘Medium’ for Passive, and ‘Low’ for Promoters.
The ticket priority scale is common across a license.
	Ticket Name
	The ticket name field is customizable and will also be the name for a follow-up email for a ticket. One may use Piped Text, plain text, or both to customize the ticket name.
	Owner
	Ticket owners are the individuals or teams from the customer's organization that are responsible to contact the respondent to ensure resolution to their issue.
A default or backup owner can be set in the Ticket Task and dynamic ticket owners can be set in the Survey Flow.
	Ticket Data
	This will give the ticket owner quick context on the situation along with contact information such as phone number or email address. Any survey or Embedded Data field can be included, but no fields are included by default. Full Record can be enabled to allow the ticket owner to view the full survey response.
All data from Ticket Task is also mapped in the Ticket Data Mapper within the Settings section of the dashboard.
Ticket data is what will be available for reporting in the dashboard.
For example, the NPS rating followed by open text feedback shared by the customer.
Ticket Data is grouped under 3 main categories:
- Basic Ticketing Info
- Ticket Notes
- Ticket Data
	Ticket Notes
	Ticket Notes is a field for the ticket owners to input their feedback and record further details about their follow up workflows. They can be added in the form of multiple questions and reported in the dashboard.
	Ticket Email
	By default, Qualtrics will send an email to ticket owners notifying them they have been assigned a ticket. This default email cannot be customized.
Email tasks can be added to ticket workflows to allow you to send a more customized email notification to a ticket owner.
For example, if there are specific instructions you want your ticket owners to take when opening a ticket you can include them in the ticket email.
	Root Cause
	The root cause allows customers to categorize concerns into specific groups. It can be used to identify what impacts the respondent most and take corrective action. A best practice is to determine a fixed set of root cause categories and encourage all agents to leverage the same list.
	Ticket Status
	Customize Ticket statuses to include all possible stages that a ticket may go through before closing.
Ticket statues are customizable but once created, the list of statues will be set across the entire license. Keep this in mind when your customer is setting up multiple ticketing programs in the same license.
	Manage Teams
	Define the ‘Team’ or ‘Role’ structure for managing and actioning tickets.
	Ticket Reminders
	Based on customizable conditions such as ‘Priority, ‘Age’, and ‘Project’ you may set ticket reminders. Ticket reminders are emails that can be sent to multiple people from within or outside the organization.
	Sub Tickets
	Sub Tickets do not carry over data from parent tickets but operate as entirely new tickets.
	Ticket Workflows
	Ticket Workflows allow users to escalate tickets that are unassigned or unresolved. Tickets are reassigned, given a new status, or emailed to ticket owners.
	Ticketing Queues
	Queues manage the assignment of tickets and ensure that tickets being assigned to teams are only worked on by one team member at a team.
	Ticket Reporting
	Dashboards allow respondents to report on ticketing data using the Ticket Reporting page type. It has a different set of widgets available as compared to a traditional CX dashboard page.
	Before launching your closed-loop ticketing configuration, you’ll want to make sure you thoroughly test all of the workflows. Tickets will be created any time test data is generated or survey responses are collected if the conditions in the survey responses meet those laid out in the workflow’s condition.
As a best practice, add a condition to your logic specifying the response type that should trigger the workflow. This will help ensure tickets aren’t created for Preview, Imported, or Test Responses unless desired. Be sure to reset the logic before launch! Check Workflows Reporting to see if your ticket workflows were successfully triggered or not. This can be helpful if you don’t have access to the ticket owner's email or are not generating ticket emails at all.
Brand-Wide Design Decisions and Considerations
In addition to configuring the ticket itself, there are additional features and settings that must be done at a brand-wide level. The following functionalities can be configured only by a Brand Administrator, so it is important to solidify these options before providing them to the other lines of business. Generally, an enterprise customer will set out standards of use for these additional features before communicating to each line of business whether they can use them or not.
For example, the Qualtrics platform allows users to program custom ticket statuses (the defaults are Open, In Progress, and Closed) that will apply to all tickets on the brand. Because of this, if one program wants to have four ticket statuses and all other programs only want three, there can be a conflict. We recommend setting a standard for statuses and then communicating them to the lines of business. If they have additional tagging needs, they can use follow-up questions programmed with additional statuses to alert ticket owners and high-level viewers of the ticket’s status.
Qualtrics also has additional functionality to set up ticket workflows to allow automatic actions to be executed when conditions are met. Available actions include sending an email, updating the status of a ticket, or assigning a ticket. These can be used in conjunction and, when programmed, are on a brand-wide basis. If you do not want these to impact all tickets, you must specify in the condition logic that only a particular ticket, or a survey’s set of tickets, should execute the workflow. To learn more about setting up these workflows and the available options, visit our support pages.
In general, these requirements and configurations will be recorded in an Experience Design document, in the ticketing configuration section, and in a Program Design document. They are all useful things to also include in any handover documentation for the Qualtrics Support Team and CSM in case a Brand Administrator accidentally changes a configuration and other programs are impacted.
Designing and documenting tickets and brand-wide settings prior to the configuration is important, as it allows you to ensure that multiple work streams interact properly, that requested data is available via the survey, and that you can build out holistic reporting without having to re-do the ticketing configuration. Across multiple workstreams, it is especially key to solidify these first if reporting requires the data across programs to be consolidated or reported separately. This allows you to determine if you should use the ticket data prefix approach. Compounding on this, planning early allows you to standardize these fields to ensure they are an exact match so that they can be connected and so that you can check that all data is available via the survey.
Oftentimes, customers will want to report on something that isn’t available via the survey, and the earlier this is caught and addressed, the sooner you can successfully launch. Taking these things into consideration, you can build out reporting early and as robustly as possible, as this will help your customers build confidence in the power of the Qualtrics Ticketing platform.
Ticketing Design Document
In enterprise engagements, each program, survey, and line of business often has specific ticket generation, design, and assignment requirements that must be collected and managed to ensure they meet requirements while also having a proper design for implementation. To accomplish this, many enterprise implementations will use a template to collect ticket requirements to ensure that data is available from the survey, naming conventions are aligned, follow-up questions are finalized, and triggering conditions do not overlap and create duplicate tickets. This makes the requirement gathering process and signoff simple for both customers and their implementation teams. When using this method, it is important to review the template beforehand so that customers are aware of decisions and constraints prior to completion.
Some key elements in the ticketing design document include the following:
Element 
	Description
	Example
	Triggering Logic
	Denotes the conditions and logic that should trigger this particular ticket
	If NPS (Q1) = Detractor (0-6) and ContactY/N = Y
	Ticket Name
	Provides the name of the ticket as it appears in the Qualtrics platform and generally describes the nature of the ticket (e.g., if they were a detractor)
	${e://Field/FirstName} ${e://Field/LastName} - Detractor Response
	Priority
	Used for filtering and prioritization by ticket owners and can be Low, Medium, or High
	High
	Owner
	Outlines who the end owner should be and the method of assignment (e.g., individual assigned all tickets using Q_TicketOwner or a ticket team)
	Regional Manager as assigned by Q_TicketOwner
Default owner is Sam Smith (listed in ticket configuration)
	Ticket Summary
	Two optional fields that appear at the top of the ticket to give owners a quick view into the ticket. You can assign a multiple choice question and a comments question.
	NPS= Q1 recode value*, NPS Comment = Q2
	Ticket Data
	Fields passed from survey questions, embedded data, or metadata that should be visible or invisible on a ticket either for follow-up or downstream reporting. To distinguish between them in dashboard mapping for multi-program engagements, sometimes you will use prefixes to denote their origin (for example, Private Banking US could be denoted as PBUS_FieldName). 
	* PBUS_NPS Score = Q1 recode value
* PBUS_NPSComment = Q2
* PBUS_FirstName = FirstName
* PBUS_LastName = LastName
* PBUS_Email = Email
* PBUS_Phone = Phone
* PBUS_Region = RegionName
* PBUS_RMName =RegionalManagerName
* PBUS_RMEmail = RegionalManagerEmail
* PBUS_EmpID* (reporting only) = EmpID
* PBUS_AnnualSpend*(reporting only) = Annual Spend
	Follow Up Questions
	Outlines which questions should be programmed to help ticket owners conduct follow-ups or for downstream reporting on dashboards. When drill down root cause analysis is needed, you can sometimes use the drill down question type in place of the built-in root cause functionality.
	Q1- Number of contact attempts
* First attempt
* Second attempt
* No response from customer, email sent
Q2- Final resolution
* No response from the customer
* Issue resolved
* Further follow-up needed
Q3- Comments
* Open text
	Root Cause
	Used for a single-level tagging of the issue’s root cause
	Support interaction
Problem submitting claim 
Website interaction
Sales interaction
	Allow Users to View Full Response
	A toggled functionality that allows ticket owners to click to view the full response. If there are any fields in the survey or embedded data that should not be visible to ticket owners, it is important that this be disabled or that those fields are marked in the Embedded Data settings and reporting only.
	N/A
	In enterprise programs, you can use this format in conjunction with an Enterprise Design Document to collect requirements for each program or for a program that wants to trigger multiple tickets for a survey. For example, if your customer launches a Support Satisfaction Survey after a support interaction and it requires that separate tickets be created for issues with billing vs claims, you could duplicate this template and have each group respectively fill it out. This way, you can compare triggering logic across the two and see how their follow-up questions and ticket data align. It is important in an instance like this that you understand the downstream reporting necessary to help you build each line of business in the design.
To make configurations of complex ticketing programs easier, there is a Ticket Template functionality that allows you to save and duplicate ticket configurations for multiple programs. For example, if in the above case the billing tickets should have an additional follow-up question for billing resolution, you could save the claims ticket as a template, copy it to the billing ticket workflow, and add the additional question without having to completely reconfigure the ticket. This avoids errors in the formats of fields, follow-up questions, and ticket naming. If you use Ticket Templates across surveys, it is important that you remap any survey question or Embedded Data fields to point to the current survey that the ticket will be triggered from.
Note: Something that is often missed when editing ticket data is when you add a new field, the new field in the ticket data will only affect future tickets and is not retroactive. Please view this support page for more information.
Limitations for Multiple Workstreams 
In enterprise implementations, there are a few limitations to implementing tickets across multiple work streams or those with complex customer requirements. Most of these issues revolve around formatting ticket data fields and follow-up questions to consolidate reporting fields. Additionally, with larger organizations spread across multiple countries, there are constraints to the way tickets can be translated. It is important that you understand these limitations upfront so you can come to your customers early with solutions.
When configuring ticket data fields, it is important to note that if you change the wording, spelling, or punctuation of the field even slightly, the Qualtrics platform will recognize it as an entirely separate field. The most common formatting errors that cause this are misspellings, capitalizations, and extra spaces. For example, when programming two separate tickets on the same program, if you programmed a field in one ticket as “NPS” and used “NPS ” on the other ticket, these would be recognized as separate fields. There is also added complexity when using a prefix to denote the different programs (e.g., “PBUS-NPS” vs “PBUS_NPS” would produce two separate fields). It is important to test early, both in the ticket and dashboard reporting, to avoid these errors.
Another common formatting error is in the programming of follow-up questions across multiple tickets. ANY difference in the text of the follow-up questions will cause the Qualtrics platform to recognize both the question text and answer text as two separate elements. For example, if you had a ticket programmed as “Follow up completed.” and a separate ticket programmed as “Follow-up completed.”, the “-” in the second ticket would make the fields different.
To avoid these errors, it is recommended that you use Ticket Templates. Ticket Templates allow you to program a ticket once, save it as a template, and then paste it into another ticket configuration with separate logic. For Ticket Templates, it is important to first ensure that all the fields and follow-up questions should also be used in the secondary ticket. If the survey fields are different (i.e., if you are using the Ticket Template on a different survey), it’s also important to ensure that you switch these over to the correct survey without touching the programmed field name.
An additional limitation of the current Ticketing platform is its translation capabilities. There is currently no way to translate a ticket and keep the fields connected for reporting. If a customer has no ticket reporting requirements, then you can program separate tickets for separate languages. For example, if survey response A is submitted in French, then you can create a ticket in French, and if survey response B is submitted in English, then you can create a ticket in English. This can be programmed into the triggering logic, but it will mean that the French ticket cannot be translated into English, even if the ticket owner does not speak French.
For programs that require downstream reporting and that must also have tickets available in two languages (either due to regulations or the demographics of their employees), then you must program tickets with the two languages side by side.
For example, in a program where they will have French and English tickets, you can program different elements as follows:
Element
	Ticket Logic
	Ticket Name
	“{Customer Name} is a Detractor / {Customer Name] est un Détracteur”
	Ticket Data Field
	“tNPS_PhoneNumber / tNPS_NuméroDeTéléphone”
	Follow-up Question
	“Final resolution? / Résolution finale?”
Answer Choice 1: “Issue resolved. / Problème résolu.”
Answer Choice 2: “Issue not resolved, additional follow up required. / Problème non résolu, suivi supplémentaire requis.”
Answer Choice 3: “Customer not reached. / customer non atteint.”
	With this approach, it is still important to follow best practices to ensure there are no additional spaces, capitalizations, or misspellings that would cause the platform to think that they were separate fields. It is also important that all tickets that require consolidated reporting with this approach adhere to the multi-language format of the tickets. If they do not and one ticket only has English while another ticket has French and English, the Qualtrics platform will recognize these as two separate ticket fields, and reporting on them holistically will not be possible. 
Ticketing Dashboard  
When beginning the ticket dashboard build, it is important to understand the way the ticket data set is structured and its impact on other currently launched ticket dashboard pages. The ticket data set is brand-wide; This means that every single ticket is contained in the same data set. When mapping to the dashboard, the dashboard has a limit of 200 ticket data fields that can be mapped. This limit is to maintain performance, as most programs will not exceed this limit. With that being said, some enterprise programs will go past this limit, and it is important to ensure that all mapped fields are currently being used and are not accidental fields created from misspellings, extra spaces, or capitalizations. In the case that your customer does require more than 200 fields and you have cleared out mistakenly-created fields, you can contact the Qualtrics Engineering Services team to have this limit increased.
Additionally, because all tickets are on the same fieldset when mapping ticket data to the dashboard, adding additional fields will impact all active dashboards using that data. This means that if you already have three programs configured for ticket reporting and you change the mapping by adding additional fields for your program, when you save these changes, it will re-cache all of the dashboards. This can put the dashboard out of service for some time, so it is important to plan the mapping completion early and to ensure that it is either outside of business hours or at a low-traffic time. This also applies to changes to the dashboard down the line once launched.
When making any changes to the dashboard mapping, it is important that you do not delete, rename, or remap any fields other than those you will actually be using in your dashboard. If you change or delete a field that another program is using, it will break the dashboard widget or filter referring to that field, which will impact their end-users. It is important that you train your customers on this as well to ensure the long-term dashboard owner knows the impact their work can have on other programs, including their own.
Ticket Reporting (Outer Loop) 
The goal of implementing ticketing and other “inner loop” information collection procedures is to exert broader change on the organization or strategies. Within the Qualtrics platform, the majority of closed-loop processes occur through survey responses, ticket workflow, and dashboard reporting. To exert organizational change, you can encourage your customers to take the information contained within Qualtrics and the external data to create a big picture view of the organization and where it may be struggling. Some examples of external data can include operational data, organizational factors, and other change management systems already in place at the customer's organization.
During implementation, we generally do not advise on the specifics of how the customer can create a change management system, but we do discuss how they can use information from Qualtrics to fuel and inform these changes. To ensure that you give your customers as many tools as possible, you can train them on how to fully utilize Qualtrics dashboards, the ticketing system, or action planning to track their efforts over time.








Customer Experience Dashboards
Scoping Dashboard Requirements
Before you begin building dashboards, it is important to understand how the customer wants to represent their data. It is recommended to conduct a dashboard scoping call with the client to understand and outline the needs of the dashboards. 
If applicable, you should have the customer share dashboard layouts that they have used in the past. Of course, the idea is not to replicate the design exactly, but to understand the customer’s requirements. Especially for larger programs, reviewing their past dashboards may help your implementation team more efficiently design the dashboard. 
In this call, you should also align on how many dashboards will be built, how many pages each dashboard will include, and how many widgets will be configured per page. This should also include a mutual acknowledgment of the number of roles and the number of users within each role that will be accessing the dashboard as laid out in the SOW. 
Generally, your SOW will specify how many dashboard pages and widgets per page you’ll build for the customer. Going beyond the SOW is a judgment call that balances the customer’s requirements and requests and the timeline allotted. The best practice is to keep it simple!
As a baseline recommendation, we suggest creating one dashboard per project with a maximum of 5-7 pages, assuming:
* 1 page for executives (No more than 5 widgets without having to scroll - we want to keep this high-level and simple)
* 1 page for directors/managers (A detailed view)
* 1 page for front line employees
Beyond that, there may be:
* 1 page for distribution reporting
* 1 page for ticket reporting
Defining the Business Outcome
The key to designing an effective dashboard is to ensure that it represents data in a manner that will help a customer to make sound business decisions. As a result, it’s important to ensure your customer has defined their intended business outcome for the dashboard as soon as possible. All dashboard viewer roles, survey questions, and metrics on the dashboard should relate to the customer's business objective.
This is a simple process: 
1. Clarify the end goal of the dashboard
2. Link it directly to your customer’s CX strategy and metrics
For example, a customer might hope to reduce the cost to serve their end customers. The feedback they collect in their transaction surveys should be focused on both improving the experience of clients and identifying areas in which they can modify offerings or services to reduce cost. As such, the dashboard should serve to highlight areas of change to achieve cost reduction.
Identify important metrics that will drive the changes needed in the business. It’s important that the CX program supports the overall company strategy and provides the associated business outcomes. CX metrics will vary based on the customer’s industry. Be sure to understand what metrics your customer has used in the past and encourage them to consult with an XM Scientist to ensure they are using industry-standard metrics.
Occasionally, survey content needs to be adjusted following dashboard design sessions to reflect updated perspectives on metrics, scales, or important questions. It is important to design the dashboard and configure a full dashboard draft, before launching a survey so changes can still be made without impacting data.
Understanding the Dashboard Users
Another important step in the scoping process is to identify who is going to access the dashboard (the dashboard audience). Each page may have a different audience and as such, the purpose of each page should be built for each of the audiences. Your findings in understanding each audience will allow you to map the data to the audience’s needs and help to identify the type of widgets that could be used to represent the data. 
In partnership with the customer’s CX team, create a table of users and what each user group would want to see on the dashboard (see example below). It’s also helpful to include what data restrictions each user group should have in the same table. Focus on how users of the dashboard can use it to tie their actions back to data from the survey. Additionally, ensure that you are capturing all the data users would like to see in survey responses or embedded data fields. It can either be captured directly in the survey or as embedded data passed into the survey from XM Directory.
Each set of users will fall somewhere different on the spectrum of dashboard user requirement attributes. Consider all factors, as well as each role’s business objective, when filling out the table to define their needs. Additionally, be sure to include any data restrictions relevant to each role.
As you're discussing types of users, data restrictions, roles, etc., you should begin the discussion of how user attributes would be used to configure automatic role enrollment, setting default filters, and data restrictions. You should bring this up early since the customer will most likely have to work internally with their IT team to determine if certain attributes could be passed via SSO that could be used for these or if they have to create a user file to import with the attributes
Note: For larger programs, a spreadsheet should be used to manage user attributes. 
Audience
	Objectives
	Data Restrictions
	Primary Metrics
	Supporting Data
	Executive
	Understand aggregate performance. 
Identify opportunities for improvement.
	None
	* NPS
* CSAT
	* Customer Comments
* Agent Friendliness
* Agent Helpfulness
* Call Topic (e.g. Embedded Data)
* Region
* Date/Timeline
* Market
* Account Type & Tenure
	Regional Manager
	Understand the performance of individual team members. 
Understand how each can improve.
	Only see data for bank agents on their team, as defined by the survey embedded data field “Agent” matching their user attribute “Branch Name”
	* NPS
* CSAT
	* Customer Comments
* Agent Friendliness
* Agent Helpfulness
* Call Topic (e.g. Embedded Data)
* Account Type & Tenure
* Date/Timeline
	Call Center Frontline Employee
	Understand individual performance. 
Understand how they can individually improve.
	Only see individual data, as defined by the survey embedded data field “Agent” matching their user attribute
	* CSAT
* Representative Attributes
* Time to Issue Resolution
* First Call Resolution
	* Individual Overall CSAT
* Client Comments
* Agent Friendliness
* Agent Helpfulness
* Call Topic (e.g. Embedded Data)
* Date/Timeline
	Overview of the Design Led Framework
Dashboard pages provide a thematic design framework to organize your widgets in meaningful ways. Qualtrics recommends that you use a design-led framework when selecting visualizations for your data. This includes wireframes or prototypes and then testing configurations with users before broadly launching the dashboards.
During your initial session with the customer, you should have identified the groups viewing the dashboard, their use cases, and success criteria. Within this session, you may also begin to whiteboard high-level concepts of what should be included on the dashboard. Following the initial design call, you should begin to construct wireframes based on the data available in the survey and the customer’s reporting requirements. We will cover wireframing techniques on the next page. 
Designing dashboards is a very iterative process. To avoid an endless cycle of modifications and back and forth, it is important to set expectations with the customer upfront on how many iterations of the dashboard you’ll work through with them. This will help keep your timeframe tighter and the project within scope. Also, be sure to make it clear with the customer who is responsible for enhancement and configuration changes moving forward. It is a best practice to specify both in the SOW.
Design With the Stakeholders in Mind
When laying out the dashboard, consider what content should be most visible to users. The best dashboards are designed to drive specific behavior or action. They have fewer metrics and focus on helping users understand how to improve those metrics. Less effective dashboards are similar to weather reports that list many metrics but don’t actually help users understand how to improve performance.
If you are migrating a customer's existing CX program to Qualtrics, it is a best practice for customers to gather all program stakeholders in a workshop or meeting to get stakeholder input on what reporting features work best for them and what they dislike. This is not always possible, but the feedback from this workshop can be very valuable.
Consider building your dashboard to resemble the customer’s existing reports, as this is a format with which the users will be familiar. For example, executives are likely to have a preference towards the format they had been previously using. While we don't want to exactly replicate the customer’s historical reports, we also don't want the new Qualtrics dashboard to be so unfamiliar that it discourages usage. 
As such, the best solution is to mimic dashboard design for key metrics and highly used widgets, and then identify and recommend improvements where it will drive the greatest value. In most cases, Qualtrics dashboard visualizations will not directly mirror the customer's previous graphs or tables, so it is important to recommend visualizations that either resemble historical widgets or improve the user experience. Once the dashboard is built, you must provide training to the end-users on how to use the new widgets and how to leverage historical similarities, such as metric types and titles. This training can be formal or informal depending on the customer and the number of people that want to be in the training. 
The overall goal of a dashboard is to provide actionable insights to the right people. For example, an agent can improve frontline service while the CEO can make strategic decisions based on dashboard information. Power users may benefit from additional filters and views of their data, but for an executive audience or any other group who will be accessing less frequently, simpler is usually better.
Wireframing Dashboards
One technique used for overall page, widget, filter, and access design is the wireframing method. In this method, you and your customer sketch out the design of the dashboard page by page before configuring the dashboards in the Qualtrics platform. This can be done through an in-person design session on a whiteboard or pieces of paper, or via digital documents such as PDFs, PPTs, or Mural. You can see an example by downloading the Wireframe Example file in the Resources tab. 
The general process and rules for the wireframing method include the following:
Step
	Action
	1
	Use each page as a separate page of the dashboard (generally, one page per one to two roles, depending on the user’s needs).
	2
	On each page, reserve the top section for detailing widgets that should be implemented.
	3
	In the body of the page, sketch boxes for each widget. Note the title, data source, breakouts, and widget-specific filters in each box.
	4
	Review the wireframe with each user group.
	5
	Make edits to the wireframe until signed off on by the customer then program the dashboards into the Qualtrics platform.
	In terms of widgets, avoid widget overload so the impact of widgets isn’t diluted. Note that dashboard page load times increase with 20 or more widgets on the page. Widget recommendations differ based on industry and the purpose of the dashboard. A good rule of thumb for organizing widgets is to place them in order of complexity as a user scrolls down the page. To see some dashboard best practice examples, navigate to the Resources tab and view the Dashboard Design Principals file.
When working with a customer, it is important that you review the overall process before starting to design. There should only be two to three rounds of revisions before the wireframe is signed off on. Set a date for when the wireframe needs to be signed off on to ensure that you have enough time for building and testing before launching. Make sure there is a clear owner for sign-off from each program and role that will be accessing the dashboard.
Five Tips to Make a Dashboard User Friendly
The following recommendations will help make your dashboards easy to use:
Select the Right Visualization for Your Data 
Numeric data is only compatible with certain widgets, while open text data can only be used with others. It is important to make sure that your data is in the right format and is used in the right widget type and also that the widget type is acceptable for the data’s end goal. You’ll learn more about the different formats in Lesson 3. For example, you would want to display any high-level KPIs such as NPS or CSAT in a clear widget for numeric data such as a Gauge Chart or Number Chart to provide a quick and easy-to-see view. For verbatim comments data, you might add a Response Ticker Widget with CSAT or NPS score displayed to the left of each comment.
Draw Attention to Key Insights 
The placement of your widgets impacts how dashboard viewers will read the data. Dashboard viewers are likely to read the dashboard like a book, starting with the top left for left leading languages. Always put your KPIs at the top and work your way downward. Viewers may not always read the entire page, so the lower on a page a widget is, the less likely it will be read. The top row of widgets, for example, might feature a Gauge Chart of the overall NPS followed by a Simple Chart of how the overall NPS has trended over time. Additional rows of widgets should include data about drivers of the overall NPS.
Avoid Making a Viewer Scroll 
As a best practice, use a maximum of three scroll panes per dashboard page. As dashboard viewers move down the dashboard, they will then only see three unique combinations of widgets. This is why it’s important to make data easy to find and keep the dashboard concise with relevant info. When a customer asks for more widgets than this, you can recommend splitting that page into multiple pages.
ayer Pages Like Chapters in a Book 
When customers have multiple objectives for a dashboard you can break down each major objective into a dashboard page. This allows them to tailor the information they are displaying and ensure it’s easy to digest the information. For example, the first page of a dashboard might be an overview page including high-level information, the second page might include regionally specific data for regional managers, and the third page might be a coaching page. The coaching page will include suggestions on how to interpret and take action on the data.
Reinforce Consistent Structure Throughout the Dashboard 
Making information easy to find is important for usability. You can do this by keeping your dashboard layout consistent. For example, use consistent widget position and widget type for the same metrics, colors, labeling and fonts, and other standardized design principles. For positioning, you can ensure to always put an NPS Gauge Chart in the top-left position and that data from the north region is always blue.
Making Dashboards Mobile Accessible
If your customer wants to optimize for the mobile dashboard experience, it will be explicitly called out as an additional deliverable in the SOW. Most customers will not create a separate mobile-friendly dashboard but instead will focus on creating mobile-optimized pages for roles likely to use the XM App to view their dashboard.
Qualtrics offers the Qualtrics XM App that dashboard viewers can use to view and interact with dashboards. Dashboard administrators must log onto the desktop version of the Qualtrics site to edit the widgets. Viewers must log in using a username and password, so they must first have been set up as a dashboard user and added to a role.
It’s important to note and share with customers that all widgets will be scaled as best as possible to meet the dimensions defined on the desktop, but they may look a little different or require scrolling on the mobile app. It is challenging to drill down into widgets on a small screen, so it is a best practice to share dashboards with widgets that display important metrics and KPIs readily available.
Check widget compatibility and limitations before finalizing the dashboard in mobile view. Keep in mind that filters added directly to widgets are not compatible with the Qualtrics XM app, however, filters at the dashboard page level are compatible. As a best practice, build extra time into your project plan to design, build, and test mobile dashboards with your customer. The flip cards below lists widgets that are currently compatible with the Qualtrics XM App.
Using the Data Mapper
The data mapper is the dashboard feature that is responsible for converting data sources, such as surveys, to reportable fields on the dashboard. Once you have identified what survey(s) or other data sources should be mapped into the dashboard, Qualtrics will assign field types and field labels to each survey question or other field. 
You should consider the following questions when setting up the data mapper:
* Where is data originating from that should go into the dashboard?
* What data should be included? All data, data from select questions, or embedded data in the dashboard from each survey?
* If mapping multiple surveys to the same dashboard, how should similar questions be treated?
* How are fields named?
* Do field types need to be adjusted?
* Do any fields need to be re-coded?
The data mapper will automatically add fields and field names for the first survey added to the dashboard. For subsequent surveys, you must create the field names and manually map the fields. This allows you to determine if questions from two or more surveys should be mapped to the same field. As a result, the dashboard configuration will be most efficient if you add your longest survey to the data mapper first.
When considering how to structure your survey mapping with the data mapper, one field, or row in the data mapper, will serve as a source that can be used on the dashboard. You must map survey items on the same row to merge questions from different surveys so you are able to report on the data in the aggregate in the same widget. If you hope to report on metrics from surveys independently from each other, map the fields in separate rows.
While the data mapper is largely accurate in determining field type, there are examples in which you’ll need to adjust the field type for a survey question or embedded data. For example, if your survey includes a question asking participants to rate their overall experience, Qualtrics will likely automatically set the field type as a Text Set field type. However, if you are interested in numerical calculations related to the overall experience, you will want to switch the field type to a Number Set field type. Alternatively, you can create an entirely new field with the Number Set field type and the question mapped. In this case, the same question would be mapped to two fields on the dashboard. This is useful in cases where you would like to report on the same question as both a categorical variable and using a numerical calculation.
Qualtrics automatically assigns Recode Values, or numerical coded values, to each answer choice for a survey item. These can be adjusted directly in the survey, or they can be adjusted in the data mapper. This is useful if an item has a negative scale and needs to be reverse coded, for example.
For more flexibility when looking at results across several similar questions from the same survey, which by default have data in separate columns in the data spreadsheet, you can consider combining the survey items into a field group. For instance, several multiple choice questions or one matrix type question asking a respondent to rate their experience with food and drinks, seating, parking, and another item rating the content of a performance on the same scale, such as a five-point satisfaction scale, can be grouped into a Measure Group with the Number Set field type. Similarly, the Drill Down Group is a field group type that can be used for hierarchical information, such as all of the cities within a region. Generic Group helps with the organization in your data mapper (like folders).
The data mapper can be adjusted at any point once the dashboard has been created, but it is a best practice to finalize configuration as much as possible prior to starting to configure the widgets. Each time the data mapper is saved, it will recache, causing all dashboard widgets to reload and recache as well. Depending on the number of responses to the survey, this can be a long process.
When making changes to the data mapper, here are some best practices to follow:
* Make changes to live dashboards during off-hours, when the dashboard won’t be used actively whenever possible
* Add a Rich Text Editor Widget to the top of the first dashboard page to notify users that the dashboard is undergoing maintenance
For further details, visit the data mapper support page. 
Understanding Dashboard Widgets Capabilities 
Widgets are graphs or tables that visualize responses to survey questions, Embedded Data, and derived data (e.g. scores). There are a wide variety of CX widgets available in Qualtrics CX dashboards and each widget has a unique set of capabilities to allow you to create dashboards that are customized to your customer’s needs.
The Simple Chart Widget, for example, can be used to create a bar or line chart based on survey data. It is often used to look at how KPIs have trended over time. The Gauge Chart Widget is commonly used to look at the percentage of respondent satisfaction using a top box metric.
All dashboard widgets are populated with data from surveys, tickets, distributions, or Embedded Data fields. Qualtrics dashboards convert these data sources into a common set of dashboard fields. As part of this conversion, each question or Embedded Data field is assigned a field type. The field type determines how the data is structured. Field types include: 
* Text Value
* Text Set
* Open Text
* Numeric Value
* Number Set
* Date
Data can be structured as a text set, which is a discrete picklist such as you might use in a question asking respondents to select how they contacted your call center (Email, Phone, Chat, Other). Alternatively, it can be structured as a number set and used to calculate a metric like overall satisfaction or NPS. The Text Value and Text Set (and Numeric Value and Number Set) field types are easily misconfigured. If you find that data of a particular widget isn’t coming through as you expected, check if you need to change the data mapping from Text Value to Text Set, or vice versa (same with Numeric Value and Number Set). 
Most widgets are only compatible with a specific field type. You can expect a Gauge Chart Widget to calculate the NPS score using the Number Set field type. However, if you have a follow-up question seeking a response to the reason for whatever rating a participant provides, you’d have to consider another widget to get a closer look at why the NPS score is the way it is. For instance, you can add a Word Cloud Widget using the Open Text field type to see the most frequently used words, or a Response Ticker Widget, also using the Open Text field type, to read the comments in entirety.
Customers are often interested in rolling calculations. Only Simple Chart Widgets and Simple Tables Widgets are compatible with this request, as these are the only widgets that allow dashboard users to calculate a metric and view the metric across a given time frame. 
Having a clear understanding of widget capabilities and field types, as well as what question types they are most compatible with, will help you design your surveys with the end report in mind.
For further details on widget types, as well as for instructions for configuring individual widgets and additional explanations of dashboard field types, check out the support pages on CX Dashboard Widgets. 
Understanding Advanced Dashboard Features
In addition to standard dashboard features like widgets, pages, and access, Quatrics also has some advanced features that customers use to accomplish their reporting and analytics needs. You should be aware of these features and their basic functionalities.
As organizations grow in size and their needs become more complex, you will see aspects of these features come more and more into play. If an implementation arises requiring knowledge of these features, you can research the most up-to-date information on our support pages and test configurations in your partner sandbox account. The most common advanced features you will face in regards to dashboards will be the following: 
* Action Planning
* Response Weighting
* Custom Metrics
* Text iQ
Action Planning is a way for dashboard users to create and track actions based on initiatives identified by a company to reach its goals. You can assign tasks and plan resolutions to issues identified from the dashboard reporting or external sources. The dashboard becomes the one-stop-shop for both reporting and tracking changes identified from those reports.
For example, if a dashboard identified that a particular region was struggling in regards to its customer satisfaction with branch employee interactions, a regional vice president could create an action plan for retraining branch employees and giving managers coaching tools to help their branch satisfaction go up. You can read more on action planning in CX on our support pages.
On the other hand, Custom Metrics and Text iQ allow for more detailed reporting on these dashboards. Custom metrics allow a dashboard builder to create metric equations using math symbols and the metrics of either a single data field or multiple data fields. This is important because you can create a single custom metric that can be used in a widget, which pulls in data from various data fields from the settings of a single dashboard.
Customers generally use custom metrics to report on specific equations or comparisons they have previously identified are needed in their reporting. When designing a dashboard, you want to build and test these metrics upfront, as in some instances, additional configuration may be needed in the survey flow to get the data into the right format. Work with your customers early to identify these custom needs so that you have adequate time to build and test for desired functionality, not only for the metric but also for the widgets where you will utilize the metric for visual reporting as well. You can read more about how to configure custom metrics on our support pages.
Text iQ is the Qualtrics product centered around verbatim text analysis. Many customers will want to pull in their topic and sentiment analysis from Text iQ into their dashboards so that users can have all their reporting and analysis in one place.
There are a variety of widgets available for Text iQ, so during your design process, you should have a discussion around which users would want to see Text iQ outputs in the dashboard and what the best widgets are to fit their needs. You can read more about general Text iQ functionality or how to implement it on dashboards on our support page. As a Technology Consultant, you will not need to have advanced knowledge of Text iQ, but you should be able to explain basic functionality and use cases to customers at a high level.
We will cover response weighting on the next page.
Designing Response Weighting
Response weighting is one of the more complex advanced features you will encounter during implementation. Response weighting allows you to establish alternate weightings for your dashboard data so that your dashboards are based on the desired distribution rather than the actual distribution. This allows customers to correct their data for under-surveyed populations that they want to represent appropriately. Qualtrics will automatically determine how to weigh each response and correct widgets as new data comes in.
In most instances where complex response weighting is involved, an XM Scientist will be involved to work with the customer on the overall design for how they wish to weigh and to determine if this meets best practices. Your job is to ensure that the platform capabilities support the weighting approach they recommend. If you’d like to learn more about setting up or configuring response weighting in the platform, you can read our support pages.
A design consideration you should keep in mind when implementing response weighting is that if a customer wishes to weigh on more than three variables (for example, age, gender, region, and education level), you will need to utilize the Survey Flow to create a weighting field to aggregate or build the variable for each response. This is because the current platform only allows you to select three fields to weigh on. Using an Embedded Data field mitigates this limitation. Discuss with your customer upfront how many fields they would like to add on and the precise rules for assigning the weighting categories. You can use a section of the Experience Design document to outline these decisions.




Steps to Build a Dashboard
The work of building a dashboard starts when you start building your survey. As you’re selecting your survey items, select the items that will be compatible with your intended dashboard report.
You will generally follow these steps when building a dashboard:
1. Review the dashboard wireframe with the customer and confirm sign-off. Ensure you understand their objectives, desired visualizations, and metrics. Review the list of dashboard roles and discuss:
   1. What is the customer’s objective in their data visualizations?
   2. What stakeholders should be dashboard viewers? Frontline employees, business leaders, or operations team members? How should data be restricted based on the persona? What are the key metrics? What metrics are expected to be standalone,
   3. filterable, and cross-evaluated over time-frames or another metric (data field)?
2. Review the survey build to ensure it includes the relevant questions and Embedded Data fields based on the knowledge from the first step.
3. Generate test data if the survey is not collecting responses already.
4. Create a blank CX Dashboard Project.
5. Add the survey Data Source(s) to the project.
6. Create a blank dashboard within the dashboard project.
7. Map the survey(s) to the blank dashboard.
8. Configure the dashboard options, including the dashboard Theme and export functionality.
9. Configure the dashboard layout: add Pages, Widgets, and Filters.


Overview of the Impact of Permissions
To have a successful implementation, it is key that you have a coordinated approach for setting permissions for surveys, data, and overall access. Especially with larger organizations, customers engage with Qualtrics implementations across multiple lines of business with specific access and permissioning needs. For this reason, you must be able to understand and help customers protect their lines of business and respondent data. This is accomplished by using a combination of user types/permissions and using data restrictions across the platform.
In regards to their power and impact, user types generally appear in three main categories:
* User impact: The ability they have to create, manage, or remove other users.
* Survey impact: The ability they have to create, edit, distribute, and access raw data.
* Data impact: The ability they have to view, edit, export, or delete data.
In addition to using out-of-the-box user types to group these categories (such as Brand Admins, Standard Users, or Participants), it is important to discuss with the customer which type of power or access an individual or group of users needs before prescribing any access.
In addition to these three key impacts, you must also be mindful of how different features and functionalities are used to further silo and protect data from others. For example, if you have a specific individual user who needs access to dashboards with restricted data but also needs access to Text iQ to configure topics, you will need to identify a user type and toggle specific permissions for Text iQ to make this possible.
Overview of Data Restrictions
Across industries, privacy and security are of utmost importance. Some industries have regulations through formal acts; For example, the US healthcare industry has the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (HIPAA) that sets privacy standards for patient medical records and health information. On the other hand, some industries align to sets of formal and informal industry best practices and standards in order to protect customer data.
Due to this need for security and prescription of data visibility, Qualtrics has created multiple ways to protect and restrict data for different types of users. The two main locations where these data restrictions come into play are:
* When users access the raw data from the Data & Analysis tab
* When dashboard users access a specific page on a dashboard that has been restricted based on user attributes
In dashboards, data restriction is slightly different than surveys, as customers usually have larger groups of users who need to access different pages and cuts of data. These permissions are established by sharing the dashboard with an individual or role and then setting specific data restrictions. These restrictions can be based on questions from the survey, metadata, or embedded data that matches a static value or user attributes specified beforehand.
Back to the insurance company example, say your customer has identified that for one dashboard, two users need different access levels:
1. Shaun Kang, a Vice President of Claims Processing, must only see data that is tagged with the Embedded Data field “Claims Processing” when it equals “1”.
2. John Roo, the current Texas Regional Manager, must only see data that is tagged with the Embedded Data field “Region” when equal to “TX”. 
To establish these access levels, you must ensure that the appropriate embedded data fields are included in the Survey Flow and that their values correspond with the data restriction values required (i.e., “Region” must contain “TX” and not “Texas”). The formal steps to configure dashboard data restrictions can be found on our support pages.
Understanding CX Dashboards Roles
Roles allow customers to determine which users have access to specific dashboards and to easily manage their permissions on a larger scale. Instead of individually granting permissions to individuals, you can add large groups to a role and then allow them access to a dashboard with specific data restriction permissions. In some instances, users may be added to multiple roles on the same dashboard, which will combine the roles and access to provide them with the most information possible.
For example, if John Roo is accidentally added to both the Executive role (full data view) and the Regional Manager role (restricted view based on region) on a single dashboard, he will be able to view the full data set. It is important to communicate this with customers to ensure that no one is accidentally added to multiple roles and, thus, exposed to more data than they should be.
Users can be manually or automatically added to roles. Enterprise customers generally use the automatic role enrollment option in combination with user attributes that are either uploaded using bulk user management or passed over via SSO.
To configure your settings for manual or automatic enrollment preferences, refer to our support pages. 
Once roles are configured and attributes are appended to each user for a particular dashboard, you can use them to configure data restrictions and populate role-based filters on your dashboard. In addition, some organizations will use these same roles for ticket teams or groups of individuals who are assigned to triage or complete tickets.
Restricting Data Based on User Attributes
The most common way to restrict access to dashboards is by using user attributes. User Attributes, or metadata, is a way to add additional information beyond name and email to a CX Dashboards user’s account. This allows you to configure access for multiple roles and users on one dashboard page instead of building and permissioning separate pages for each role. User attributes are also used for automatic role enrollment. 
There are two main phases for data restriction based on user attributes: 
* Designing the page-level data restriction based on the data available in the survey
* Ensuring the data is available for any role-based filters
Designing the data needed to restrict a page will generally also affect their access across the entire dashboard. Most organizations identify a set level that a role should have access to. For example, regional vice presidents should be able to view only their region’s data and top-level KPI information. To restrict data in this way, we would need to identify a variable to restrict their region on, such as “RegionVPEmplyeeID”. Once we have identified the field from the survey that we can restrict it off of, we need to identify a user attribute field to match up with the survey field. For example, User A has the user attribute "Region". Therefore, when data restrictions are set in the Role, User A will only see responses where "RegionVPEmplyeeID" value matches User A's "Region" value.
When planning out role-based filters, we can take the same approach on the user list by identifying the needed fields. It is important to check the configuration of any role-based filters to ensure that role-specific filters don’t affect other roles’ access and that edge cases (such as missing data) are tested. It is important to specify if a filter should be populated, what level it should filter to, and how the dashboard will display if data is missing or incorrect. For example, if regional vice presidents should see only their region’s data but they have a drill down filter to show them top-level data in their region, how does the dashboard display? Does it show all data at once? If the field is misspelled, does it display all data across regions?
Using SSO With CX Dashboards
SSO is a key component of many enterprise programs. It allows quick access to the platform and easy user management regarding dashboards. When set up correctly, it protects customers’ access and control of the Qualtrics platform while providing flexible user management. When it comes to dashboard access, SSO can be used for standalone access or in conjunction with a user access list. This depends entirely on what information is available via the SSO configuration.
For example, if a customer using SSO wants to restrict the dashboard based on a user's employee ID and that ID is available via SSO as an additional field, then no additional attributes would need to be uploaded via the user access list. But if that same customer determined that a specific role also should be restricted from the region code associated with their region and that data was not available via SSO, then you would need to craft and upload a user access list to add that data to their Qualtrics profile.
In both instances, it is important to work with the customer’s SSO team early to determine what is or is not available. When you have identified the need for a user access list, someone at the customer's organization will need to be trained to upload the list so that the customer can set a long-term strategy for user attribute enhancement. This ensures that as employees move around the organization, their data in the Qualtrics platform is always up-to-date. Depending on the changes the customer expects to see, you can talk them through setting a user access list strategy that identifies the roles and the cadence at which updates should be made.
When SSO is enabled in a brand that has CX Dashboards, the following may be affected:
* Manual user creation
* CSV import user creation
* Qualtrics API user creation
* Self-enrollment user creation
* Automatic role enrollment
* User attributes
* Account access
* Dashboard access
It is important to know the settings and potential impacts your customers will face when using SSO. You can find more information on our support pages and/or submit materials to the Qualtrics SSO Implementation team.
Dashboard Permission Configuration
Once a user access list is designed or SSO attributes are able to be passed for data restriction, it's time for configuration in the Qualtrics platform. This is done by uploading the user access list into the Qualtrics platform, then configuring roles, access, and data restrictions. For these steps, you and your customers will need to use the User Admin tab in the dashboard project, and you must have a brand administrator user account to access the tab.
There are four key steps in configuring dashboard permissions:
Step 1: Upload the user list 
To upload a user list, you must make sure that a few key fields are formatted correctly to ensure the right user accounts are updated. These fields are:
* Email
* FirstName
* LastName
* Username (this will be the username that is associated with the user account)
You will need these four fields for every user, whether manually adding/updating or using a file. For step-by-step instructions on how to upload users, you can read our support pages.
Step 2: Configure the roles 
When creating roles, there are a few key steps to follow. Firstly, you must create the role before adding any users. This provides a placeholder to hold the users and determine access.
Step 3: Add users to roles 
Users will be added via automatic role enrollment. If you are not using automatic role enrollment, you can manually add users to the roles you created in the previous step.
Automatic role enrollment is used in the majority of enterprise programs to automate the adding of users to a role and, thus, access to a dashboard. To configure automatic role enrollment, you will need to identify the variable that specifies the role they should be added to. This variable and corresponding value are the logic that puts them into the proper role. Generally, this field is specified on the user access list template so that it is clear where the role comes from.
You should be very intentional with how you name this variable and its values. For example, if you name the field Role and the values are Sales and Marketing and have global teams that will access different dashboards, you will want to specify if they were French_Sales or German_Sales so that you provide access to the right team. The variable and value can either be passed via the user access list or from an SSO variable specified in their SSO configuration. Visit our support pages for detailed instructions and screenshots.
Step 4: Configure the dashboard permissions 
The following dashboard permissions can be configured:
* Activate the dashboard: This allows the user to access the dashboard.
* Restrict data: Specifies what responses the dashboard user has access to within the dashboard. 
* Restrict page permissions: Restricts the user from seeing all pages of the dashboard.
* Export dashboard images (JPG, PDF): This allows the users in the role to export widgets or the full dashboard as JPG or PDF images. 
* Export the dashboard: This allows the users in the role to export widgets or the full dashboard as a CSV or TSV of data. 
* Edit the dashboard: This allows the user to edit widgets, filters, and the Settings tab of the dashboard. 
Sharing the Dashboard
Dashboards can be shared via any of the following three methods:
* By exporting the data (PDF, JPG, PNG, or CSV format)
* By adding CX Dashboard viewers (direct login)
   * Optional: access emails can be sent to dashboard users with login credentials
* By setting up a recurring or one-time email with the dashboard's data
The CX Dashboard viewers (direct login) option is only available for those who have an account on the license. This can be enabled for a user or an entire Role. The access can be limited to View, Export (JPG, PDF), Export (all formats), and Edit. Data Restrictions and Page Access can’t be altered for users with Edit permissions, where the default is no data restrictions and access to all pages.
To share a dashboard with users in a Role via direct login:
1. Create a Role
2. Prepare the list of users in a CSV spreadsheet, including columns specifying their user attributes
3. Add users to the Role via upload (Note: Only brand administrators can access User Admin to complete this upload)
4. Configure the permissions for the Role
   1. The pages the users should be able to access
   2. The cut of data the users should see, dynamically based on user attributes
   3. Activate the Role
5. Draft a dashboard access email, including login instructions and dashboard link
6. Send the email to the Role inviting users to access the dashboard




Website Feedback
What Is Website & App Feedback?
Website & App Feedback projects are a way to collect experience data from digital interactions, including website and mobile app touchpoints. While many other software applications collect data about how your customers are interacting with your website or mobile app (operational data), businesses will better understand how their customers are making decisions by analyzing operational data alongside experience data.
Website & App Feedback projects are comprised of the following components:
* Creative: The visualization for deploying the survey.
* Target: The survey or other URL nested within the creative.
* Intercept: The logic dictating how to deploy the creative and corresponding target. Each project can have multiple intercepts. 
Because these projects require adding a snippet of code to your customer’s website or app, it is important that you engage with the resources at your customer’s organization who have access early on. Typically these are individuals on an IT team, Web Content team, etc.
When establishing a new digital feedback program, it is important to map key customer digital journeys during the site visit with your customer. After considering the goals of a site visit, select journeys your customer hopes to better understand and eventually optimize through collecting customer feedback. The scale of the digital feedback program is usually dictated by the customer’s resources and budget, with the goal to disrupt website transactions as little as possible in the pursuit of feedback.
Note: The rest of this lesson focuses on Website Feedback projects. If you are interested in learning about collecting feedback on a mobile app (also known as our Mobile App SDK), check out the Mobile App Feedback Project support page.
Active vs. Passive Approach for Engagement
When designing a digital feedback program, you’ll want to consider if you want to use an active or passive approach for engagement, or a mix of the two. 
Active Approach 
An active approach is where you “intercept” site visitors to ask for feedback, usually triggered when a certain set of conditions are met, such as a customer navigating away from your website when there are items still in their cart. This approach is the preferred way to get a representative sample audience within the journey. However, if not done correctly, it can disrupt the website user’s experience on the site, even preventing them from reaching their end goal by providing an unwanted hurdle. 
Passive Approach 
A passive approach is where the feedback mechanism is ever-present on the website, such as a feedback button. This approach is better for the website user’s experience but is usually not representative since the respondent has to opt-in. Because of this, you are likely to receive feedback from respondents with very strong feelings about their experience on the site. Feedback from passive approaches tends to be more negative and have much lower engagement rates compared to active approaches. 
As you iterate on your program, you can escalate from discrete to indiscrete approaches based on areas where data isn’t as rich as you’d hoped. If you can be discreet, and still get the amount of data you need, then you are optimizing for the website user’s experience. However, if you find that you are not getting enough solid input, then you can turn up the dial on your engagement and move towards a more active approach.
Preparing the Target
The first step in implementing a Website Feedback project is to decide what to use as the target. This is typically a Qualtrics survey, but you can also have a website URL or have no target instead. Here are the common use cases for each:
* Qualtrics Survey: Used to collect experience feedback data. 
* Website URL: Used to link to a page that their creative is referring to (e.g. their customer support page) or if they are using a 3rd party vendor for surveying. 
* No Target (Rare): Mainly used if the creative is used for a reminder or alert.
Note: The rest of this page will discuss how to prepare a Qualtrics survey as the target. 
When designing the survey, keep in mind that it is best practice to keep the survey as short as possible. Focus on the most important questions to get key insights without annoying your visitors with pointless questions. Having 3-5 questions is best practice. However, overall site experience surveys may be a bit longer, but still should only be 8-10 questions max. Common Website Feedback questions include:
* NPS (Net Promoter Score): For example, “On a scale from 0-10, based on your experience today, how likely are you to recommend our website to a friend or colleague?”
* Purpose of Visit: For example, “What was the primary purpose of your visit to our website today?”
* Intent to Convert: For example, “How willing would you be to make a purchase from this website?”
* Open Feedback: For example, “What suggestions would you provide to improve your experience today?”
When building the survey, you will usually want to ​​add a page break between each question. You want to avoid making the respondent scroll when taking the survey. This also allows the survey to fit better within the creative. 
Lastly, use embedded data in the survey where possible. Not only will it help enhance the survey response with a lot of background data, but any data you can collect is a question you don’t have to ask directly in the survey. Embedded data is commonly used to capture session information (such as Site History, Total Page Count, Current Page URL) and Adobe Analytics (unique information about the visitor), as well as data directly from the webpage, such as HTML to pull in how many items are in their cart. It is also common to capture embedded data from Javascript because this allows customers to create specific fields and values on their page (i.e. specific activity the customer was doing on the page) and pass them into Qualtrics. 
Designing the Creative Appearance 
Within a Website & App Feedback project, there are many different types of creatives that you can use to display your intercept. When deciding which one to use, be sure to pick one that matches your customer’s use case, keeping in mind how active or passive the experience should be. See the table below for information on each creative type.
* Active creatives
Pop Over
Pop Under
Responsive Dialog
Slider
Mobile App Prompt (mobile app)
Mobile Notification (mobile app)
  Passive creatives
Feedback Button
Info Bar
Embedded Link (embedded onto site)
Custom HTML (embedded onto site)
When designing a creative, be sure to keep in mind the experience for different device sizes. The Responsive Dialog creative automatically adjusts based on the device it is seen on. Or, you can build separate creatives for desktop and mobile screens and display them using Screen Resolution targeting logic. You can read more about making creatives mobile-optimized here. 
In terms of accessibility, the Responsive Dialog and Feedback Button creatives are the most accessible creatives. However, they do not allow many customizations so if your customer requires certain customizations you may need to go with a different creative type. You can read more about Website Feedback accessibility here. 
Beyond the basics of the creative, there are many options when it comes to editing the appearance. Here are some best practices to keep in mind when customizing the creative:
* Use your customer’s colors and branding to make it look like their website and improve the respondent experience. Most customers need to involve their web design team in the design to ensure they adhere to organizational branding standards. Be sure to reach out to this team as soon as possible to secure their resources and approval. 
* Embedding the target in the creative can help improve response rates, as respondents can see exactly what is being asked of them and understand how long the survey will take.
* Standard placement of the creative elements can help the respondent understand what is expected of them. For example, close buttons usually are on the right-hand side of an overlay window. Building it there is what is typically expected. You don’t want to frustrate your respondents with a close button that can’t be found.
No matter which creative you choose, you will want to make sure that you test the creative on the customer’s website as early as possible to ensure that the chosen creative is compatible with their website (methods for testing will be described later on). Certain creatives, especially embedded ones, may behave unexpectedly so you will want to make sure that it’s compatible early in the process to avoid any delays. 
Beyond visual customization, you can also customize how the creative behaves, such as where it’s positioned or how it appears onto the screen. You’ll learn more about this on the next page. 
Customizing the Creative Behavior
While you can use intercept logic to customize when the creative appears, creative options (such as timing and position) can be used to enhance the experience for website users. Especially when using an active creative type, timing can be used to create a less jarring experience for users. The specific options available will vary depending on the type of creative you are using.
For active creative types, consider adding a delay of a few seconds to give the visitor a chance to orient themselves instead of displaying the creative immediately after the page loads. Keep in mind that if your intercept is also using timing logic (such as Time Spent or Focused on Site), the creative timing will take effect after the intercept logic has been met. For example, if your creative is set to display after 10 seconds and your intercept condition is set to display after they’ve been on the site for 30 seconds, once the visitor has been on the website for more than 30 seconds, the creative will appear 10 seconds after a new page is loaded (or the current page is reloaded).
Similarly, there are also certain considerations to be made when using the Close After timing option. It is never recommended to use this option if your creative has an Embedded Target, as you risk closing the creative while the visitor is still responding. For creative types such as Info Bars and Sliders, using the Close After option is useful in cases where you only want to display the creative for a certain amount of time or don’t want to cover up other content on the website for the total duration of their visit.
In addition to timing, another best practice to consider is the positioning and overall display for active creatives. In certain instances where you want to be as active as possible, displaying the creative front and center and utilizing a dark background is effective. However, in other cases where you want to be active but also want to avoid interrupting the visitor, there are creative display options you can utilize. For example, to provide a less intrusive experience, displaying a Pop Over creative in the bottom corner of the screen allows the user to continue their task within the screen. In this sense, you are still activating the visitor targeting, but they can easily continue with their task without any blockers.
Beyond making sure that the visual appearance of your creative is configured to your desired presentation, you also want to ensure it is accessible by all different types of users— not only in terms of devices but languages as well. A couple of the creative types have a built-in translation feature found in the Creative options, whereas others will need to be manually configured by making multiple creatives and action sets for each language. Especially for websites available globally, it is essential to have your creative available in the visitor’s native language to be able to collect feedback from every visitor that is sampled. Additionally, be sure to utilize the Website Accessibility features listed to make your creative available to those using a screen reader.
As you can see, there are many ways to customize the creative. As always, you’ll want to design what works best for your customer’s use case. You can even do A/B testing to see what version is preferred by website visitors. A/B tests can be created within the intercept setup to test different creatives. The A/B testing works by linking different creatives to different action sets and then randomizing those action sets to evenly present the different creatives. From there, you can determine which option led to higher click-through rates, satisfaction, etc. Simply changing the text on the creative can lead to drastic improvements in response rates. You can refer to this support page for more information on A/B testing in website feedback.
Setting Up the Intercept
Intercepts are used to define what target your creative should link to, and the conditions under which the creative should appear on the website. You can configure an intercept to appear based on the visitor’s current URL, time spent on the website, location, device type, cookie value, etc. You can read about all of the different conditions that you can use here. 
Note: Not all customers will be able to utilize cookies. Especially in the EMEA region, many companies will have restrictions due to GDPR. 
The conditions, also referred to as logic, can be applied at the level of the entire intercept, or more dynamically using action sets. For example, if you have different creatives that you want to appear under different conditions, you can use action sets to achieve that. The Advanced Options for action sets allow you to customize the display of the action sets even further. Keep in mind that website visitors will see the first action set that applies to them, so order the action sets based on the priority of the website visitor having that action triggered.
For intercepts with the goal of gathering overall feedback, you want to use Time Spent on Site logic to trigger the intercept after the website visitor has spent enough time on the site to give meaningful feedback. To determine when this is, we suggest referencing your customer’s operational metrics to understand the average length of time spent on the site. We recommend that you trigger the intercept after two-thirds of the average time. 
In terms of what pages to trigger the intercept on, this will depend on your customer’s use case and the journeys they are trying to target. However, the website visitor’s experience should always be top of mind. It’s best to avoid presenting the feedback invitation on the first page of the visitor’s site experience, on important landing pages (e.g., the homepage), or transactional pages (e.g., the shopping cart or checkout page).
When configuring the intercept, there are many different display options for sampling and randomization that you can configure to even further customize when the intercept is triggered. Oversampling will negatively affect your website traffic, but finding the right sampling rate is dependent on your customer’s program goals. Using Prevent Repeated Display and Intercept Logic will help to ensure website visitors who have already received an intercept don’t see it again. If your customer is using XM Directory, you can also set up Contact Frequency Rules for Digital Intercepts. You should iterate on the sampling rate based on how many responses are being collected, the quality of the data, and an analysis of website traffic. 
Capturing Embedded Data
While establishing action sets and logic for your intercepts, you should also be sure to capture website information as embedded data. Not only will it help enhance reporting, but any data you can collect is a question you don’t have to ask directly in the survey. You can do this within the intercept or the creative. 
Tip: Don’t forget to also add the embedded data to the survey flow of your target survey in order to save it. If you forget to do this before deploying your survey, you can retroactively add it in if you had set up the embedded data in the Website Feedback project beforehand. 
Recommended embedded data elements to capture from the website include: 
* Site History
* Current URL
* Page Name
* Time Spent on Site
* Total Page Visited Count
* Device Type (using Action Sets)
* IP Address (in the Survey Flow)
* Meta Info (in the Survey Flow)
Your customer’s operational metrics can also come into play here. Demographic and customer information may reveal key trends between customer segments. As far as what information is accessible on the site, you will need to work with the customer and their web development team to determine what website data is available to be passed over as embedded data. Especially for use cases such as a retail website where you may be targeting visitors who are abandoning the items in their cart, understanding how many items were in their cart, what the items were, how they were priced, etc. can enhance your analysis for determining trends and next steps. 
Using Extensions
Mature digital experience research programs bring together X-data and O-data to leverage a holistic view of the customer experiences. When you are able to see X-data and O-data in one place, the genuine voice of the customer really comes to life.
The X-data you gather on your customer’s overall website experience is a perfect place to start—and when you combine it with O-data from your customer’s web analytics and/or session replay data to get a more detailed understanding of their issue, it’s even more powerful.
Web Analytics 
In addition to the data collected by your respondent and operational data from the website, we also recommend connecting to a web analytics platform, such as Google Analytics and Adobe Analytics. Variables (such as eVars, props, and events) can be used to customize the invitation window, as well as when it appears on the website.
Additionally, you can pass web analytics data into Qualtrics to better analyze relationships between key metrics (e.g., SAT, Ease of Use, etc.) and operational website data. The true power of Experience Management comes from the capacity to connect X-data and O-data, which will generate richer, more actionable insights.
Session Replay 
Session Replay is a valuable resource you can use to determine exactly what your customer’s website visitors are seeing. These integrations typically capture a video of the visitor’s experience, including a view of all pages seen, errors that occur, accurate website loading time, etc.
The ability to connect these attributes with an understanding of the customer’s emotion will provide clarity around the best next steps for improving the digital experience. You can do this in Qualtrics through integrations with Decibel, ClickTale, Quantum Metric, Full Story, and more. Typically, you’ll capture the cookie with the Session Replay User ID. You then use that ID, along with dynamic Piped Text, to recreate a replay link. That link is then available on the individual response, in the dashboard, as well as on any ticketing or follow-up being used.
Other Advanced Features
Website Feedback projects are some of the most customizable projects that Qualtrics has to offer. While you don’t need to be an expert in every single aspect of Website Feedback, you should be aware of all of the ways in which you can use and customize the product to collect digital feedback. 
Here is a high-level overview of other, more advanced, features that won’t be covered in full detail in this training: 
* Mobile App Feedback Projects: Allow you to use feedback projects within mobile apps. These projects can be more technical since they require an integration with the Qualtrics Mobile App SDK.
* Single Page Application: If your customer’s website uses a Single Page Application (SPA), you can use the technique described on the linked page to enable the deployment code to function on the SPA site seamlessly.
* Screen Capture: The screen capture question allows respondents to attach a screenshot of the site they are viewing when taking a survey through Website Feedback.
* XM Directory Contact Frequency Rules for Digital Intercepts: If your customer is using XM Directory, they can establish contact frequency rules for digital intercepts to enable cross-browser and cross-device contact frequency control. 
* XM Directory Segments for Digital Intercept Targeting: If your customer is using XM Directory, this feature allows them to target the display of website and app intercepts to specific segments of users, as well as obtain segment- and journey-specific insights.
Testing Your Intercept
Once you've built the intercept and are ready to test, you'll want to get the customer's IT Team involved. We recommend doing this as early as possible to ensure a timely launch, even if the Website Feedback project isn't fully built yet. 


Testing 
If the customer’s web development team has a development (testing) website in addition to their production website, you can have them add the editing version of the project deployment code to their development website. This way, you can test new creatives and intercepts in a “real” environment without the risk of publishing it to the production website prematurely. However, not every customer will have this and it requires additional time from their web development team.
Note: When using the editing version of the deployment code, you will need to specify which intercepts are run in the Project Testing Setup within the Project Options tab. 
Testing with the editing version of the deployment code will show all of the content that is built within the account on the development environment, allowing for quick and easy testing and revisions. However, make sure not to publish the intercept while testing. As soon as the intercept is published, it will show up on the production website if the production code has already been added there.
Qualtrics also offers a built-in testing tool called the bookmarklet tool, which is a quick and easy way to test your intercept. This allows you to preview what your intercept will look like on any website you desire. 
In terms of testing on a mobile device, saving the bookmarklet to a mobile browser is possible, but a bit tricky given that you can’t just drag the bookmarklet tool to your bookmark bar. The process involves sending the bookmarklet code to your mobile device and saving it from there. You can read more about the process here. 


Troubleshooting
You may run into a situation where the bookmarklet tool is not displaying the creative as expected or showing the creative when it shouldn’t be seen. Take advantage of the troubleshooting box that appears in the bottom left-hand corner of the page when using the bookmarklet tool. This box should explain whether or not the intercept met the specified conditions and was appropriately displayed. If this box did not appear, you likely tried this bookmark on a page with no URL, or you have not published and activated your intercept while using the published testing bookmark.
Deploying Your Intercept
Once you’ve completed the testing phase, it’s time to add the deployment code onto the customer’s production website. This involves sending the published version of the deployment code to the customer’s web development team and having them place it on the website. 
Keep in mind that most customers have a pre-defined release cadence for their websites, often monthly. Publishing Website/App Feedback code must fit within this cycle. Discuss this release cycle with your customer’s web development team so you can accurately anticipate when the code can be deployed.
If customers use multiple projects, they will have a code snippet for each project. Multiple projects are useful in cases where customers want to deploy intercepts with multiple domains. Each domain should have its own Website Feedback project, which means they each have a unique snippet of code.
The project code can be placed on any page where you may want to display creatives to your visitors. In addition, you will also want to place the code on any pages for which you’d like the Website Feedback project to track or collect information.
For the easiest implementation, we recommend placing the code in a global header or footer, so it loads on all pages of the website. This is the most flexible and useful implementation because it allows you to run intercepts on any page of your site. However, this method will also lead to a higher level of usage, since each time the code runs on a page it will be considered a page view. Be sure to check that your license will accommodate this volume of usage.
One primary benefit of Website Feedback is that once the code is placed on the customer’s website, the customer can make changes to the project without requiring direct website code changes. This can dramatically reduce the time and effort required by the customer's website development team and empower customers to actively iterate on their project to collect the best data possible. The only time they would need to change the website code is if they create a new project, or change the deployment code sampling rate setting since that does modify a portion of the code. 
Using Tag Managers
If your customer is using a Tag Manager such as Google Tag Manager (GTM), Tealium, Ensighten, Adobe Dynamic Tag Manager (DTM), or Adobe Launch, the project code will be deployed differently. While each Tag Manager may have a different system for adding and organizing tags on a website, at a basic level, the Project Deployment Code will need to be injected into a tag in the Tag Manager.
With most Tag Managers having additional triggers, rules, and conditions, setting this up correctly can be tricky. While it will ultimately be the customer's responsibility to work with their website development team and the tag management software support team to figure out how to best implement the project deployment code within their Tag Manager, you should be familiar with the basic troubleshooting tips. You should be comfortable providing a high-level explanation for how the code needs to be added to the Tag Manager, much like how it is added on a regular website. In both cases, it will still be the customer’s responsibility to add the code. 
How to Handle Security Concerns
Because Website Feedback projects require code to be deployed onto a website, most customer web development teams will have questions about the security of the code and application. You should ensure that you are connected with the customer’s web development team as early in the implementation process as possible so you have adequate time to answer their questions. Most of the questions are addressed during the Qualtrics sales process, but you should be prepared for additional security-related questions. 
One common question is how the deployment code will impact the customer's website, particularly concerning load times. The code runs asynchronously, meaning it is the last thing on the site to load. It should not slow down site load times. Qualtrics averages only about 300 milliseconds to load. Common questions like these can be answered in the Website/App Feedback Technical Documentation, you should send them this right away to help address their questions.
If your customer has additional security-related concerns, connect with the customer’s Qualtrics Account Executive and Customer Success Manager assigned to the customer. They can help answer questions to help the customer feel more comfortable deploying the code and pull in additional help if necessary.










































iQ for Data Analysis 
Using Stats iQ
Stats iQ enables customers to uncover hidden relationships, understand key drivers of behavior, and ask more questions about their data by running quick statistical analyses. With Qualtrics’ industry-leading intelligence engine and point-and-click interface, you can clean data, explore relationships, uncover statistical insights, and create charts in minutes—instead of hours—without any training required.
Stats iQ can be found in two places within Qualtrics: the Survey Platform and CX Dashboards. Using Stats iQ from a dashboard lets you analyze multiple sources for that dashboard; Stats iQ inside a survey cannot integrate different surveys’ data. When working with a customer, utilize the support documentation to help them understand and be able to run each type of analysis.
Though Stats iQ is a flexible tool that can be used however you’d like, we recommend using the following analysis workflow for each workstream:
1. Clean your dataset 
Before starting to perform analyses on Stats iQ, take a look at your existing dataset and clean it up.
* Be sure to keep only variables that are useful for your analysis and hide the others. 
* Rename the variables that will be used to easily recognize what exactly they are once you will be working with them. 
* Ensure that all variables have the correct data type.
2. Think through the question you’d like to answer 
Start by identifying one variable of interest and thinking of questions about that variable, like
* “What drives satisfaction?”
* “How do men differ from women?”
3. Examine the Distribution of the Data (Describe) 
Before running any statistical analyses, it is a good idea to first understand the data you are working with.
* Select some variables that you’re interested in (or just select them all)
* Use the Describe analysis to visualize and summarize your data. 
* Look out for interesting or surprising results, get a feel for distributions and outliers, and think about interesting questions to ask. 
* Note: For more details, visit the Describe support page.
4. Find Relationships (Relate) 
Once you have a good understanding of how your data is distributed, explore the relationships between variables with the Relate analysis option.
* Put the “key” by the variable you’re most interested in, select other variables, then Relate. 
* Stats iQ will run the appropriate statistical test for each relationship, translate the results into plain English, and bring the strongest relationships to the top. 
* Examine the results, noting which variables were and weren’t statistically related to your key variable. 
* Note: For more details, visit the Relate support page.
5. Run Regression 
The above may be enough to surface some very interesting findings, but if you’d like to go further, you can use Regression.
* Keep the key by an output variable (such as “Satisfaction”) and then select possible drivers of that output (such as “Income”). 
* Run a regression to understand which of the drivers are most related to the outcome and how they are related. 
* Note: For more details, visit the Regression support page.


An important part of Stats iQ is workspaces. Think of workspaces like tabs in a spreadsheet—a separate area to keep related analyses. There is no right or wrong number of Workspaces, and you are free to include any analyses you want.
When you open Stats iQ for the first time, a new blank workspace will be created. By default, Workspaces are private to you, even if you share the survey with someone and give them reporting access. However, you can share the Workspace with the same people you’ve provided with access to the survey. Since anyone with whom you share your Workspace can then edit the analysis, you want to ensure that only people who need access or are helping conduct the analysis have access. You can also export workspaces or individual analyses to share your key findings with stakeholders.
Using Text iQ
In addition to finding quantitative relationships, Qualtrics can also help customers determine qualitative relationships. Text iQ allows customers to incorporate the data from open-ended feedback into their strategy for improving the company’s customer experience. Text iQ provides deeper insights into the thoughts and feelings of customers so that they can better understand the needs of their customer base.
In the case of Q-Air, they hope to use Text iQ to identify satisfaction drivers and trigger action based on themes in free-form customer feedback. Since they have multiple surveys that they wish to take action on, it will be important for them to make sure their topics are consistent across all lines of business. One way to do this is by adding topics created in one survey to another by importing topics. Another way includes modifying queries to ensure certain keywords are included or excluded so that the topic contains only applicable comments. The recommended topics are a good starting place for building queries. Keep in mind that you only create topics once you’ve started collecting data.
Once Q-Air has started collecting data and adding topics and sentiment, you will need to help them determine which responses they would like to create a ticket to take action on. Do they want to follow up with customers who are talking about a certain topic? Do they want to follow up with customers who have a negative sentiment in their response? You will likely need to wait until responses have started coming in and topics and sentiments have been added to make this determination. Once Q-Air has identified which customers they would like to target, they can create a ticket task based on the Text iQ conditions.
Thinking about Q-Air’s program as a whole, quantitative metrics like Customer Satisfaction scales and key driver questions are an important part of an actionable Experience Management program. When analyzed in Qualtrics, they are highly accurate predictors of key focus areas that will yield the biggest improvements. By pairing quantitative data with qualitative data from Text iQ, customers will be able to further uncover hidden insights and unlock the “why” behind their quantitative data. One of the best ways to pair this data together is to configure the results from Text iQ into dashboard widgets.
Analyzing text through the dashboard allows you to review multiple sources of data within the same Text iQ analysis and lets you easily incorporate the results of the analysis into the dashboard widgets. Once your text has been analyzed, your customer can easily pull the information into pages on the dashboard. Just like any other dashboard, each stakeholder will want to see different information.
For example, executives from Q-Air will want to know what the big picture is (i.e., the key sources of positive and negative sentiment) and how things are trending (i.e., if they are improving or worsening with the frequency of positive or negative mentions). They may want to know one or two levels down how things compare (e.g., if any specific units or regions see higher-than-normal negative sentiment). They often want to see a sampling of the actual verbatims as well, so having a word cloud and comments ticker available to them is helpful.
Using Predict iQ
Predict iQ is a tool to help customers act on churn prediction data early to improve customer experience and prevent attrition. By using Predict iQ, you can define customer risk thresholds and automatically identify at-risk customers. Moreover, you can use these insights to further understand the drivers of customer churn while also taking immediate action by creating tickets in Qualtrics. Beyond the ability to predict customer behavior with Predict iQ, you can also utilize the full power of Qualtrics iQ by integrating with Text iQ and Stats iQ.
To fully understand the needs of the customer, be sure to ask the following questions at the beginning of the implementation:
* How does the customer define churn? Churn can look different across different industries (e.g., customer cancels subscription).
* What timeline should the customer look at in their dataset? Everybody churns someday. There is no clear-cut answer on the time period to look at, but how far back you look can depend on how common churn is and how often the customer has the potential to churn. This answer may also be dictated by the amount of experience and operational data available. Here are some general guidelines:
   * The less common churn is, the longer we need the time period to be. The model’s effectiveness is strongly driven by how many cases of churn we have, so extending the time period adds more cases and, thus, more effectiveness.
   * Longer time periods require us to throw out more data. If the churn timeline is six months, someone who filled out the survey five months ago can’t be included in our model, since we don’t know if they’ll churn or not. This isn’t a problem if we have five years of data, but it is if we only have five months of data.
   * Most end up in the 3-month or 6-month churn range, though a year wouldn’t be very uncommon.
* Does the customer understand that we cannot guarantee results? It's very possible that the data won't have much signal in it, and it is crucial to set expectations. Predict iQ works best when you have at least 500 respondents who have churned. However, 5,000+ churned respondents will get you the best data.
Oftentimes, a customer will already be collecting experience data and will need to update the file with additional operational and churn data to create the model. The churn variable must be a binary variable (e.g., Yes/No, True/False, etc.). Once the churn variable and other O-data are added to the dataset and you have enough data (at least 500 responses), you can run the Predict iQ analysis. If you are working with a customer who does not have enough responses in their dataset, you can generate test responses to demo how the tool works. Keep in mind that the predictive churn model will take some time to calculate. 
Understanding the Predict iQ Analysis
The following are two widgets that are leveraged in Predict iQ: 
* Prediction Drivers: A chart that indicates the relative strength of the variables in predicting churn
* Prediction Metrics: Metrics that generate the two most important metrics by setting aside 10% of the data and comparing the predictions to what actually happened: precision and recall
   * Precision: The proportion of customers predicted to churn who will actually churn
   * Recall: The proportion of those who actually churned that the model predicted ahead of time would do so


Taking Action
When determining how to use Predict iQ to set up ways to take action and close the loop with customers, start by understanding the customer's needs. Ask questions to find out what existing processes the customer has for churn mitigation.
As new responses come in, predictions will be appended in new columns called "Churn Probability" and "Churn Prediction" on this dataset. The customer can choose to apply the prediction immediately or delay the prediction if additional operational data is brought into the response immediately after a response is submitted.
* Churn Probability: The likelihood to churn in a decimal format. Appears when real-time prediction has been enabled and is based on the threshold set.
* Churn Prediction: A Yes/No variable confirming or denying churn based on the threshold set. Appears when real-time prediction has been enabled.
Based on the prediction, the customer can set up a workflow to trigger a ticket, email, Salesforce update, or other action. Actions taken based on the Predict iQ analysis is where the real customer value will be realized. Overall, the goal of Predict iQ is to help customers implement workflows that maximize efficiency for preventing churn.
For more resources on Predict iQ to share with customers, become familiar with the Qualtrics Predict iQ Support Page.
























Q&A
Qualtrics Platform Essentials (L1)
Lesson 1: 
An organization that is consistently collecting and acting on feedback data to nurture an environment of continuous improvement. 
Which component of the XM Operating Framework is this company trying to strengthen?
* a. Technology 
* b. Culture 
Your Answer 
Culture is defined as the mindsets and beliefs that nurture XM-centric attitudes and behaviors across an organization. The culture of an organization can either accelerate or inhibit the spread of XM competencies. Companies need to foster an environment that encourages XM-centric mindsets and behaviors in their leaders and employees
* c. Competency 
* d. Execution 
Which of these is NOT a key component of the XM Operating Framework?
* a. Culture 
* b. Proficiency 
Your Answer 
The operating framework for XM is based on Culture, Competency and Technology.
* c. Competency 
* d. Technology 
An organization collects data about a future interaction to understand the potential reaction to the interaction. 
What kind of data is being collected? 
* a. Experience Expectations 
Your Answer 
Experience Expectations is how people think and feel about a future interaction with an organization, which can be collected on a regular cycle or periodically.
* b. Ad Hoc Diagnostics 
* c. Relationship Attitudes 
* d. Choice Preferences
_____ is a discipline that is used to deliver improved experiences to different stakeholders across an organization to gain competitive advantage.
* a. Employee Management 
* b. Culture Management 
* c. Customer Management 
* d. Experience Management (XM) 
Your Answer 
As a discipline, XM helps organizations deliver differentiated experiences by continuously listening to feedback, propagating insights, and rapidly adapting to change.
Which of the following is an example of Experience data (X data?)
* a. Loyalty Status 
* b. Mobile Number 
* c. Region 
* d. Overall Satisfaction 
Your Answer 
X data is defined as data that is actively being collected from stakeholders that helps an organization understand experiences.
What is an example of a positive insight organizations can gain from Experience Management?
* a. An organization makes a change after it is suggested by customers 
* b. An organization becomes aware of a strength that they were not aware of and capitalizes on it 
* c. An organization adds new resources that will be beneficial 
* d. All of the above 
Your Answer 
Positive Insights are usually found when an organization collects experience data and finds ways to improve and continue to grow.
A(n) ____ is a moment of truth that affects the human components of your business.
* a. Experience 
Your Answer 
This is how Qualtrics defines an Experience. One example of this would be a customer using a brand new product for the first time.
* b. Gap 
* c. Insight 
* d. Opportunity
Product satisfaction is an example of O data. True or false?
* a. True 
* b. False 
Your Answer 
O Data is data that is collected as part of the normal course of business that does not measure satisfaction. Data such as phone number, email and region are considered O Data.
Which of the following is an example of Operational Data (O-Data)?
* a. Customer ID 
Your Answer 
O Data is data that is collected as part of the normal course of business that does not measure satisfaction or the human element of an experience. Data such as Location, State, Employee ID, Tenure, Region, etc can be considered O Data.
* b. Satisfaction Rating 
* c. Net Promoter Score (NPS) 
* d. Employee Engagement 
lesson 2
An organization identifies issues in their service delivery operations and sets out to write questions that will aid in collecting data related to those issues. This is an example of XM, true or false?
* a. True 
Your Answer 
It is important to make every question in your survey count so that each one of them gives you insight into a potential issue or area of growth.
* b. False 
Each of the choices below is a step in the recommended workflow for creating a survey project. What is the first step you should take?
* a. Setting a survey length 
* b. Setting your research objectives 
Your Answer 
It is important to start out by setting your research objectives because this will help you identify which and how many questions you need to collect the necessary data.
* c. Producing your answer choices 
* d. Planning the order of your questions
Which of the following is NOT an example of a leading question?
* a. Please tell us what you think about the updated product packaging 
Your Answer 
When you are writing questions it is important to stay as neutral as possible so that you can get the most accurate data. You should avoid words such as improved, good, bad, and delicious.
* b. Please tell us what you think is good about our new product packaging 
* c. Please tell us what you think about the new and improved product packaging 
* d. Please tell us what you love about the new product packaging
Which of the following is an example of a well written question statement?
* a. Product X is the most efficient and competent 
* b. Product X offers good value for money and service 
* c. Product X offers good customer service and online services 
* d. Product X offers services for a fair price 
Your Answer 
When creating questions, it is important to only measure one thing at a time and to not use words that tend to over generalize such as "most" and "always".
Survey Length plays an important role in influencing survey completion rates.
* a. True 
Your Answer 
When creating a survey, it is important to make every question count since long surveys can be harder for participants to complete.
* b. False
Which of the following examples of question wording is written according to design best practices?
* a. How satisfied were you with our food and customer service? 
* b. Do you always shop at our store? 
* c. How satisfied were you with the customer support representative? 
Your Answer 
When creating a question, it is important to try to keep the question as neutral as possible by avoiding words such as always, improved, better etc. Additionally, we recommend only asking about one item per question. If you ask about food and customer service for example, it will be hard to know how the participant felt about each individual one.
* d. How satisfied were you with the fast and improved online experience?
Which of the following question-wording is an example of a double barreled question?
* a. Please rate our customer service on their patience 
* b. Please rate our customer service on their efficiency 
* c. Please rate our customer service on friendliness and efficiency 
Your Answer 
Question stems should not ask participants to rate two items in the same question. In this case, it would be best to separate this into two different questions.
* d. Please rate our customer service on their friendliness
lesson 3
Where do you click to activate/deactivate a project? 


* a. 1 
* b. 2 
* c. 3 
* d. 4 
Your Answer 
To activate and deactivate a project you will need to click on the three dots to go to the project's menu.
Where do you click to see all of your folders?


* a. 1 
Your Answer 
To access your folders, including folders with shared projects, you will need to click on the folder icon.
* b. 2 
* c. 3 
* d. 4
A researcher wants to build a survey that she can fully customize. She has created a survey outline to meet her specific research needs. What kind of project should be used?
* a. Importing from a .QSF file 
* b. Create a new blank survey 
Your Answer 
Blank surveys allow you to start your survey from scratch so that you can build it exactly how you would like.
* c. A survey template from her library 
* d. An XM Solution
Which question type below would be most suitable for you to display a set of instructions, an introduction or a consent form in your survey?
* a. Text Entry 
* b. Multiple Choice 
* c. Graphic Question Type 
* d. Descriptive Text 
Your Answer 
This question allows you to add text into your survey in cases where you do not want to as the participant a question along with the text.
Jane wants to collect respondents' email address in a survey. Which question type will allow participants to add this information?
* a. Text Entry 
Your Answer 
This question type allows you to create a blank box in which respondents can enter text.
* b. Side by Side 
* c. Multiple Choice 
* d. Descriptive Text 
True or false: Page breaks can only be added between blocks and not between questions.
* a. True 
* b. False 
Your Answer 
Page breaks can be added between questions. Additionally, when you create a new block, a page break will be automatically added so that each block appears as one page in your survey.
When building questions, what are automatic choices?
* a. Answer choices that are automatically selected when the respondent first sees a question. 
* b. An auto-advance feature, so when respondents click an answer choice they're immediately advanced to the next question in the survey 
* c. A pre-made list that once selected will automatically populate the chosen scale for your question. 
Your Answer 
Automatic choices are helpful when you are creating scale question because they allow you to automatically populate answer choices instead of having to type them out. For example, if you are asking "how much do you agree with the following statement" you can automatically populate answer choices that go from "strongly agree" to "strongly disagree"
* d. Questions that do not allow you to select your own answer choices as they are from the library
Which of the following attributes are true about naming conventions for embedded data? Select all that apply
Correct Answer
* a. Spelling of the field must match the data exactly 
Your Answer 
Embedded data fields are case and syntax sensitive so it is important to keep all spelling consistent across the contact list and survey flow.
* b. It is case and syntax sensitive 
Your Answer 
Embedded data fields are case and syntax sensitive so it is important to keep all spelling consistent across the contact list and survey flow.
* c. Special characters are ignored 
* d. The naming should match the naming used in the contact list 
Your Answer 
Embedded data fields are case and syntax sensitive so it is important to keep all spelling consistent across the contact list and survey flow.
Your Survey Expiration date has passed, but you've still collected a few additional responses after the deadline! What is the most likely reason for this?
* a. You forgot to pause responses collection manually, which overrides your expiration deadline. 
* b. The Partial Completion rules allows respondents to finish surveys after the survey Last Activity. 
Your Answer 
Partial Completion settings will allow participants to finish the survey sessions that they have started within the allotted amount of time.
* c. You must delete all partial responses or they will be open until they have been completed 
* d. You put in the wrong survey expiration date
When is it advisable and/or possible to use Display Logic?
* a. When you need to display questions or content based on respondents answers from previous questions. 
Your Answer 
Display logic allows you to hide questions from some participants and display them to others.
* b. When you need to screen respondents out of your survey based on their answers 
* c. When you’re jumping respondents past (or hiding) a lot of unnecessary questions based on the current question. 
* d. When you need to jump respondents to another block in the survey 
lesson 4
Tom wants to send a survey so that each person receives a unique link for response tracking, but wants to send the email invite from his own internal email platform. Which distribution link type should Tom use?
* a. Personal Link 
Your Answer 
Personal Links help you create a file with a link for each participant so that you can distribute that link to each person however you would prefer.
* b. Email Distribution (individual link) 
* c. Anonymous Link 
* d. QR Code
Allison wants to create a survey to find out if people in her neighborhood would like to have a new park in their area. She wants to post flyers around her neighborhood for people to take the survey, but thinks that having people type out the full survey URL might be challenging. What would be a good alternative for Allison?
* a. SMS Distribution 
* b. Anonymous Link 
* c. Personal Links 
* d. QR Code 
Your Answer 
Use a QR Code to provide access to your survey in printed materials and other image-based collateral.
True or False: Sophia added a question in her survey that asks participants to input their email address and name. However, because she distributed her survey using the anonymous link, none of this data will be recorded.
* a. True 
* b. False 
Your Answer 
The most basic way to distribute a survey is by using the Anonymous Link. This is a URL that is produced with the intention that you share the same survey URL with all respondents. Any personal information that is collected through questions will still appear in your data.
For a Mailing List to import into Qualtrics, which of the following fields MUST be present in the .CSV file?
* a. First Name, Last Name, Email, Phone Number 
* b. First Name, Email, Phone Number 
* c. First Name, Email, External Data Reference, Phone Number 
* d. First Name, Last Name, Email, External Data Reference 
Your Answer 
In order to import a contact list into Qualtrics you need to have First Name, Last Name, Email and External Data Reference as columns in your file.
Shelley is looking at the preview of her contact list import. She sees that all of the fields she wants are there. According to this image, which fields are being uploaded as embedded data? 


* a. First Name and Last Name 
* b. Panelist_ID and Centre_Location 
Your Answer 
All fields that are not Email, First Name, Last Name and External Data Reference will always be uploaded as embedded data.
* c. Email and Centre_Location 
* d. ExternalReference and First Name
Thank you emails are compatible with which of the following distribution methods?
* a. Anonymous link 
* b. SMS distributions 
* c. Multiple Completes Link 
* d. Email distribution (individual link) 
Your Answer 
Thank you emails can only be sent on distributions that were made through the Qualtrics mailer using individual links.
Charles wants to know who started his survey and who has finished it. Where should Charles click to see the distribution history?


* a. 1 
* b. 2 
* c. 3 
Your Answer 
Your distribution history allows you to see who you sent the survey to as well as who has started/finished the survey.
* d. 4
Where should you click to add an inline question to your email invitation? 


* a. 1 
* b. 2 
Your Answer 
The Inline question feature will allows you to add a question that appears in the body of the email rather than at the beginning of a survey. This can increase response rate.
* c. 3 
* d. 4
Elizabeth is sending out an email survey invite. What is the purpose of the highlighted instruction text in the invite? 


* a. The full URL to the survey will appear here 
* b. It will look the same as it does in the image 
* c. Hyperlinked text that says "Take the Survey" which the respondent will click on to start the survey 
Your Answer 
The piped text that appears will show up as a hyper link that the respondent can click on to take the survey.
* d. An opt out button
Sally wants to a question from her survey to appear in the Survey Invitation Email. Which tool enables her to do this?
* a. In-Line Question 
Your Answer 
When composing an email invitation, to add a question from the survey you would use an In-Line Question.
* b. Embedded Data 
* c. Opt-out link 
* d. Survey Options
lesson 5
True or False: You can import your data into a blank project that does not have a survey.
* a. True 
* b. False 
Your Answer 
In order to import data, you also need to import the survey that the data belongs to.
William wants to download his data, but only the field columns that he can see in the Data & Analysis section. Which option will allow William to do this?


* a. 1 
* b. 2 
* c. 3 
Your Answer 
This option lets you pick which columns you want to download. Only the columns that you choose to display in Data and Analysis will download when "download all fields" is not checked off.
* d. 4
When importing responses to Qualtrics, can you use this data in Reports and Results?
* a. Yes 
Your Answer 
All of the data under Data and Analysis will appear under Reports so that you can visualize it.
* b. No
Three of the following can be viewed together in the Data Table in Data & Analysis. Which choice must be viewed separately from the rest?
* a. View Responses in Progress 
Your Answer 
View Responses in Progress is its own separate area. This area allows you to see the progress that each response is at as well as which questions have been answered.
* b. View Completed Responses 
* c. Partial Responses that have been closed 
* d. Test and Preview Responses
What is the most efficient way to filter out underage respondents' responses from your data?
* a. Filter responses by completion date, select the underage respondents, and choose With Selected > Delete. 
* b. Filter your responses by completion date, select all of the responses tagged "underage," and choose With Selected > Delete. 
* c. Filter responses by the age question, select the underage responses and choose With Selected > Delete. 
Your Answer 
Filtering allows you to break down your data into specific groups. To add a filter, select the question and then the answer choice you are looking for.
* d. Export the data, delete the responses from underage respondents and import the data back into your account.
Where in the platform can you view your Responses in Progress?
* a. Selecting View Reports and then clicking Response Reports 
* b. Downloading the Distribution History 
* c. Access Data and Analysis, then go to Responses in Progress 
Your Answer 
The only area that will allow you to see Responses in Progress is Data and Analysis.
* d. Clicking Survey Options and then picking Preview Responses
Derek sees that some of his responses under "recorded responses" have not been 100% finished. What would be a reason for responses to move from "responses in progress" to "recorded responses" even if they are not complete? 
* a. By default, the Partial Completion settings automatically record the responses after the set amount of time 
Your Answer 
Partial completion settings will close out all responses that have not been completed within the allotted time frame. 
* b. The respondent clicked on the opt out link in a distribution after starting the survey 
* c. The respondent's progress was not saved 
* d. The respondent skipped to the last question of the survey and left the others blank
In this image, notice that Columns R to T have some data values missing. Why might this be? Pick two possibilities.


Correct Answer
* a. The questions were hidden from respondents 
Your Answer 
When data is missing from certain responses, it usually means that you had display logic so the respondent did not see the question or they skipped past it.
* b. You paused this open survey and halted data collection 
* c. You need to export again allowing time for the process to finish 
* d. The questions were seen but unanswered by respondents 
Your Answer 
When data is missing from certain responses, it usually means that you had display logic so the respondent did not see the question or they skipped past it.
Jane is in HR, she created a personal wellbeing test for her staff. One of her staff members wants to review her test with Jane. Jane does not want to download all of the data as she does not want to reveal other people's responses. Where can Jane go to view that individual's response only?


* a. 1 
* b. 2 
* c. 3 
* d. 4 
Your Answer 
The option to view a specific response in more detail appears next to every response. This allows you to see how the respondent answered and what questions he/she saw.
Jane wants to delete all of her data at once. Where can she click in order to select multiple responses at once?


* a. 1 
Your Answer 
You can delete multiple responses at once by selecting the check box on the left side. This will allow you to click on "with selected" and choose to delete them.
* b. 2 
* c. 3 
* d. 4
lesson 6
True or False: The Results report is designed to automatically create a visualization for each of the questions and embedded data fields of your survey.
* a. True 
Your Answer 
The Results Report creates visualizations for you so that you can visualize your data in real time. As new responses come in, you will see the graphs adjust to include these.
* b. False
Where should you click in order to create additional reports besides the "default report"?


* a. 1 
Your Answer 
To create a new report, you will click on the drop down arrow that appears next to "default report" .
* b. 2 
* c. 3 
* d. 4
Using the Default Report, Alice wants to show some of her questions in different visualizations. Is this possible?
* a. No, Alice can only add another visualization to every question in the report at once 
* b. No, Alice would have to create a different report if she wants to add more graphs as this one cannot be customized 
* c. Yes, Alice can add more visualizations, but only if there is space on the page 
* d. Yes, Alice can add more visualizations to each question individually on a case by case basis 
Your Answer 
You can add more visualizations to each specific question to display it in different formats.
Which of the following is true when it comes to making changes to the Report Settings?
* a. The changes you make only apply to specific graphs 
* b. The changes you make only apply to specific questions 
* c. The changes you make apply to the entire report 
Your Answer 
All changes that you make in the Report Settings page are at the report level. This means that they will affect the entire report and not just specific questions.
* d. The changes you make only apply to specific pages
Where should you click to access the Report Settings?


* a. 1 
* b. 2 
* c. 3 
* d. 4 
Your Answer 
The Gear icon will allow you to access the Report Settings to make any necessary changes.
Which of the following statements would meet the criteria set by this filter?


* a. The respondent said they were extremely satsified or somewhat satisfied with the customer support representative OR the sales representative 
* b. The respondent said they were extremely satified or somewhat satisfied with the customer support representative AND the sales representative 
Your Answer 
This filter uses "any of the following".This means that one statement from each group needs to be true in order to meet the filter criteria.
* c. The respondent said they were either extremely satisfied or somewhat satisfied with the sales representative 
* d. The respondent said they were somewhat satisfied or extremely satisfied with the customer service representative
Jennifer has a question that asks "What location do you go to?". She would like to be able to breakout the report by age so that she can get a better idea of which age groups attend which locations. Is this possible?
* a. Yes, she can breakout specific visualizations by the age field 
Your Answer 
The breakout feature in reports can be used on specific visualizations. It cannot be applied to the entire question at once.
* b. Yes, she can breakout the whole question and not just individual visualizations by the age field 
* c. No, she can only breakout the entire report by age 
* d. No, there is no feature that would allow her to do this
Where should you click in order to share a report?


* a. 1 
* b. 2 
* c. 3 
Your Answer 
You can share a report by going to the top right corner next to the gear icon.
* d. 4 
Jake's boss wants to receive the survey results report every Wednesday so that she can look at the new data and graphs each week. Which of the following sharing methods would NOT accomplish this?
* a. He can download it as a PDF and email it to her boss each week 
* b. He can set up a scheduled email to her boss each week containing the results 
* c. He can create a public report and give her the link so she can access it each week 
* d. He can download the raw data file and send it to her each week 
Your Answer 
When you download the raw data file you will no longer be able to see the graphs and visualizations that you built out. You will only see the data that makes up each visualization.
John wants to share his survey results in a visual way on his website so that visitors can access it. What sharing method would be best for him to use?
* a. Send out a report email 
* b. Create a public report 
Your Answer 
Public reports give you a URL that you can share with others so that they can look at your report by clicking directly on the link.
* c. Send the URL that appears when he is editing his report 
* d. Download the report as a CSV to upload into his website


Qualtrics Platform Essentials (L2)


Lesson 1
Customer Experience Management measures the quality of the relationship between a customer and an organization.
* a. True 
Your Answer 
* b. False
A strong CX program is linked to 4 key financial results. Select each of the results from the list below:
Correct Answer
* a. Increase customer retention and loyalty 
Your Answer 
* b. Decrease cost to serve 
Your Answer 
* c. Increase share of wallet 
* d. Decrease cost of acquisition 
Your Answer 
* e. Increase market share 
* f. Increase customer lifetime value 
Your Answer 
"CX is the basis for our organization's ongoing differentiation". At which phase of the maturity model does this company sit?
* a. Mobilize 
* b. Scale 
* c. Embed 
Your Answer 
The early stages of the maturity focus on CX improvements around the business without addressing underlying operational and cultural issues.
* a. True 
Your Answer 
* b. False 
Typically, what are the 2 most important CX metrics to capture in a Digital Feedback program?
Correct Answer
* a. CSAT 
Your Answer 
* b. NPS 
* c. CES 
Your Answer 
* d. CLV
lesson 2
If you duplicate a Survey Flow element that has other elements nested within it everything nested within the element will also be duplicated.
* a. True 
Your Answer 
* b. False
A Multiple Choice question in the Introduction block asks customers which product type they shop for. The intention is to use the indicated product to divide participants into three categories: Food, Clothing, and Homeware. What will happen to participants based on the Survey Flow seen in this image?


* a. All participants, regardless of the answer they choose, are assigned values of "Food" then "Clothing," and finally "Homeware," meaning that all participants will end up with a value of "Homeware." 
Your Answer 
* b. Because these Embedded Data fields come immediately after the Introduction block, participants will be categorized correctly. 
* c. The embedded data will automatically be set based on how the customer answered the survey question. 
* d. When there are three identically named Embedded Data fields, Qualtrics will assign your participants the first value that appears in the Survey Flow, meaning that all participants will have the value of “Food.”
Below are four Branch logic configurations. Which of the four options will send male respondents from Canada or the United States who are under the age of 18 to the End of the survey?
1. 
2. 
3. 
4. 
* a. 1 
Your Answer 
* b. 2 
* c. 3 
* d. 4
Study the setup of the image below. What will the respondent experience?


* a. The respondent will be randomly assigned to one of the two branches. 
Your Answer 
* b. The respondent will always see the Apparel block first. 
* c. The randomization of the blocks will be presented evenly
Which of the following features can be randomized inside your survey? Select all that apply.
Correct Answer
* a. Answer Choices 
Your Answer 
* b. Questions 
Your Answer 
* c. Timer Length 
* d. Carry Forward 
* e. Blocks 
Your Answer 
Which statement best describes the Evenly Present Elements feature in the Randomizer?
* a. It keeps track of the number of times each element (like a block of questions) is presented and skews the Randomizer in an attempt to present elements equally. 
Your Answer 
* b. It forces the first respondent to receive the first element (such as a block of questions), then takes the second respondent to the second element, then toggles back and forth evenly until all have finished the survey. 
* c. It keeps track of the number of times each block of questions is presented and skews the Randomizer to present blocks roughly equally. 
What is often considered the most common metric to capture in a relational study?
* a. CSAT 
* b. CES 
* c. NPS 
Your Answer 
You wish to gain a better understanding of your customer's perspective in their own words. What question type will best enable you to do this?
* a. Descriptive 
* b. Text-Entry 
Your Answer 
* c. Open-Ended 
When using CSAT questions, what answer scales are recommended? Select all that apply.
Correct Answer
* a. 3 point scale 
* b. 5 point scale 
Your Answer 
* c. 7 point scale 
Your Answer 
* d. 10 point scale 
It's best practice to order your scales from positive to negative.
* a. True 
* b. False 
Your Answer 
Which specialty question type uses a standard scale from 0–10 and produces a customer loyalty metric?
* a. Net Promoter® Score (NPS®) 
Your Answer 
* b. Likert Scale 
* c. Side by Side Bipolar or MaxDiff 
* d. Pick, Group and Rank
What does Qualtrics call the feature that lets you change the font, size, and color of your text?
* a. Rich Content Editor 
Your Answer 
* b. Piped Text Editor 
* c. Styling Editor
What kind of styling change(s) can be made with the Rich Content Editor? Select all that apply.
Correct Answer
* a. You can change the font size and style 
Your Answer 
* b. You can add symbols and hyperlinks. 
Your Answer 
* c. You can add validation to require the respondent to answer the question. 
* d. You can insert media (e.g., graphics, videos). 
Your Answer 
* e. You can set Display Logic for a question.
Imagine that you have created a 20-question survey. As you added questions, you changed the text color in about 10 of your questions using the Rich Content Editor, but it looks awful! It’s inconsistent and the colors are clashing with your business theme. What can you do to fix it?
* a. Select all of the questions, click the Tools dropdown, and select Strip Formatting. 
Your Answer 
* b. Select all of the questions and click Remove Formatting. 
* c. Go to the Look & Feel menu and reset all the color swatches back to their original colors by clicking Reset Colors.
Lesson 3
An Action typically consists of 3 elements. Select all that apply.
Correct Answer
* a. Event 
Your Answer 
* b. Trigger 
* c. Task 
Your Answer 
* d. Condition 
Your Answer 
I want to send an email to the sales team whenever a survey respondent selects that they’re interested in learning more about our products. What type of action is this?
* a. Event-based 
Your Answer 
* b. Scheduled


The follow-up Details section is used to capture the customers contact information.
* a. True 
* b. False 
Your Answer
On the Follow-Up page ticket owners can view all tickets created across the entire brand.
* a. True 
* b. False 
Your Answer 
Which of the following is a type of task?
* a. Ticket 
Your Answer 
* b. New Survey Session 
* c. Content List Trigger 
* d. Action
When creating a ticket task, which feature allows you to choose specific information you would like to be included on the ticket?
* a. Ticket Data 
Your Answer 
* b. Root Cause 
* c. Priority 
* d. Owner
From a ticket task you can add Root Causes. What does this feature do?
* a. Creates a drop-down menu on the ticket that individuals can select from to note the reason the ticket was created. 
Your Answer 
* b. Adds all root causes as Embedded Data to a response that triggers a ticket 
* c. Creates a bar-graph accessible to admins 
* d. None of these
Which of the following does the Activity section of a ticket record? (Select all that apply)
Correct Answer
* a. Any comments 
Your Answer 
The Activity section of a ticket records most actions that have been taken on the ticket. This includes comments that have been added, changes to the ticket status, creation of sub-tickets, and if the ticket has been re-assigned.
* b. Changes in ticket status 
Your Answer 
The Activity section of a ticket records most actions that have been taken on the ticket. This includes comments that have been added, changes to the ticket status, creation of sub-tickets, and if the ticket has been re-assigned.
* c. Creation of sub-tickets 
Your Answer 
The Activity section of a ticket records most actions that have been taken on the ticket. This includes comments that have been added, changes to the ticket status, creation of sub-tickets, and if the ticket has been re-assigned.
* d. Re-assignment of the ticket 
Your Answer 
The Activity section of a ticket records most actions that have been taken on the ticket. This includes comments that have been added, changes to the ticket status, creation of sub-tickets, and if the ticket has been re-assigned.
How can existing tickets be accessed?
* a. By clicking on "View All Tickets" on the My Projects page 
Your Answer 
* b. By clicking on the Actions button in the Survey tab 
* c. From the Admin tab 
* d. By creating a Ticket Project
When creating ticket statuses, you can have as many priority statuses as necessary.
* a. True 
* b. False 
Your Answer 
Lesson 4 
Is it possible to override contact frequency rules that have been applied to the Directory for exceptional cases?
* a. Yes 
Your Answer 
* b. No 
Which of the following is NOT a field option for deduplication?
* a. Embedded data 
Your Answer 
* b. First name 
* c. Last name 
* d. Email
You have added a group of individuals to a mailing list by uploading a file into the mailing list. What needs to take place for these individuals to be added to the Directory as well?
* a. This will happen automatically 
Your Answer 
* b. Select the “Import to Directory” option when uploading. 
* c. Upload the file a second time to your directory. 
f you delete a mailing list, what will happen to the contacts that were a part of the list?
* a. They will be preserved in the directory with all Embedded Data. 
Your Answer 
* b. They will be deleted from the directory. 
* c. You cannot delete mailing lists. 
* d. They will be preserved in the directory but will lose all Embedded Data associated with that list.
True or False: When you edit an embedded data value for a member of a mailing list, that member will be updated in all lists they are a part of.
* a. True 
Your Answer 
* b. False
What kind of file is necessary for uploading contacts into Qualtrics? Select all that apply.
Correct Answer
* a. .csv 
Your Answer 
* b. .tsv 
Your Answer 
* c. .xslx 
* d. .xml 
* e. .doc 
Select which question type is NOT compatible with 2- way SMS Distribution:
* a. Single Answer Multiple Choice 
* b. Text Entry 
* c. Rank Order 
Your Answer 
* d. NPS
What type of link is QR code connected to?
* a. Anonymous Link 
Your Answer 
* b. Multiple Link 
* c. Individual Link 
* d. Personal Link 
Which survey link fits all four of these criteria?
* Unique to each participant
* Relies on browser cookies
* Allows taking the survey again and again
* Can't send Reminder and Thank You messages
* a. Multiple Completes Link 
Your Answer 
* b. Individual Link 
* c. Anonymous Link
You wish to make your survey public on your customer website. Which link would work best for this?
* a. Anonymous Link 
Your Answer 
* b. Multiple Completes Link 
* c. Individual Link 
* d. Personal Link
lesson 5
When setting conditions for Automatic Role Enrollment you can choose from any of the attribute fields.
* a. True 
* b. False 
Your Answer 
Your survey includes a question asking respondents to state the number of children they have. Which field type is most suitable for this data?
* a. Numeric value 
* b. Number set 
Your Answer
Select the image which contains accurate data mapping: 
1. 2. 3. * a. 1 
Your Answer 
* b. 2 
* c. 3
You can connect multiple surveys to one dashboard.
* a. True 
Your Answer 
* b. False
Widgets automatically lock to the top-most available space on the page.
* a. True 
Your Answer 
* b. False
You can copy entire pages, but you cannot copy widgets
* a. True 
* b. False 
Your Answer 
Which of the following best describes what happens when you create a new user from the User Admin tab in a Dashboard Project
* a. You Create a Dashboard Specific User. If you would like someone to have access to both surveys and the dashboard, you should create them from the Admin section of your XM account. 
Your Answer 
* b. You create a new, fully usable, Qualtrics account. This user can also be found in the Admin tab of your XM account. 
* c. You cannot create new users in the User Admin tab, only edit dashboard permissions for existing accounts.
What of the following is an advantage of using Roles?
* a. Using roles saves you time when sharing dashboards to multiple individuals 
Your Answer 
* b. Without roles you cannot restrict data access 
* c. Without roles you cannot use attributes 
* d. Using roles save you time when setting up accounts
As a brand admin, which options do I have for allowing non-Qualtrics users to see my dashboard. (Select all that apply)
Correct Answer
* a. Export a PDF, JPG, or CSV of the dashboard and send it via my personal email. 
Your Answer 
* b. Use the email dashboard feature within a dashboard to send a PDF of the dashboard 
Your Answer 
* c. Use the Share menu to share to an email address.
By default, dashboard viewers cannot interact with filters.


* a. True 
* b. False 
Your Answer 
Lesson 6
Name the process that identifies the roots of search words and groups their invariants to aid in text analysis.
* a. Lemmatization 
Your Answer 
* b. Truncation 
* c. Reduction 
* d. Parsing 
Sentiment Analysis categorizes text responses by respondent opinion. Of the lists below, which contains the correct opinion categories?
* a. Positive, Negative, Mixed, Neutral 
Your Answer 
* b. Postive, Negative, Neutral 
* c. Postive, Negative 
* d. Like, Dislike, Neutral 
True or false, you can not edit the topics recommended for you.
* a. True 
* b. False 
Your Answer 
All but one (1) of the following describe the nature of Topics analyzed under the Text Tab.
* a. Can be built in before responses are recorded. 
Your Answer 
* b. Act like Custom Fields. 
* c. Behave as Embedded Data. 
* d. Can be used in filters. 
* e. Can be used in reports.
As new responses come into your survey, Text iQ automatically adds them to your existing topics.
* a. True 
* b. False 
Your Answer 
Delivery Essentials
Which task is included in the Qualtrics XM Framework Realize phase?
Correct Answer
* a. Providing solution scoping and program design 
* b. Focusing on helping customers to achieve desired business outcomes 
Your Answer 
That is correct! 
* c. Building out and thoroughly testing the XM program 
* d. Encouraging program expansion to other pillars of the XM platform 
Which member of the Qualtrics team is typically only required for large-scale enterprise implementations and is rarely customer-facing?
Correct Answer
* a. Solution Architect 
* b. Engagement Manager 
* c. Build Services Team Member 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* d. Technical Consultant
For which purpose is the QPN Assistant used? (Select all that apply.)
Correct Answer
* a. Escalating an implementation issue 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* b. Requesting services 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* c. Testing the XM program 
* d. Providing solution scoping 
* e. Giving feedback 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* f. Requesting a specific feature 
Your Answer 
That is correct! 
When gathering data from the Partner Delivery Insights Program, by which method can the CSAT trigger survey be accessed? (Select all that apply.)
Correct Answer
* a. Partner Portal 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* b. Pulse 
* c. Mavenlink 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* d. Thought Industries 
* e. QPN Assistant 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
How often should Project Health be updated in Mavenlink?
Correct Answer
* a. Daily 
* b. Weekly 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* c. Monthly 
* d. As an issue arises
Which term is defined as an element of a project that requires additional resourcing to resolve?
Correct Answer
* a. Pulse 
* b. Support Portal 
* c. CSAT Survey 
* d. Escalation 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
Which statement is true of the process of escalating a support ticket?
Correct Answer
* a. The first point of contact to escalate support tickets is the XM Scientist. 
* b. Any and all workarounds provided and attempted should be included. 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* c. The Partner Delivery Manager should be engaged in each escalation. 
* d. Escalation of the support ticket occurs through the QPN Assistant.
Which statement is true for the process of requesting a feature due to a product issue or a broken feature? 
Correct Answer
* a. The product functionality should first be verified as not intentional. 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* b. The QPN Assistant is consulted to determine if the idea has been posted. 
* c. New ideas can be documented by using a button in Mavenlink. 
* d. The Partnership Delivery Manager is responsible for escalating the feature request. 
When a customer escalation is reported via the QPN Assistant, which type of information should be provided? (Select all that apply.)
Correct Answer
* a. Programmatic impact 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* b. Business context 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* c. Customer sentiment 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* d. Product delivery path 
* e. Updating of project health
Which element is a component of a Qualtrics Statement of Work?
Correct Answer
* a. A list of deliverables and their definitions 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* b. An introductory slide introducing team members 
* c. CX advisory services 
* d. Customer timezone
Jared, a member of the implementation team, has received an email notifying him of the Account Executive and Customer Service Manager on a newly closed deal. Once he has reviewed the Statement of Work with the Account Executive, which step will Jared take to prepare for the first meeting with the customer? (Select all that apply.)
Correct Answer
* a. Gather basic information from the customer 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* b. Determine the service deliverables for customer 
* c. Explain immediate actions to customer 
* d. Gain an understanding of the customer’s expectations for the implementation 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* e. Inquire about the customer’s CX maturity and previous programs 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
Which element is included in the kick-off deck?
Correct Answer
* a. Details on previous CX program setup 
* b. Roles and responsibilities 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* c. Software license agreements 
* d. Survey build documents
Which statement describes a comprehensive testing strategy?
Correct Answer
* a. Scoring in a survey should be tested not only in the survey, but also in the dashboard. 
Your Answer 
That is correct!  
* b. Advanced configurations require similar testing requirements to simpler configurations. 
* c. Once you have tested the surveys, distributions, actions, and dashboards, you have tested all elements of the program. 
* d. Testing should occur in one round. 
In addition to test cases, which element is included in a typical testing plan? (Select all that apply.)
Correct Answer
* a. Defect log 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* b. Go-live checklist 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* c. Product escalation 
* d. Launch checklist 
* e. Change log 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* f. Statement of Work
Which element should be included in the launch checklist? (Select all that apply.)
Correct Answer
* a. Data dictionaries 
* b. Sign-off on design documents 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* c. Troubleshooting guides 
* d. Response weighting 
* e. Outline of the number and type of launches 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
Which is the goal of the project handover call?
Correct Answer
* a. Identifying a risk or issue 
* b. Reviewing and assessing all completed deliverables 
Your Answer 
That is correct!  
* c. Defining test cases for each program component 
* d. Troubleshooting any errors
In addition to the Solution Handover Document, partners and Qualtrics implementation team members are required to complete which other documentation as part of closing a project?
Correct Answer
* a. Support Troubleshooting Guide 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* b. CSAT survey 
* c. Go-live checklist 
* d. CX QA Playbook
Which task is associated with preparing for the project closing and handover call?
Correct Answer
* a. Share the solution handover document by uploading it to Mavenlink. 
* b. Assign each element of product testing to an individual. 
* c. Create a presentation deck that will summarize the project. 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* d. Request that the customer initiate the final CSAT Trigger survey. 
Which Qualtrics role is engaged when a client purchases long-term managed services?
Correct Answer
* a. Engagement Manager 
* b. Solution Architect 
* c. Build Services Team 
* d. Technical Account Manager 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
Which task is included in an effective project handover? (Select all that apply.)
Correct Answer
* a. Discuss expected continuing support resources. 
* b. Provide an overview of lessons learned. 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* c. Encourage customer to give feedback 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* d. Ensure the Solution Handover Document is shared with the customer. 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* e. Hold a meeting to sync with the Qualtrics Account Team 
* f. Review the customer escalation process. 
CX Survey Review
Which section of the Qualtrics survey builder should you check if Embedded Data from the contact list is not populating in the survey responses?
Correct Answer
* a. Survey Experience 
* b. Survey Options 
* c. Survey Flow 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* d. Survey Editor
Which steps occur during a customer survey review? (Select all that apply.)
Correct Answer
* a. Check the Survey Editor 
Your Answer 
That is correct! 
* b. Restrict the Survey Options 
* c. Check the Look & Feel 
Your Answer 
When conducting a customer survey review, seven areas of review are undertaken. These include checking the survey editor, checking the look and feel, and verifying the survey flow. The other four areas for review are checking the tool menu, checking workflows, checking all messages, and confirming rather than restricting the survey options. Cleaning the data set occurs before starting to perform analyses on Stats iQ, not during a customer survey review. Although translated content must be finalized for the customer survey review, this is performed by a translator.
* d. Verify the Survey Flow 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* e. Clean the Data Set 
* f. Finalize the Translation Content
Which section of the Qualtrics survey review should you check for double negatives or incorrect configurations of “AND” and “OR” statements?
Correct Answer
* a. Survey Formatting 
* b. Survey Options 
* c. Survey Flow 
* d. Survey Logic 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
For which reason is it best to avoid forced responses on all questions in a survey?
Correct Answer
* a. It allows the respondent to complete the survey more than once. 
* b. It increases abandonment of the survey. 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* c. Elements such as branches will be skipped. 
* d. Global styling will be overridden.
Custom Email Domain
Which email delivery method allows a customer to use their mail server to send emails using their own email domains?
Correct Answer
* a. SMTP relay 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* b. DKIM 
* c. MX record 
* d. TXT record 
Which final step occurs in the process of configuring a custom domain via DKIM?
Correct Answer
* a. Establishing the record by clicking ‘activate’ with the Qualitrics platform 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* b. Copying and sending values to the customer’s domain administrator 
* c. Having customer’s domain administrator configure the DNS record with the DKIM key 
* d. Ensuring that the customer has a brand administration account 
If a customer wants control over mail logs from the distribution so that they can independently investigate email bounces, which is the best email delivery method?
Correct Answer
* a. DNS information 
* b. SMTP relay 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* c. DKIM 
* d. MX record
During the Qualtrics implementation process, which best practices engage the customer in the importance of email deliverability? (Select all that apply.)
Correct Answer
* a. Begin conversations about email deliverability early in the process. 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* b. Ensure the right people from the customer’s IT team are engaged. 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* c. Conduct a testing procedure to confirm the experience of respondents. 
* d. Ensure that emails always include attachments. 
* e. Emphasize the use of capitalized letters in subject lines.
XM Directory Settings
A customer from the healthcare industry has a business unit that is interested in sending out transactional surveys to previous patients who visited a clinic, and a second business unit that reaches out to insurance policy owners for relational surveys. In order to configure a solution in XM Directory that meets this customer’s requirements, you should advise the customer to use which feature in the XM Directory?
Correct Answer
* a. Transactional data 
* b. Group sharing 
* c. Multiple directories 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* d. Contact import automation
Which fields in the XM directory will require set up as respondent funnel fields? (Select all that apply.)
Correct Answer
* a. Embedded data 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* b. Contact information 
* c. Distribution statistics 
* d. Transactional data 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
Before configuring the XM Directory, a call with the customer’s implementation team to align on the XM Directory requirements should include which information? (Select all that apply.)
Correct Answer
* a. Users who will manage the directory 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* b. Historical contacts 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* c. Directory settings 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* d. Embedded data fields 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* e. Customer IDs 
* f. Number of authenticators in the Survey Flow
Which steps are required to set up a contact import automation? (Select all that apply.)
Correct Answer
* a. Create a name for the automation. 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* b. Upload a sample file to be used as the data dictionary. 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* c. Set up the from and reply-to information on the invitation. 
* d. Determine which import source to use. 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* e. Filter who receives an invite based on contact information.
Which XM Directory setting permits users to limit the number of times a respondent can be contacted by all users in the license to prevent response fatigue and improve the survey taking experience?
Correct Answer
* a. Automation 
* b. Historical Data 
* c. Contact Frequency 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* d. Automatic Deduplication 
CRM Integration
Which benefits can be realized by integrating Qualtrics with a CRM? (Select all that apply.) 
Correct Answer
* a. Leveraging operational data in the XM platform 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* b. Storing data specific to the organization in Salesforce 
* c. Including CRM data in Qualtrics dashboard reports 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* d. Inserting information from your Qualtrics survey into the lead object 
Which option in Response Mapping allows the user to create a new record in Salesforce each time a response is submitted? 
Correct Answer
* a. Update 
* b. Insert 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* c. Post to Chatter 
* d. Delete
Marta is beginning to set up a Salesforce integration for a customer. Which step will she take first? 
Correct Answer
* a. Adding Salesforce field as embedded data in survey flow 
* b. Connecting Qualtrics with Salesforce 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* c. Sending survey responses from Qualtrics into Salesforce via Response Mapping 
* d. Triggering and emailing a survey in Salesforce
Which statement is true regarding Salesforce extension best practices? 
Correct Answer
* a. The user will remain in place only if employees leave the organization. 
* b. Qualtrics offers a customer sandbox and production environment. 
* c. API user accounts can be used for API actions and Salesforce extension. 
Your Answer 
That is correct! 
* d. Assume the customer has access to the Qualtrics API token. 
A CX implementation team is integrating a customer’s CRM with Qualtrics using Salesforce. Despite the fact that the workflow condition was met, a survey was not sent. Which solution will address this error? 
Correct Answer
* a. Leveraging custom From Addresses 
* b. Ensuring the workflow rule is active 
* c. Selecting a distribution method to activate the survey 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* d. Checking the distribution history to confirm email invite status 
API
Which services are included in the API introductory support package? (Select all that apply.) 
Correct Answer
* a. API instruction tailored to a specific customer use case during implementation 
* b. Guidance on the use of Public API documentation 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* c. Where to go for help after implementation has been completed 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* d. Up to 2 hours of general API support/consulting 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* e. A general overview of API and Qualtrics platform 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* f. Best practices and guided learning for API usage 
Which step comes first when running a Qualtrics API call? 
Correct Answer
* a. Execute the API call. 
* b. Troubleshoot call errors. 
* c. Locate Qualtrics IDs required to execute the command. 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* d. Prevent repeated survey display to avoid over-surveying users.
Which customer options abide by Qualtrics API request limits? (Select all that apply.) 
Correct Answer
* a. 1000 API requests per minute 
* b. 200-character mailing list names 
* c. 2MBs file size upload 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* d. 10-second call timeout
Which login timeframe will a customer be issued when they are using Client Credentials and a Bearer Token to access the Qualtrics API?
Correct Answer
* a. 24 hours 
* b. 48 hours 
* c. 1 hour 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* d. 30 minutes
Which step comes first in the process of using Survey Flow Web Services to automate an API request?
Correct Answer
* a. Add a new Web Service element in the Survey Flow. 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* b. Select the method you wish to use. 
* c. Set the value for each parameter. 
* d. Add a body parameter to send to the Web Service. 
Closing the Loop
Which description is true of inner loop feedback management? 
Correct Answer
* a. Focused on addressing individual situations and implementing coaching behaviors 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* b. Looks at aggregate data from a group of respondents 
* c. Used to identify areas for structural and larger-scale improvements 
* d. Can be used with anonymous data collected with a feedback slider on a website 
Which order of stages occurs in a closed-loop management process?
Correct Answer
* a. Contact, Assign, Manage, Monitor, Evaluate 
* b. Manage, Contact, Monitor, Assign, Evaluate 
* c. Assign, Evaluate, Manage, Monitor, Contact 
* d. Evaluate, Assign, Contact, Manage, Monitor 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
Which customer process consideration ensures data is transferred correctly from surveys to tickets? 
Correct Answer
* a. Contacting the manager of a frontline employee to follow up on negative feedback 
* b. Storing ticketing data and survey data independently 
* c. Using consistent naming conventions between ticket field names and embedded data fields 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* d. Executing closed-loop configurations outside of the XM platform 
Which benefits can result from designing tickets and brand-wide settings prior to configuring the ticket? (Select all that apply.) 
Correct Answer
* a. Ensures multiple workstreams interact properly 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* b. Builds out holistic reporting without redoing the ticket configuration 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* c. Adds embedded data to determine who should own each ticket 
* d. Resets the logic before launching
Which key elements are found in the ticketing design document? (Select all that apply.)
Correct Answer
* a. Root Cause 
Your Answer 
That is correct! 
* b. Sentiment Label 
* c. Priority 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* d. Automations 
The Qualtrics implementation team is configuring ticket data fields across multiple workstreams and is receiving continued errors attributed to formatting. Which tool will help the team avoid formatting errors that will affect ticketing? 
Correct Answer
* a. Google OAuth 
* b. Ticket Templates 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* c. Transactional Data 
* d. Notification
A customer wishes to maximize the dashboard limit with more than 200 fields. Which responses will address this request? (Select all that apply.) 
Correct Answer
* a. Delete ticket data fields to maintain program performance. 
* b. Check for accidental fields created from misspellings. 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* c. Increase limit by contacting the Qualtrics Engineering Services team. 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* d. Remap any fields to better structure the dashboard page.
A client is looking for a big picture view of where its business may be struggling. Which types of external data can be used to exert change in an organization using information contained within Qualtrics? (Select all that apply.)
Correct Answer
* a. Ticketing system 
* b. Operational data 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* c. Embedded data 
* d. Organizational factors 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* e. Existing change management systems 
Your Answer 
That is correct!




Customer Experience Dashboards
Which information is included in the dashboard scoping call? (Select all that apply.)
Correct Answer
* a. Which email delivery option will be used 
* b. How many dashboards are needed 
* c. How many pages each dashboard will include 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* d. Which Embedded Data is case sensitive 
* e. How many widgets will be configured per page 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
When designing an effective dashboard for a customer, which is a key first step?
Correct Answer
* a. Clarifying the client’s intended business outcomes 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* b. Inquiring how many iterations of the dashboard you will work through 
* c. Sharing past dashboards you have designed 
* d. Allowing users to limit the number of times a respondent can take a survey 
When filling out a table to define each stakeholder’s needs in the dashboard, which factor should be considered?
Correct Answer
* a. The email bounce rate 
* b. Number of widgets on each page 
* c. Number of iterations of the dashboard 
* d. Each role’s business objective 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
When applying the Design Led Framework, which statement is true?
Correct Answer
* a. Content should be visible to all viewers 
* b. There is no recommended maximum number of pages per project 
* c. Widget recommendations are standardized 
* d. Each dashboard page should have a specific purpose 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
Which is the primary function of the Qualtrics XM App?
Correct Answer
* a. Editing dashboards 
* b. Customizing dashboards 
* c. Viewing dashboards 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* d. Designing dashboards 
Sketching out the dashboard design for pages, filters, and widgets before configuring the dashboard in the Qualtrics platform is referred to as _____.
Correct Answer
* a. Response weighting 
* b. Notification 
* c. Wireframing 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* d. Custom metrics
In order to make a dashboard the most user friendly, which should be avoided?
Correct Answer
* a. Drawing attention to key insights 
* b. Layering pages like book chapters 
* c. Making viewers have to scroll 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* d. Asking customers to share previous layouts
Which method will improve mobile accessibility for dashboard viewing?
Correct Answer
* a. Ensuring filters added directly to widgets are compatible with the Qualtrics XM app 
* b. Installing the Multiple Source Table widget 
* c. Checking the compatibility and limitations of widgets 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* d. Adding a minimum of three scroll panes per dashboard page 
Which is a purpose of the Data Mapper?
Correct Answer
* a. Building and editing dashboard widgets 
* b. Converting surveys to reportable dashboard fields 
Your Answer 
Yes, that is correct!
* c. Setting up dashboard user roles and sharing 
* d. Identifying the User Metadata
Which dashboard widget is used to look at the percentage of respondent satisfaction using a top box metric?
Correct Answer
* a. Response ticker widget 
* b. Simple chart widget 
* c. Gauge chart widget 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* d. Simple table widget
Which advanced features are available in dashboards? (Select all that apply.)
Correct Answer
* a. Action planning 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* b. Text IQ 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* c. Gauge chart widgets 
* d. Custom Metrics 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* e. Text value 
Which benefit will Response Weighting provide for customers?
Correct Answer
* a. Produces dashboard data that is based on actual distribution 
* b. Allows the correction of data for under-surveyed populations 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* c. Enables implementation without an XM Scientist 
* d. Reports on specific equations or comparisons that have been identified 
When building a dashboard, which step comes first?
Correct Answer
* a. Reviewing the survey build 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* b. Configuring the dashboard layout 
* c. Sharing the dashboard with viewers 
* d. Creating a blank CX dashboard project
When are dashboard permissions configured?
Correct Answer
* a. After the widgets and filters are configured 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* b. Before widgets and filters are configured 
* c. During the wireframing process 
* d. Before the user access list is designed
Which dashboard feature protects customers’ access and control of the Qualtrics platform while providing flexible user management?
Correct Answer
* a. Text iQ 
* b. Response weighting 
* c. SSO 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* d. Custom metrics 
By which method can dashboard data be shared? (Select all that apply.)
Correct Answer
* a. Exporting the data 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* b. Adding CX Dashboard viewers to login directly 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* c. Setting up a recurring or one-time email 
* d. Implementing Automatic role enrollment 
* e. Uploading the user list
What characterizes a configuration in the dashboard that would best suit a customer who has organizational roles that often change?
Correct Answer
* a. Fewer widgets 
* b. Region specific 
* c. Efficient permissioning 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* d. Embedded data 
The most common way to restrict access to dashboards is by using _____.
Correct Answer
* a. Wireframing 
* b. Text iQ 
* c. Response weighting 
* d. User attributes 
Your Answer 
Website Feedback
In which scenario will the customer need to change the Website Feedback code? (Select all that apply.)
Correct Answer
* a. The customer wishes to make changes to the project. 
* b. A new project has been created by the customer. 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* c. The Website Feedback code was placed in a global footer by the customer. 
* d. The customer’s web development team has a predefined release cadence. 
* e. The customer has changed the deployment code sampling rate setting. 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
Which types of integrations are used for Website/App Feedback? (Select all that apply.)
Correct Answer
* a. Pop Over 
* b. Session Replay 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* c. Slider 
* d. Web Analytics 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
The customer is concerned about the effect on load times that the Website Feedback project deployment code may have on their website. Which response will you give to the company’s web development team?
Correct Answer
* a. Work with them to determine whether the code was placed in a global header or footer to ensure significantly quicker load times. 
* b. Tell them that to ensure minimal impact on load times, the deployment code should be loaded on the Qualtrics website. 
* c. Work with them to use the bookmarklet tool to make the deployment code run asynchronously. D. Tell them that the deployment code is the last thing on the site to load and is not likely to slow 
* d. Tell them that the deployment code is the last thing on the site to load and is not likely to slow down the company website’s load times. 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
When the customer wants to test a new intercept in a real environment without having the risk of publishing it to the live customer website prematurely, how should you proceed?
Correct Answer
* a. Run a testing process for the Intercept and review the data in Data & Analysis. 
* b. Take advantage of the troubleshooting box when using the bookmarklet. 
* c. Have the customer publish the code to their development website. 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* d. Provide a pop-up in the bottom left-hand corner of the page. 
When building a Website/App Feedback project, which component refers to the visualization for deploying the survey?
Correct Answer
* a. Creative 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* b. Target 
* c. Data Mapper 
* d. Intercept


iQ for Data Analysis
Which task does the Stats iQ interface enable customers to accomplish? 
Correct Answer
* a. Analyzing open-ended feedback 
* b. Identifying binary churn variables 
* c. Defining customer risk thresholds 
* d. Exploring hidden relationships 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
When a client is using Text iQ to determine qualitative relationships between multiple surveys, which strategy for adding topics will ensure survey consistency? (Select all that apply.)
Correct Answer
* a. Importing topics 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* b. Adding churn variables 
* c. Using a single workspace 
* d. Modifying queries 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
Zander has met with a client who wishes to identify at-risk customers and has determined that he should run a Predict iQ analysis. Which tasks are necessary to complete before the Predict iQ analysis can be run? (Select all that apply.) 
Correct Answer
* a. Adding other O-data 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* b. Modifying queries 
* c. Adding the churn variable 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* d. Amassing at least 500 responses 
Your Answer 
That is correct!
* e. Finding relationships 
* f. Creating charts
